California, session 20252026, AB135.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10875 is added to the Education Code, to read:10875. (a) The data providers shall, and the University of California is requested to, enter into memoranda of understanding for data sharing purposes, as necessary, for the implementation of this chapter.(b) A signatory to the participation agreement meets the requirements of this section.(c) This section does not impose a requirement that differs from the requirement contained in former Section 10858, as it read on January 1, 2024.SEC. 2. Section 17201 of the Education Code is amended to read:17201. (a) The Higher Education Student Housing Grant Program is hereby established to provide one-time grants for the construction of student housing, or for the acquisition and renovation of commercial properties into student housing for the purpose of providing affordable, low-cost housing options for students enrolled in public postsecondary education in California.(b) (1) (A) Of the total amount appropriated pursuant to subdivision (l), and intended to be appropriated pursuant to subdivision (p) in support of this section and Section 17202, as those sections read on January 1, 2023, 50 percent of the available funds shall be available for the California Community Colleges, 30 percent of the available funds shall be available for the California State University, and 20 percent of the available funds shall be available for the University of California.(B) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, funding previously allocated for construction grants for campuses of the University of California and the California State University, or funding that is planned to be allocated for additional construction grants for the University of California and the California State University, pursuant to this section, as it read on January 1, 2023, shall be funded with bonds issued by the University of California and the California State University instead of funded from previous and planned General Fund appropriations.(C) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, funding previously allocated for construction grants for campuses of the California Community Colleges, or funding that is planned to be allocated for additional construction grants for the California Community Colleges, pursuant to this section, as it read on January 1, 2023, shall be funded with local revenue bonds issued by community college districts instead of funded from previous and planned General Fund appropriations.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the amounts designated in paragraph (1) for the California Community Colleges, and the amounts designated in subdivision (n) for the University of California and the California State University, may be adjusted to accommodate and prioritize projects serving low-income students across more than one segment.(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that grants will be disbursed to increase the current stock of affordable student housing, for purposes of supporting low-income students and facilitating low-income student access to higher education.(c) Proposals for one-time grants for the construction of, or rehabilitation of commercial properties for, student housing shall include, at a minimum, the project goals, costs, number of students to be housed, timeline for the project, financial feasibility of the project, anticipated impact on the campus’ ability to accommodate California resident enrollment growth, a commitment to construct the project within the resource needs identified in the proposal, and any other information deemed necessary for evaluation of the criteria pursuant to subdivision (f).(d) (1) University of California campuses, California State University campuses, and community college districts shall submit their applications to their respective administering entities.(2) Applications for intersegmental projects shall be submitted to each of the administering entities overseeing a campus or college involved in the intersegmental project.(3) Community college districts and intersegmental partners that receive planning grants may submit applications for construction grants to their respective administering entities only after feasibility studies and all other preliminary planning have been completed and reliable project cost estimates have been developed.(e) The administering entities shall provide the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the budget committees of the Legislature with information on all submitted project proposals, including, but not necessarily limited to, the information specified in subdivision (g), on or before February 1 preceding the fiscal year in which program funds are appropriated.(f) Submitted proposals shall demonstrate all of the following:(1) Construction on the project could begin by December 31 in the year the grant is awarded, or by the earliest possible date thereafter.(2) (A) The rent provided in the applicable units of the development for low-income students shall be calculated at 30 percent of 50 percent of the area median income for a single-room occupancy unit type. The percentage of area median income may be adjusted upon written notification by the Director of Finance to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and approval by the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.(B) Annual rent for the units described in this paragraph may be adjusted each year based on the lesser of the area median income calculation for a given year pursuant to subparagraph (A), or the percentage change in the annual average value of the California Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers for the most recent calendar year of actual data.(C) The affordability restriction described in subparagraph (A) shall apply for the life of the facility.(3) A commitment to first offer the housing available from the facilities to low-income students. In meeting this requirement, a campus may calculate the rental savings and number of low-income students that would be served by the student housing constructed pursuant to this section, and place the calculated number of students qualifying for the reduced rental rate throughout the campus’s available housing.(4) (A) A commitment to require any students renting housing in the facilities to take a minimum average of 12 degree-applicable units per semester term, or the quarterly equivalent, to facilitate timely degree completion.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), eligible students renting housing in the facilities shall be permitted to live in the facilities for the full academic or calendar year so long as the student remains enrolled in the applicable campus. Renewal of housing in the facility in subsequent academic or calendar years shall require the student to demonstrate compliance with subparagraph (A).(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), students renting housing in the facilities may temporarily reduce their unit load below 12 degree-applicable units if they are able to demonstrate an exceptional circumstance necessitating a reduced unit load, which may include, but is not necessarily limited to, illness or injury, as determined by the applicable campus.(5) Receipt of a grant pursuant to this chapter will result in a public benefit, such as providing low-cost student housing and reduced rents, reducing students’ total cost of attendance, serving more low-income students, or other tangible benefits that would not be practical without the grant for student housing.(6) The University of California and the California State University shall not use a public-private partnership to construct, operate, maintain, or any combination thereof, a project.(7) As a condition of receiving funding for a project, the University of California shall comply, with respect to the project, with the requirements of Section 92495 applicable to capital outlay projects.(8) A plan to build funds into the submitted project bid for project contingency.(A) The amount for project contingency shall be 5 percent of construction costs for University of California and California State University projects and 10 percent of construction costs for California Community College projects. Intersegmental projects involving a California Community College shall include project contingency of 10 percent of construction costs. Grant funds may be used to cover these project contingency amounts.(B) (i) The plan also shall identify the fund sources, other than the construction grants received under this program, and their respective balances that would be available to cover costs above those projected in the application.(ii) Any applicant that receives a grant shall cover any costs above those identified in their application to the state using the fund sources identified in clause (i).(9) (A) An applicant’s student population has unmet demand for housing, as measured by both of the following:(i) The proportion of students waitlisted for on-campus housing compared to total enrollment.(ii) Rental vacancy rates for housing in the county for which the student housing project would be located, as defined by the United States Census Bureau.(B) Applicants shall calculate the data pursuant to clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (A) using data for the most recent year available.(10) A campus shall not apply for a grant to reimburse costs that it has already incurred.(g) In their submittals to the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and budget committees of the Legislature, the administering entities shall rank all eligible applications using a composite score of all of the following measures:(1) State funding per bed for low-income students, with a lower ratio receiving a higher ranking.(2) Projected rents for low-income student units relative to the limit set forth in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f), with a lower measure receiving a higher ranking.(3) Project timeline, with an earlier construction start date receiving a higher ranking.(4) The geographic location of each project. It is the intent of the Legislature that projects selected for a grant are fairly representative of various geographical regions of the state and campuses of the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges.(5) Whether the applicant is reapplying with a project that was previously deemed ineligible, with a higher ranking given to the updated project applications that address any issues identified in a previous application.(6) (A) Unmet demand for housing, with a higher ranking given to projects with either of the following:(i) Higher proportions of students waitlisted for on-campus housing when compared to total enrollment.(ii) Lower rental vacancy rates for housing in the county for which the student housing project would be located, as defined by the United States Census Bureau.(B) Applicants shall calculate the proportions and rates pursuant to clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (A) using data for the most recent year available.(C) For each project, the administering entities shall select the measure determined pursuant to clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (A) yielding the highest ranking.(h) Proposals for student housing projects submitted pursuant to this chapter shall be considered for inclusion in the annual Budget Act or other legislation, subject to an available and sufficient appropriation.(i) (1) Appropriations provided to support a project included in the annual Budget Act or other legislation pursuant to this chapter shall be considered grants to the applicant for purposes of constructing the project. As a condition of receiving funds pursuant to this chapter, the Regents of the University of California, the Trustees of the California State University, or the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, or the respective statewide offices for each segment, shall do all of the following:(A) Provide oversight of the project for which funds are appropriated.(B) From the receipt of funds to completion of construction for the project, report annually, beginning on or before July February 1 of the fiscal year immediately following receipt of funding, to the Department of Finance and the relevant policy and budget committees of the Legislature Legislature, together with the annual report submitted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 66014.6, if applicable, on the status of the project. At a minimum, these reports shall include data on a project’s cost, funding by source, number of beds for low-income students, rents for low-income student beds, the number of standard rent beds and their associated rents, if applicable, building square footage, and project timeline. For each of these data elements that were included in a project’s application to the state, the reports shall compare the estimates provided in the application to the most recently available estimates.(C) Following completion of the project, report annually, beginning on or before July February 1 of the year immediately following completion, for a five-year period to the Department of Finance and the relevant policy and budget committees of the Legislature Legislature, together with the annual report submitted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 66014.6, if applicable, on the public benefit provided by the project as related to the selection criteria outlined in this chapter. At a minimum, these reports shall include data on a project’s number of beds for low-income students, rents for low-income student beds, the number of standard rent beds and their associated rents, if applicable, annual operating costs and revenues, and housing occupancy rates compared to the campuswide average. For each of these data elements that were included in a project’s application to the state, the reports shall compare the estimates provided in the application to the most recently available estimates.(2) For a community college project funded pursuant to this chapter, the local community college district may perform the oversight and reporting functions required pursuant to subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (1) in lieu of these functions being performed by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges or the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(j) For purposes of computing the maintenance of effort for the federal Coronavirus Response and Relief Supplemental Appropriations Act of 2021 (Public Law 116-260), and the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-2), these funds shall be considered fully expended in the year in which they are appropriated, and these funds shall be considered need-based financial aid, as the intent of the program is to reduce nontuition costs for students.(k) Notwithstanding any other law, including subdivision (j), reduced housing expenses from student housing provided pursuant to this chapter shall augment and not supplant student financial aid from other public sources, and shall not be considered when calculating eligibility for student financial aid.(l) For the 2022–23 fiscal year, seventeen million nine hundred seventy-four thousand dollars ($17,974,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund for the purpose of providing planning grants for California Community Colleges that are exploring or determining if it is feasible to offer affordable student rental housing.(m) The funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (l) shall be appropriated to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, to be allocated to the following California Community Colleges, as follows:(1) One hundred fifty-five thousand dollars ($155,000) for allocation to Chabot College.(2) One hundred fifty-five thousand dollars ($155,000) for allocation to Las Positas College.(3) One hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for allocation to Contra Costa College.(4) One hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for allocation to Diablo Valley College.(5) One hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for allocation to Los Medanos College.(6) One hundred thirty-two thousand dollars ($132,000) for allocation to De Anza College.(7) One hundred thirty-two thousand dollars ($132,000) for allocation to Foothill College.(8) Five hundred eighty thousand dollars ($580,000) for allocation to Ohlone College for two projects.(9) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Berkeley City College.(10) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to College of Alameda.(11) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Laney College.(12) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Merritt College.(13) Two hundred thirty-five thousand dollars ($235,000) for allocation to Evergreen Valley College.(14) Two hundred thirty-five thousand dollars ($235,000) for allocation to San Jose City College.(15) Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for allocation to the College of San Mateo.(16) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for allocation to Solano Community College.(17) Three hundred fourteen thousand dollars ($314,000) for allocation to Cerro Coso Community College.(18) Three hundred fourteen thousand dollars ($314,000) for allocation to Porterville College.(19) One hundred forty-five thousand dollars ($145,000) for allocation to Merced College.(20) Five hundred sixty-four thousand dollars ($564,000) for allocation to Merced College for an intersegmental project with the University of California, Merced.(21) Four hundred forty-nine thousand dollars ($449,000) for allocation to Fresno City College.(22) Four hundred forty-nine thousand dollars ($449,000) for allocation to Madera College.(23) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for allocation to West Hills College Coalinga.(24) Seventy thousand dollars ($70,000) for allocation to Copper Mountain College.(25) One hundred fifty-five thousand dollars ($155,000) for allocation to Mt. San Jacinto College.(26) Five hundred forty thousand dollars ($540,000) for allocation to Moreno Valley College.(27) Five hundred ninety thousand dollars ($590,000) for allocation to Norco College.(28) Four hundred seventy thousand dollars ($470,000) for allocation to Riverside City College.(29) Eight hundred forty-five thousand dollars ($845,000) for allocation to Crafton Hills College.(30) Eight hundred forty-five thousand dollars ($845,000) for allocation to San Bernardino Valley College.(31) Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for allocation to Antelope Valley Community College.(32) Two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($225,000) for allocation to Cerritos College.(33) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to El Camino College.(34) One hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000) for allocation to Long Beach City College.(35) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to East Los Angeles College.(36) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Los Angeles City College.(37) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Los Angeles Harbor College.(38) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Los Angeles Mission College.(39) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Los Angeles Pierce College.(40) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Los Angeles Southwest College.(41) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Los Angeles Trade Technical College.(42) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Los Angeles Valley College.(43) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to West Los Angeles College.(44) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for allocation to Cypress College.(45) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for allocation to Pasadena City College.(46) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for allocation to Rancho Santiago Community College District.(47) Five hundred twenty-two thousand dollars ($522,000) for allocation to Rio Hondo College.(48) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Santa Monica College.(49) Three hundred twenty-three thousand dollars ($323,000) for allocation to Irvine Valley College.(50) Four hundred eighty-three thousand dollars ($483,000) for allocation to Saddleback College.(51) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for allocation to Butte College for an intersegmental project with California State University, Chico.(52) Three hundred forty-nine thousand dollars ($349,000) for allocation to Feather River College.(53) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to American River College.(54) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Cosumnes River College.(55) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Folsom Lake College.(56) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Sacramento City College.(57) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for allocation to Mendocino College.(58) One hundred fifty-five thousand dollars ($155,000) for allocation to Shasta College.(59) One hundred fifty-five thousand dollars ($155,000) for allocation to Cuyamaca College.(60) One hundred fifty-five thousand dollars ($155,000) for allocation to Grossmont College.(61) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for allocation to MiraCosta College.(62) Eight hundred twenty thousand dollars ($820,000) for allocation to Palomar College.(63) Three hundred forty-four thousand dollars ($344,000) for allocation to San Diego City College.(64) Six hundred eighteen thousand dollars ($618,000) for allocation to Southwestern College for five projects.(65) One hundred eighty-five thousand dollars ($185,000) for allocation to Allan Hancock College.(66) Two hundred forty-two thousand dollars ($242,000) for allocation to Cabrillo Community College.(67) Three hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($325,000) for allocation to Hartnell College.(68) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for allocation to Santa Barbara City College.(69) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for allocation to Moorpark College.(70) Two hundred forty-nine thousand dollars ($249,000) for allocation to Oxnard College.(n) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year all of the following shall apply:(1) (A) The General Fund support for the grants provided to campuses of the University of California and the California State University, as listed in this section pursuant to Chapters 54 and 572 of the Statutes of 2022, shall revert to the General Fund and the project grants shall instead be funded by revenue bonds issued by the University of California and the California State University.(B) In addition to the funding for projects pursuant to subparagraph (A) for the University of California, the University of California shall fund construction grants using revenue bond funding issued by the University of California for both of the following projects:(i) Forty-three million dollars ($43,000,000) for allocation to the University of California, Davis, for the Segundo Infill Student Housing project.(ii) Forty-three million dollars ($43,000,000) for allocation to the University of California, Santa Barbara, for the East Campus Student Housing project.(C) In addition to the funding for projects pursuant to subparagraph (A) for the University of California, the University of California shall allocate funding for capital outlay planning and construction to finance all of the following projects:(i) One hundred twenty-six million dollars ($126,000,000) for allocation to the University of California, Riverside, for an intersegmental project with Riverside City College.(ii) One hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) for allocation to the University of California, Merced, for an intersegmental project with Merced College.(iii) One hundred eleven million seven hundred eighty-seven thousand dollars ($111,787,000) for allocation to the University of California, Santa Cruz, for an intersegmental project with Cabrillo Community College.(D) (i) In addition to the funding for projects pursuant to subparagraph (A) for the California State University, the California State University shall fund construction grants using revenue bond funding issued by the California State University for all of the following projects:(I) Eighty-nine million one hundred thousand dollars ($89,100,000) for allocation to the California State University, San Jose.(II) Forty-one million three hundred forty thousand dollars ($41,340,000) for allocation to the California State University, Sacramento.(III) Eighteen million eight hundred fifty thousand dollars ($18,850,000) for allocation to the California State University, Stanislaus.(ii) The California State University shall use seven million four hundred eighty-nine thousand dollars ($7,489,000) in revenue bond funding issued by the California State University to fund cost overruns associated with approved project grants described in subparagraph (A).(E) Projects funded by revenue bond funds pursuant to this paragraph shall meet all requirements of this chapter.(2) (A) The General Fund support for the grants provided to campuses of the California Community Colleges, as listed in this section pursuant to Chapters 54 and 572 of the Statutes of 2022, shall revert to the General Fund, and the grants may instead be funded by local financing issued by community college districts for specified projects. A community college that has already received an allocation of resources shall revert those General Fund resources upon the community college’s receipt of proceeds derived from amounts borrowed by the State Public Works Board pursuant to any financing program established to support community college affordable student housing projects, or upon the appropriation of funds related to fulfilling the community college’s obligation to revert the allocation it received pursuant to Chapters 54 and 572 of the Statutes of 2022.(B) In addition to the funding for projects pursuant to subparagraph (A), the California Community Colleges may fund construction grants using local financing issued by community college districts for all of the following projects:(i) Seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) for allocation to San Diego City College.(ii) Sixty-seven million nine hundred ninety-five thousand dollars ($67,995,000) for allocation to Cerritos College.(iii) Fifty-five million eight hundred fifty-four thousand dollars ($55,854,000) for allocation to the College of San Mateo.(iv) Twenty-eight million four hundred fifteen thousand dollars ($28,415,000) for allocation to the College of the Redwoods.(C) In addition to the funding for projects pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B), the California Community Colleges may fund construction grants using local financing issued by local community college districts for an additional eighty-one million three hundred forty-three thousand dollars ($81,343,000), subject to future legislation.(D) Projects funded by local financing pursuant to this paragraph shall meet all requirements of this chapter.(o) Any project receiving a grant pursuant to this section shall deliver, at a minimum, the number of beds for low-income students specified in its application when it was approved by the state. Rents for these beds shall not exceed the rates assumed in the project’s application. A project may deliver more beds or charge lower rents than assumed in its application if financially feasible.(p) Intersegmental projects funded through the University of California shall divide the number of beds for low-income students between the participating campuses as specified in the Higher Education Student Housing Grant Program application approved by the state and further defined in the subsequent operating agreements between each University of California campus and the California Community College district partnership.(q) It is the intent of the Legislature that no later than the Budget Act of 2024, a statewide lease revenue bond or other statewide financing or fiscal approach be developed and included to support community college affordable student housing projects that have been approved pursuant to this section.SEC. 3. Section 66014.6 of the Education Code is amended to read:66014.6. (a) The office of the Chancellor of the California State University and the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall, and the office of the President of the University of California is requested to, require each campus that provides campus-owned, campus-operated, or campus-affiliated student housing to post on its external and internal internet websites, at least twice each academic year, all of the following information:(1) The number of enrolled students, and how many of those students are veterans.(2) Existing campus housing stock, including, but not limited to, the number of available beds on campus.(3) (A) The number of students on the campus housing waiting list, and how many of those students are veterans.(B) The number of students that have removed themselves from the waiting list since the last report, and how many of those students are veterans.(4) If available, the number of students who request campus-owned, campus-operated, or campus-affiliated student housing, and how many of those students are veterans.(5) If available, the number of incoming freshmen, transfer students, and international students requiring campus-owned, campus-operated, or campus-affiliated student housing, and how many of those students are veterans.(b) Data collected pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be collected by the department or center on campus that is tasked with providing on-campus and off-campus housing assistance to students.(c) (1) The office of the Chancellor of the California State University and the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall, and the office of the President of the University of California is requested to, submit submit, together with the information required pursuant to subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 17201, an annual report with the information described in subdivision (a) to the Legislature, with the first report being due on or before October 15, 2023. Legislature.(2) The office of the Chancellor of the California State University and the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall, and the office of the President of the University of California is requested to, submit one report that compiles all of the campus data collected pursuant to subdivision (a).(3) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(d) For purposes of this section, “veteran” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 980 of the Military and Veterans Code.SEC. 4. Section 66023.9 is added to the Education Code, to read:66023.9. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Basic needs” has the same meaning as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 66023.4.(2) “Homeless” and “housing insecure” mean students who lack a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence, or who are at imminent risk of losing housing. This includes students who are any of the following:(A) Sharing the housing of other persons due to loss of housing, economic hardship, or a similar reason.(B) Living in motels, hotels, trailer parks, or camping grounds due to the lack of alternative adequate accommodations.(C) Living in emergency or transitional shelters.(D) Living in a primary nighttime residence that is a public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings.(E) Living in cars, parks, public spaces, abandoned buildings, substandard housing, bus or train stations, or similar settings.(3) “Mental health” means services and resources to address the signs and symptoms of mental health challenges. Depending on student age and developmental level, this may include, but is not limited to, conditions such as depression, suicidal thoughts and behaviors, schizophrenia, bipolar disorder, substance use conditions, eating disorders, and anxiety, including post-traumatic stress disorder.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that funding appropriated to the University of California and the California State University specifically for rapid rehousing, basic needs, and student mental health be used for the purposes described in this subdivision, including, but not limited to, for all of the following:(1) Funds appropriated to the University of California and the California State University in the annual Budget Act specifically for purposes of this section for rapid rehousing may be used to support efforts to assist homeless and housing insecure students, including, but not limited to, all of the following purposes:(A) For campuses to establish ongoing partnerships with community organizations that have a tradition of helping populations experiencing homelessness to provide wraparound services and rental subsidies for students.(B) To connect students with community case managers who have knowledge and expertise in accessing safety net resources.(C) To establish ongoing emergency housing procedures, including on-campus and off-campus resources.(D) To provide emergency grants necessary to secure housing, to prevent the imminent loss of housing, or to stabilize housing for students at risk of homelessness.(2) Funds appropriated to the University of California and the California State University in the annual Budget Act specifically for purposes of this section for basic needs are used to support, but are not limited to supporting, meal donation programs, food pantries serving students, CalFresh enrollment, and other means of directly providing nutrition assistance to students, and may be used, but are not limited to being used, for all of the following purposes:(A) To assist homeless and housing insecure students in securing and maintaining stable housing.(B) To supply students with personal hygiene products.(C) To establish Basic Needs Centers as a centralized location on campus where students experiencing basic needs insecurity can be identified, supported, and linked to on-campus and off-campus resources to support timely program completion. Basic Needs Centers may use funds described in this paragraph for its operations.(D) To designate or hire dedicated Basic Needs Coordinators for the Basic Needs Centers who will serve as a single point of contact for students.(3) Funds appropriated to the University of California and the California State University in the annual Budget Act specifically for purposes of this section for student mental health are used to increase mental health resources for students, including, but not limited to, the expansion, continuation, and support of existing campus-based mental health programs and services.(c) Funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act specifically for purposes of this section that are to be provided to students shall be distributed to the student by the campus financial aid office. Funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act specifically for purposes of this section shall be allocated to University of California and California State University campuses based on demonstrated need.(d) The University of California and the California State University shall each report annually on or before February 1 on the use of funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act specifically for purposes of this section for the two preceding fiscal years. Reporting on the use of all funds appropriated specifically for purposes of this section may be included in a single report if all data elements required pursuant to this section are separately identifiable. A report described in this subdivision shall be submitted to the Director of Finance and the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, and shall include all of the following:(1) For funds appropriated for rapid rehousing, the University of California and the California State University shall report information that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(A) The number of professional staff and full-time employees that assist students with rapid rehousing.(B) The number of students served by campus.(C) The allocation of funds by campus.(D) A description of the types of programs funded.(E) Whether students receiving rapid rehousing support remained enrolled at the university or graduated.(F) Other relevant outcomes.(2) For funds appropriated for basic needs and student mental health, the University of California and the California State University shall report information that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(A) The amount of funds allocated to each campus.(B) For each campus that was allocated funds, a programmatic budget summarizing how the funds were spent. The programmatic budget shall include any other funding used to supplement the funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act specifically for purposes of this section.(C) A description of the types of programs in which each campus spent the funds.(D) A list of campuses that accept, or plan to accept, electronic benefits transfer.(E) A list of campuses that participate, or plan to participate, in the CalFresh Restaurant Meals Program.(F) The number of students who first started receiving CalFresh benefits in the preceding fiscal year and the total number of students in the preceding fiscal year that received CalFresh benefits.(G) A list of campuses that have a data sharing agreement with the relevant county operating the CalFresh program to identify new, continuing, and returning students who are potentially eligible for CalFresh benefits, and a list of campuses with ongoing efforts to enter into such an agreement.(H) A list of campuses that offer or plan to offer emergency housing or assistance with long-term housing.(I) The number of students receiving mental health services on campus, disaggregated by race and ethnicity, gender, age group, and type of service received.(J) The average wait time for initial routine mental health counseling appointments.(K) The average number of campus mental health counseling appointments per student.(L) The number of students referred to off-campus providers for mental health services.(M) The number of student mental health staff by provider type and the counselor-to-student ratio.(N) Total spending on student mental health services, by fund source, including spending covered by insurance providers.(3) A description of how campuses leveraged or coordinated with other state or local resources to address housing insecurity, food insecurity, and student mental health.(4) An analysis describing how funds appropriated specifically for purposes of this section reduced food insecurity and homelessness among students, increased student mental health, and, if feasible, impacted student outcomes such as persistence or completion.(5) Other findings and best practices implemented by campuses.SEC. 5. Section 66292 of the Education Code is amended to read:66292. (a) The governing board of each community college district and the chief executive officer of the community college district shall have joint responsibility for ensuring that programs and activities offered by the community college district are free from discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270, including, but not limited to, the prevention of sexual harassment as defined in Section 66262.5.(b) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall have responsibility for monitoring each community college district’s compliance with subdivision (a).(c) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall annually make a presentation during a public meeting of the Board of Governors on the state of the California Community Colleges system in ensuring that community college district programs and activities are free from discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270. The presentation shall include an overview of the chancellor’s office’s efforts in monitoring and ensuring the compliance of each district with providing programs and activities that are free from discrimination, including, but not limited to, the prevention of sexual harassment as defined in Section 66262.5. The presentation shall include an overview of how community college districts are complying with Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.) and Sections 66281.5, 66281.8, 67385, 67385.7, and 67386.(d) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall annually review the California Community Colleges system’s regulations on nondiscrimination and shall revise the regulations as necessary to ensure that all community college districts are offering programs and activities that are free from discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270.(e) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges Colleges, or the chancellor’s designee, shall annually present during a public hearing of the Senate Budget Subcommittee on Education and Fiscal Review Subcommittee No. 1 on Education the annual presentation described in subdivision (c). It is the intent of the Legislature that this presentation includes an overview of how the California Community Colleges are addressing and preventing discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270 before the California Community Colleges system receives state student financial aid.(f) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges Colleges, or the chancellor’s designee, shall annually present during a public hearing of the Assembly Budget Subcommittee on Education Finance No. 3 on Education Finance the annual presentation described in subdivision (c). It is the intent of the Legislature that the presentation includes an overview of how the California Community Colleges are addressing and preventing discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270 before the California Community Colleges system receives state student financial aid.(g) As used in this section, “Board of Governors” means the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.SEC. 6. Section 66292.1 of the Education Code is amended to read:66292.1. (a) The president of each California State University campus shall have the primary responsibility for ensuring that campus programs and activities are free from discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270, including, but not limited to, the prevention of sexual harassment as defined in Section 66262.5.(b) The Chancellor of the California State University shall have responsibility for monitoring the compliance of each California State University campus with subdivision (a).(c) The chancellor’s office shall annually present a report to the Board of Trustees on the state of the California State University system in ensuring that programs and activities are free from discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270. The report shall include an overview of the chancellor’s office’s efforts in monitoring and ensuring the compliance of each campus with providing programs and activities that are free from discrimination, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment as defined in Section 66262.5. The report shall include how each campus is complying with Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.) and Sections 66281.5, 66281.8, 67385, 67385.7, and 67386.(d) The Chancellor of the California State University University, or the chancellor’s designee, shall annually present during a public hearing of the Senate Budget Subcommittee on Education and Fiscal Review Subcommittee No. 1 on Education the report described in subdivision (c). It is the intent of the Legislature that the presentation includes an overview of how the California State University is addressing and preventing discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270 before the California State University system receives state student financial aid.(e) The Chancellor of the California State University University, or the chancellor’s designee, shall annually present during a public hearing of the Assembly Budget Subcommittee on Education Finance No. 3 on Education Finance the report described in subdivision (c). It is the intent of the Legislature that the presentation includes an overview of how the California State University is addressing and preventing discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270 before the California State University system receives state student financial aid.(f) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Board of Trustees” means the Board of Trustees of the California State University.(2) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California State University.SEC. 7. Section 66292.2 of the Education Code is amended to read:66292.2. (a) The chancellor of each University of California campus shall have the primary responsibility for ensuring that campus programs and activities are free from discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270, including, but not limited to, the prevention of sexual harassment as defined in Section 66262.5.(b) The President of the University of California California, or the President’s designee president’s designee, shall have the responsibility for monitoring the compliance of each University of California campus with subdivision (a).(c) The office of the President shall annually present a report to the Board of Regents on the state of the University of California system in ensuring that programs and activities are free from discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270. The report shall include an overview of the office of the President’s efforts in monitoring and ensuring compliance of each campus with providing programs and activities that are free from discrimination, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment as defined in Section 66262.5. The report shall include how each campus is complying with Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.) and Sections 66281.5, 66281.8, 67385, 67385.7, and 67386.(d) The President of the University of California California, or the president’s designee, shall annually present the report described in subdivision (c) during a public hearing of the Senate Budget Subcommittee on Education. and Fiscal Review Subcommittee No. 1 on Education. It is the intent of the Legislature that the presentation includes an overview of how the University of California is addressing and preventing discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270 before the University of California system receives state student financial aid.(e) The President of the University of California California, or the president’s designee, shall annually present the report described in subdivision (c) during a public hearing of the Assembly Budget Subcommittee on Education Finance. No. 3 on Education Finance. It is the intent of the Legislature that the presentation includes an overview of how the University of California is addressing and preventing discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270 before the University of California system receives state student financial aid.(f) Section 67400 shall not apply to this section.(g) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Board of Regents” means the Board of Regents of the University of California.(2) “Office of the President” means the office of the President of the University of California.SEC. 8. Section 69432 of the Education Code is amended to read:69432. (a) (1) Cal Grant Program awards shall be known as “Cal Grant A Entitlement Awards,” “Cal Grant B Entitlement Awards,” “California Community College Expanded Entitlement Awards,” “California Community College Transfer Entitlement Awards,” “Competitive Cal Grant A and B Awards,” “Cal Grant C Awards,” and “Cal Grant T Awards.”(2) For purposes of this section, “associate degree for transfer commitment” means a commitment by an independent institution of higher education that chooses to accept the California Community College associate degree for transfer pursuant to Section 66749.6.(b) Maximum award amounts for students at independent institutions of higher education, private for-profit postsecondary educational institutions, and for Cal Grant C and Cal Grant T awards shall be identified in the annual Budget Act. Maximum award amounts for Cal Grant A and B A, B, and C awards for students attending public institutions shall be referenced in the annual Budget Act.(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), and subdivision (c) of Section 66021.2, commencing with the 2013–14 award year, the maximum tuition award amounts for Cal Grant A and B awards for students attending private for-profit postsecondary educational institutions shall be four thousand dollars ($4,000).(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subdivision, subdivision (b) of this section, and subdivision (c) of Section 66021.2, commencing with the 2018–19 award year, the maximum tuition award amounts for Cal Grant A and B awards for students attending private for-profit postsecondary educational institutions accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges shall be nine thousand eighty-four dollars ($9,084) for new recipients, unless otherwise specified in the Budget Act of 2018.(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of this section, and subdivision (c) of Section 66021.2, the maximum tuition award amounts for Cal Grant A and B awards for students attending independent institutions of higher education shall be as follows:(1) For the 2015–16 to 2020–21 award years, inclusive, nine thousand eighty-four dollars ($9,084) for new recipients.(2) For the 2021–22 award year, nine thousand two hundred twenty dollars ($9,220) for new recipients.(3) For the 2022–23 and 2023–24 award years, nine thousand three hundred fifty-eight dollars ($9,358) for new recipients.(4) For the 2024–25 award year and each year thereafter:(A) If the number of new unduplicated transfer students accepted by independent institutions of higher education who have been given associate degree for transfer commitments in the prior award year meets or exceeds the target specified in subdivision (h), nine thousand three hundred fifty-eight dollars ($9,358) for new recipients.(B) If the number of new unduplicated transfer students accepted by independent institutions of higher education who have been given associate degree for transfer commitments in the prior award year is less than the target specified in subdivision (h), eight thousand fifty-six dollars ($8,056) for new recipients.(e) (1) The renewal award amount for a student whose initial award is subject to a maximum award amount specified in this section shall be calculated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 69433.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subdivision, and paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 69433, the maximum tuition award amounts for Cal Grant A and B awards for students attending independent institutions of higher education shall be nine thousand three hundred fifty-eight dollars ($9,358) for renewal recipients, if the student first received a new award before the 2022–23 award year.(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that independent institutions of higher education make a good faith effort to make the process for transferring from the California Community Colleges easier for resident students and a decision determining the maximum award amounts made pursuant to this section for students attending an independent institution of higher education will be made with consideration of the effort of the institution to make that process easier.(g) The association representing the largest number of independent institutions of higher education shall submit a report relative to the implementation of this section to the Department of Finance and the Legislature, in conformity with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on or before April 15 of each year.(h) (1) For the 2024–25 award year and each award year thereafter, the target number of new unduplicated recipients accepted by independent institutions of higher education who have been given associate degree for transfer commitments shall be equal to the number of new transfer students attending independent institutions of higher education who were given associate degree for transfer commitments in the prior award year, adjusted by the percentage change in the total number of new transfer students from the year two years prior, compared to the prior year.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), it is the intent of the Legislature that the target number of new unduplicated recipients accepted by independent institutions of higher education who have been given associate degree for transfer commitments will increase each year.(i) For purposes of this section, “independent institution of higher education” has the same meaning as in Section 66010.SEC. 9. Section 69436 of the Education Code is amended to read:69436. (a) A student who was not awarded a Cal Grant A or B award pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 69434) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435) at the time of their high school graduation but, at the time of transfer from a California community college to a qualifying baccalaureate program or upon matriculation into the upper division coursework of a community college baccalaureate program, described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 78040) of Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7, meets all of the criteria set forth in subdivision (b), shall be entitled to a Cal Grant A or B award.(b) Any California resident transferring from a California community college to a qualifying institution that offers a baccalaureate degree or who matriculates into the upper division coursework of a community college baccalaureate program, described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 78040) of Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7, is entitled to receive, and the commission, or a qualifying institution pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 69450), shall award, a Cal Grant A or B award depending on the eligibility determined pursuant to subdivision (c), if all of the following criteria are met:(1) A complete official financial aid application has been submitted or postmarked pursuant to Section 69432.9, no later than the March 2 of the year immediately preceding the award year.(2) The student demonstrates financial need pursuant to Section 69433.(3) The student has earned a community college grade point average of at least 2.4 on a 4.0 scale and is eligible to transfer to a qualifying institution that offers a baccalaureate degree.(4) The student’s household has an income and asset level not exceeding the limits set forth in Section 69432.7.(5) The student is pursuing a baccalaureate degree that is offered by a qualifying institution.(6) The student is enrolled at least part time.(7) The student meets the general Cal Grant eligibility requirements set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 69430).(8) The (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the student will not be 28 years of age or older by December 31 of the award year.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for the 2026–27 award year through the 2030–31 award year, inclusive, the student will not be 30 years of age or older by December 31 of the award year.(9) The student graduated from a California high school or its equivalent during or after the 2000–01 academic year.(10) (A) Except as provided for in subparagraph (B), the student attended a California community college in the academic year immediately preceding the academic year for which the award will be used.(B) A student otherwise eligible to receive an award pursuant to this section, who attended a California community college in the 2011–12 academic year, may use the award for the 2012–13 and 2013–14 academic years.(c) The amount and type of the award pursuant to this article shall be determined as follows:(1) For applicants with income and assets at or under the Cal Grant A limits, the award amount shall be the amount established pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 69434).(2) For applicants with income and assets at or under the Cal Grant B limits, the award amount shall be the amount established pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435).(d) (1) A student meeting the requirements of paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) by means of high school graduation, rather than its equivalent, shall be required to have graduated from a California high school, unless that California resident graduated from a high school outside of California due solely to orders received from a branch of the United States Armed Forces by that student or by that student’s parent or guardian that required that student to be outside of California at the time of high school graduation.(2) For the purposes of this article, all of the following are exempt from the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 69433.9 and paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) of this section:(A) A student for whom a claim under this article was paid before December 1, 2005.(B) A student for whom a claim under this article for the 2004–05 award year or the 2005–06 award year was or is paid on or after December 1, 2005, but no later than October 15, 2006.(C) Commencing with the 2017–18 academic year, a student who did not graduate from high school or its equivalent and was a California resident, as determined pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 68060) of Chapter 1 of Part 41, on their 18th birthday.(3) (A) The commission, or a qualifying institution pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 69450), shall make preliminary awards to all applicants currently eligible for an award under this article. At the time an applicant receives a preliminary award, the commission, or a qualifying institution pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 69450), shall require that applicant to affirm, in writing, under penalty of perjury, that they meet the requirements set forth in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 69433.9, paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) of this section, and paragraph (1) of this subdivision. The commission, or a qualifying institution pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 69450), shall notify each person who receives a preliminary award under this paragraph that their award is subject to an audit pursuant to subparagraph (B).(B) The commission shall select, at random, a minimum of 10 percent of the new and renewal awards made under subparagraph (A), and shall require, before the disbursement of Cal Grant funds to the affected postsecondary institution, that the institution verify that the recipient meets the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 69433.9, paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) of this section, and paragraph (1) of this subdivision. An award that is audited under this paragraph and found to be valid shall not be subject to a subsequent audit.(C) Pursuant to Section 69517.5, the commission shall seek repayment of any and all funds found to be improperly disbursed under this article.(D) On or before November 1 of each year, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislature and the Governor, including, but not necessarily limited to, both of the following:(i) The number of awards made under this article in the preceding 12 months.(ii) The number of new and renewal awards selected, in the preceding 12 months, for verification under subparagraph (B), and the results of that verification with respect to students at the University of California, at the California State University, at independent nonprofit institutions, and at independent for-profit institutions.SEC. 10. Section 69439 of the Education Code is amended to read:69439. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Career pathway” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 88620.(2) “Economic security” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 14005 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.(3) “Industry cluster” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 88620.(4) “Long-term unemployed” means, with respect to an award applicant, a person who has been unemployed for more than 26 weeks at the time of submission to the commission of his or her their application.(5) “Occupational or technical training” means that phase of education coming after the completion of a secondary school program and leading toward recognized occupational goals approved by the commission.(b) A Cal Grant C award shall be utilized used only for occupational or technical training in a course program of not less than four months. eight weeks. A student enrolled in an occupational or technical training program between 8 weeks and 14 weeks in length shall receive a prorated Cal Grant C award amount. A student enrolled in an occupational or technical training program equal to or greater than 15 weeks in length shall receive the maximum Cal Grant C award amount. There shall be the same number of Cal Grant C awards each year as were made in the 2000–01 fiscal year. Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 69433.5, a recipient of the Cal Grant C award shall receive an award amount based on the length of the occupational or technical training program. The maximum award amount and the total amount of funding shall be determined each year in the annual Budget Act.(c) The commission may use criteria it deems appropriate in selecting students to receive grants for occupational or technical training and shall give special consideration to the social and economic situations of the students applying for these grants, giving additional weight to disadvantaged applicants, applicants who face economic hardship, and applicants who face particular barriers to employment. Criteria to be considered for these purposes shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(1) Family income and household size.(2) Student’s or the students’ parent’s household status, including whether the student is a single parent or child of a single parent.(3) The employment status of the applicant and whether the applicant is unemployed, giving greater weight to the long-term unemployed.(d) The Cal Grant C award recipients shall be eligible for renewal of their grants until they have completed their occupational or technical training in conformance with terms prescribed by the commission. A determination by the commission for a subsequent award year that the program under which a Cal Grant C award was initially awarded is no longer deemed to receive priority shall not affect an award recipient’s renewal. In no case shall the grants exceed two calendar years.(e) Cal Grant C awards may be used for institutional fees, charges, and other costs, including tuition, plus training-related costs, such as special clothing, local transportation, required tools, equipment, supplies, technology, books, and living expenses. In determining the individual award amounts, the commission shall take into account the financial means available to the student to fund his or her their course of study and costs of attendance as well as and other state and federal programs available to the applicant.(f) (1) To ensure alignment with the state’s dynamic economic needs, the commission, in consultation with appropriate state and federal agencies, including the Economic and Workforce Development Division of the Office office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the California Workforce Investment Development Board, shall identify areas of occupational and technical training for which students may utilize use Cal Grant C awards. Commencing with the 2026–27 academic year, the list of occupations and technical training programs used for purposes of this section shall include, but not be limited to, programs eligible for the federal Workforce Pell Grant program under Article 17 (commencing with Section 69870) of Chapter 2. The commission, to the extent feasible, shall also consult with representatives of the state’s leading competitive and emerging industry clusters, workforce professionals, and career technical educators, to determine which occupational training programs and industry clusters should be prioritized.(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the areas of occupational and technical training developed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be regularly reviewed and updated at least every five years, beginning in 2012. not less than every two years concurrent with development and modification of the state plan required by the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128).(B) By January 1, 2016, the commission shall update the priority areas of occupational and technical training.(3) (A) The commission shall give priority in granting Cal Grant C awards to students pursuing occupational or technical training in areas that meet two of the following criteria pertaining to job quality:(i) High employer need or demand for the specific skills offered in the program.(ii) High employment growth in the occupational field or industry cluster for which the student is being trained.(iii) High employment salary and wage projections for workers employed in the occupations for which they are being trained.(iv) The occupation or training program is part of a well-articulated career pathway to a job providing economic security.(B) To receive priority pursuant to subparagraph (A), at least one of the criteria met shall be specified in clause (iii) or (iv) of that subparagraph. subparagraph, or the program may meet the criteria described in paragraph (4).(4) Commencing with the 2027–28 academic year, the commission may prioritize Cal Grant C awards for students enrolled in programs on the California Priority Jobs Credentials List to the extent that the list is developed pursuant to Section 69873.5, or programs identified on the list developed by the Employment Development Department pursuant to Section 69871.(g) The commission shall determine areas of occupational or technical training that meet the criteria described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) in consultation with the Employment Development Department, the Economic and Workforce Development Division of the Office office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, and the California Workforce Investment Development Board using projections available through the Labor Market Information Data Library. The commission may supplement the analyses of the Employment Development Department’s Labor Market Information Data Library with the labor market analyses developed by the Economic and Workforce Development Division of the Office office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the California Workforce Investment Development Board, as well as and the projections of occupational shortages and skills gap developed by industry leaders. The commission shall publish, and retain, on its Internet Web site internet website a current list of the areas of occupational or technical training that meet the criteria described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f), and update this list as necessary.(h) Using the best available data, the commission shall examine the graduation rates and job placement data, or salary data, of eligible programs. Commencing with the 2014–15 academic year, the commission shall give priority to Cal Grant C award applicants seeking to enroll in programs that rate high in graduation rates and job placement data, or salary data.(i) (1) The commission shall consult with the Employment Development Department, the Office office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the California Workforce Investment Development Board, and the local workforce investment boards to develop a plan to publicize the existence of the grant award program to California’s long-term unemployed to be used by those consulting agencies when they come in contact with members of the population who are likely to be experiencing long-term unemployment. The outreach plan shall use existing administrative and service delivery processes making use of existing points of contact with the long-term unemployed. The local workforce investment boards are required to participate only to the extent that the outreach efforts are a part of their existing responsibilities under the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998 (Public Law 105-220).(2) The commission shall consult with the Workforce Services Branch of the Employment Development Department, the Office office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the California Workforce Investment Development Board, and the local workforce investment boards to develop a plan to make students receiving awards aware of job search and placement services available through the Employment Development Department and the local workforce investment boards. Outreach shall use existing administrative and service delivery processes making use of existing points of contact with the students. The local workforce investment boards are required to participate only to the extent that the outreach efforts are a part of their existing responsibilities under the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998 (Public Law 105-220).(j) (1) The Legislative Analyst’s Office shall submit a report to the Legislature on the outcomes of the Cal Grant C program on or before April 1, 2019. This report shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, information on all of the following:(A) The age, gender, and segment of attendance for recipients in two prior award years.(B) The occupational and technical training program categories prioritized.(C) The number and percentage of students who received selection priority as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f).(D) The extent to which recipients in these award years were successfully placed in jobs that meet local, regional, or state workforce needs.(2) For the report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1), the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall include data for two additional prior award years and shall compare the mix of occupational and technical training programs and institutions in which Cal Grant C award recipients enrolled before and after implementation of subdivision (f).(3) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislature on or before April 1, 2021, and on or before April 1 of each odd-numbered year thereafter, that includes the information specified in paragraph (1).(4) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 11. Article 17 (commencing with Section 69870) is added to Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read: Article 17. Federal Workforce Pell Grant Program69870. For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(a) “Commission” means the Student Aid Commission.(b) “Participating institution” means a federal Workforce Pell Grant-eligible postsecondary educational institution that offers a short-term program and enrolls students living in the state in a short-term program.(c) “Postsecondary educational institution” means a campus of the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges, a private postsecondary educational institution defined in Section 94858, or an independent institution of higher education defined in Section 66010.(d) “Short-term program” means an educational program offered by a participating institution that includes 150 to 599, inclusive, hours of instruction, or an equivalent number of credit hours, over 8 to 14 weeks, inclusive.(e) “Workforce Pell Grant program” means the federal program established pursuant to Public Law 119-21, under which federal Workforce Pell Grants may be awarded to students enrolled in a short-term program at a participating institution.69871. The Employment Development Department shall provide a list of high-skill, high-wage, or in-demand industry sectors or occupations to the Labor and Workforce Development Agency every two years concurrent with the development and modification of the state plan required by the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128). The first list shall be submitted on or before October 1, 2026. To fulfill this requirement, the Employment Development Department may use the list updated on or before July 1, 2026, as required by the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act. After providing the list to the California Workforce Development Board at a meeting of the board, the Labor and Workforce Development Agency shall promptly provide the list to the commission for its consideration in determining whether to approve a short-term program pursuant to this article. The commission shall also publicly post this list on its internet website.69872. (a) The commission, on behalf of the Governor, shall determine whether a participating institution’s short-term program meets the requirements established pursuant to this article and shall consult with the California Workforce Development Board on the process that will be used to make those determinations.(b) Before approving any short-term program pursuant to this article, the commission shall consult with the California Workforce Development Board and the Labor and Workforce Development Agency on the short-term programs that the commission is proposing to approve, which may include, but not be limited to, presenting at a meeting of the California Workforce Development Board a list of short-term programs that the commission is proposing to approve.(c) (1) A participating institution seeking a determination that one or more of its short-term programs meets the requirements of the Workforce Pell Grant program shall provide all of the following to the commission in a manner prescribed by the commission:(A) Documentation that the short-term program meets all requirements set forth in Section 83002(b) of Public Law 119-21 and any applicable federal or state law or regulation.(B) Documentation that demonstrates the methodology and implementation plan for maintaining ongoing compliance with all requirements set forth in Section 83002(b) of Public Law 119-21, including a description of how and what data will be collected to demonstrate ongoing compliance.(C) A completed Workforce Pell Grant program application, as developed by the commission, and any associated documentation, data, and certifications that are required as part of its submission in accordance with regulations adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 69873.(D) Documentation that the short-term program does all of the following:(i) Provides an education aligned with the requirements needed for work in the sectors or occupations identified pursuant to Section 69871, including identifying the specific sector or occupation on the list the program aligns with.(ii) Meets the hiring requirements of employers in the sectors or occupations identified pursuant to Section 69871.(iii) Leads to a recognized postsecondary credential that is stackable and portable across more than one employer or prepares students enrolled in the short-term program for employment in an occupation for which there is only one recognized postsecondary credential and that awards students the credential upon completion of the short-term program.(iv) Prepares students to pursue one or more certificates or degrees at a postsecondary educational institution by ensuring that, upon completion of the short-term program and enrollment in a related certificate or degree program, a student will receive academic credit that an institution will accept toward that certificate or degree and the academic credit will be accepted toward meeting the certificate or degree program requirements.(2) The office of the Chancellor of the California State University and the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall, and the office of the President of the University of California is requested to, coordinate the submission of applications seeking Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility for the institutions under their authority rather than the institutions separately submitting applications directly to the commission. This coordination is intended to improve efficiency in the submission and processing of applications and to eliminate duplicative submissions. All other submissions shall be made directly to the commission.(d) (1) A participating institution seeking a determination that one or more of its short-term programs meets the requirements of the Workforce Pell Grant program shall collect all of the following data:(A) Program-level data, including all of the following:(i) The name of the short-term program.(ii) The Classification of Instructional Programs code and title.(iii) The total number of students that enrolled in the short-term program during the previously completed federal financial aid award year, the students’ state of residence for financial aid purposes, and the number of those students that completed the short-term program.(iv) The total cost of attendance, including tuition and fees, and the average cost of the short-term program.(v) The median earnings and percentage of graduates who are employed.(vi) The number of students who completed the short-term program that are employed in a position related to the short-term program and a list of the positions and employers that are considered to be in the program’s field of study, if available. To the extent that the list would result in individual students becoming readily identifiable, that information shall be treated similarly to student-level data and confidential data pursuant to subparagraph (C).(B) Student-level data necessary for participating institutions to perform calculations demonstrating a program meets federal and state Workforce Pell Grant program requirements, including, but not limited to, both of the following:(i) Demographic information, including, but not limited to, student identifiers, names, and dates of birth.(ii) Financial aid information, including, but not limited to, aid amounts, including federal, state, and institutional aid, Pell Grant recipient status, net cost, tuition, and fees.(C) Program-level and student-level data shall be used by participating institutions seeking Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility to demonstrate that they meet all state and federal requirements. To protect student privacy, participating institutions seeking eligibility shall provide to the commission only program-level data and calculations performed using student-level data. Individual student-level data and any confidential data may only be shared with the commission if it is deidentified by the participating institution and critical to demonstrating Workforce Pell Grant program initial or continued eligibility.(D) Participating institutions shall continue to collect program-level and student-level data necessary to demonstrate initial and continued eligibility to ensure the institutions are able to provide sufficient evidence, upon request of the federal government, that they meet federal program performance, outcome, and other requirements. To the extent that such data is needed by the commission to verify continued Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility, the data-sharing limitations described subparagraph (C) shall apply.(2) (A) (i) Participating institutions shall use data available under the authority provided in Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code to demonstrate compliance with federal and state Workforce Pell Grant program requirements. To the extent necessary to carry out the activities described in this section, data agreements executed under the authority provided in Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code may be modified to include data necessary to determine Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility.(ii) The office of the Chancellor of the California State University and the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall, and the office of the President of the University of California is requested to, coordinate data sharing with the Employment Development Department on behalf of the participating institutions under their authority using data available pursuant to Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.(iii) The entities in clause (ii) may amend data-sharing agreements executed under the authority provided in Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code with the Employment Development Department to allow for the redisclosure of data to the participating institutions under their authority to enable them to demonstrate initial or continued eligibility by meeting all federal and state requirements.(B) (i) Participating institutions interested in seeking Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility without existing data-sharing agreements with the Employment Development Department pursuant to Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code to demonstrate compliance with federal and state Workforce Pell Grant program requirements shall submit a letter of interest to the commission and the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data on or before December 15, 2026, and on or before December 15 of each year thereafter, to the extent that legislation described in clause (iii) has not yet been enacted, expressing their interest in seeking Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility. The letter of intent shall indicate the number and name of the programs seeking eligibility, the specific sector or occupation on the list prepared pursuant to Section 69871 each program aligns with, and the average class size for each program.(ii) To the extent letters of interest are submitted, the commission and the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data shall jointly submit a report to the Department of Finance and the Legislature summarizing those letters. The report may also include a recommended plan for how data equivalent to the data described under Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code may be provided to participating institutions seeking data to demonstrate initial or continued Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility by meeting all federal and state requirements. The commission and the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data may consult with the Employment Development Department if a recommended plan is developed. This report shall be submitted to the Department of Finance and the Legislature pursuant to Government Code Section 9795.(iii) Applications seeking Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility from participating institutions without existing data-sharing agreements with the Employment Development Department pursuant to Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code may not be accepted before the adoption of legislation specifying the process by which data equivalent to the data described under Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code shall be provided to participating institutions seeking Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility.(e) The commission shall not authorize a participating institution to receive Workforce Pell Grant program funds for a short-term program unless all of the following conditions have been met:(1) The commission determines that the short-term program meets the requirements set forth in Section 83002(b) of Public Law 119-21, and as implemented through any applicable federal or state law or regulation.(2) The participating institution has met the requirements of subdivisions (c) and (d).(3) The participating institution is accredited by an agency that is recognized and approved by the United States Department of Education and that reviews and provides accreditation for short-term programs.(4) The short-term program has been offered by the participating institution for at least one year before the date that the participating institution submitted its request for an eligibility determination pursuant to this article.(f) (1) The commission shall make a determination on the approval of a participating institution’s eligibility for the Workforce Pell Grant program and provide written notice of its decision, including any reasons for disapproval, within 90 days of receiving the participating institution’s application for an eligibility determination and completed participation agreement.(2) (A) (i) The commission shall establish an appeal process for an otherwise qualifying institution that fails to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (c) or (d), or both, for participation in the Workforce Pell Grant program.(ii) The commission shall only consider an appeal on the basis of a technical error in the reporting of data required for an eligibility determination for participation in the Workforce Pell Grant program pursuant to subdivision (c).(B) The commission shall respond to an appellant within 60 days of receiving the appeal and all associated documentation, including any updated data, that is relevant to the appeal. The commission may request additional information from the institution as necessary to complete its review of the appeal. The 60-day deadline may be extended upon agreement of the commission and the appellant, or upon a demonstration of good cause by the commission.(g) The commission shall revoke the approval of a short-term program related to the Workforce Pell Grant program if any of the following occurs:(1) The participating institution fails to meet the requirements of subdivision (c) or (d) in any award year.(2) The participating institution is determined by a court or the California State Auditor to have engaged in unlawful, unfair, or fraudulent business acts or practices, including unfair, deceptive, untrue, or misleading statements related to the short-term program.(3) The participating institution fails to provide data to the Office of Cradle-to-Career data pursuant to Section 69875.(h) The commission shall publicly notify students enrolled in qualifying short-term programs of their rights as recipients of a Workforce Pell Grant.69873. (a) The commission shall adopt regulations, including any amendments to regulations, necessary to implement the Workforce Pell Grant program.(b) The commission may adopt emergency regulations it deems necessary to implement the Workforce Pell Grant program, in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). For purposes of the Administrative Procedure Act, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of those regulations or amendments to those regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare, notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.(c) Notwithstanding any other law and without further compliance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), any emergency regulations and amendments to the emergency regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall remain in force and effect until December 1, 2027, or until the commission adopts permanent regulations pursuant to subdivision (a).69874. (a) (1) The commission shall submit a report to the Department of Finance, the Assembly Committee on Budget, and the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review on or before October 1, 2027, and on or before October 1 of each year thereafter, that lists all institutions seeking an eligibility determination pursuant to this article, the specific short-term programs assessed for eligibility, and the final eligibility determination for each program assessed.(2) The commission shall distinguish between short-term programs that have received commission approval before review by the United States Department of Education and short-term programs that have received final eligibility decisions from the United States Department of Education in the reports submitted pursuant to paragraph (1).(b) (1) The commission shall present an interim report on or before August 30, 2028, and a final report on or before August 30, 2030, at a meeting of the commission that evaluates the Workforce Pell Grant program and includes the following information:(A) A list of institutions and programs that the commission has determined as meeting federal and state eligibility requirements for participation in the Workforce Pell Grant program.(B) An assessment of the amount of Workforce Pell Grant program moneys benefitting California, program completion rates, and job placement rates reported by institution, program type, and year.(2) The commission shall submit the reports described in paragraph (1) to the Department of Finance, the Assembly Committee on Budget, and the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review no later than one week after each report is presented at a meeting of the commission.(3) The commission may enter into an agreement with the Office of the Cradle-to-Career Data to assist with the preparation of the interim and final reports described in paragraph (1). The Office of Cradle-to-Career shall not provide individual student-level data or confidential data to the commission for the completion of these reports. Any other data shared shall be consistent with applicable federal and state laws regarding access to and confidentiality of student record information, including, but not limited to, the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g) and the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code).69875. (a) (1) A participating institution seeking or obtaining Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility shall provide program-level and student-level data required pursuant to Section 69872, and any data or outcome metrics used to justify initial or continued eligibility, to the Office of the Cradle-to-Career Data.(2) The office of the Chancellor of the California State University and the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall, and the office of the President of the University of California is requested to, coordinate with the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data on behalf of their respective participating institutions to submit the required data to the California Cradle-to-Career Data System using existing legal and data-sharing agreements.(3) A participating institution, excluding an institution covered under paragraph (2), shall provide data in a manner and procedure established by the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data. The manner and procedure, and any related guidance or manuals, outlined by the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data to implement this section shall be exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(b) (1) A participating institution shall ensure that any confidential student information or student-level data collected for purposes of this article is disclosed to the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data, consistent with applicable federal and state laws regarding access to, and confidentiality of, student record information, including, but not limited to, the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g) and the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code).(2) Pursuant to Section 10872, information disclosed to the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data is not subject to disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).(c) The Office of Cradle-to-Career Data may publicly disclose any information submitted by a participating institution subject to, and in compliance with, all applicable state and federal privacy law.69876. (a) In addition to its authority under existing state law, the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data may carry out its duties under the Workforce Pell Grant program.(b) The Office of Cradle-to-Career Data shall provide the data necessary to carry out its duties under this article to either the participating institutions or the commission, consistent with applicable federal and state laws concerning access to and confidentiality of student record information, to implement the Workforce Pell Grant program. Student level data shall be deidentified to protect student privacy.SEC. 12. Section 70022 of the Education Code is amended to read:70022. (a) (1) Subject to an available and sufficient appropriation, an undergraduate student enrolled in the California State University or the University of California, or a community college student enrolled in upper division coursework of a community college baccalaureate program, described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 78040) of Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7, who meets the requirements of paragraph (3) is eligible for a scholarship award as described in paragraph (2).(2) (A) For the 2013–14 to the 2021–22 academic year, inclusive, except as provided in paragraphs (4) and (5), an eligible student shall receive a scholarship award in an amount that, combined with other federal, state, or institutionally administered student grants or fee waivers received by an eligible student, is up to 40 percent of the amount charged to that student in that academic year for mandatory systemwide tuition and fees, or for an eligible community college student, up to 40 percent of the amount charged to that student in upper division fees for a community college baccalaureate degree program, if all of the requirements in paragraph (3) are met, to the satisfaction of the commission, each academic year.(B) For the 2022–23 academic year, except as provided in paragraph (5), an eligible student shall receive a scholarship award in an amount that equals the difference between their cost of attendance as determined by the commission and the sum of the following amounts:(i) Other federal, state, and institutionally administered student scholarships, grants, or fee waivers, and the amount of private scholarships awarded to the student in excess of the sum of the amounts in clauses (ii) and (iii).(ii) Seven thousand eight hundred ninety-eight dollars ($7,898), reflecting an expected student contribution toward cost of attendance from work earnings or other resources.(iii) Notwithstanding Section 69506, for dependent students with an annual household income exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), 33 percent of the parents’ contribution from adjusted available income, as determined using the federal methodology established by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087mm et seq.), and applicable rules and regulations adopted by the commission.(C) For the 2023–24 academic year, except as provided in paragraph (5), an eligible student shall receive a scholarship award in an amount that equals the difference between their cost of attendance as determined by the commission and the sum of the following amounts:(i) Other federal, state, and institutionally administered student scholarships, grants, or fee waivers.(ii) The amount of private grants and scholarships awarded to the student, and institutionally awarded emergency housing funds and other basic needs emergency assistance awarded to the student, including emergency assistance awarded by an institution-based foster youth support program, in excess of the sum of the amounts in clauses (iii) and (iv).(iii) Seven thousand eight hundred ninety-eight dollars ($7,898), reflecting an expected student contribution toward cost of attendance from work earnings or other resources.(iv) Notwithstanding Section 69506, for dependent students with an annual household income exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), 33 percent of the parents’ contribution from adjusted available income, as determined using the federal methodology established by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087mm et seq.), and applicable rules and regulations adopted by the commission.(D) Commencing with the 2024–25 academic year, except as provided in paragraph (5), an eligible student shall receive a scholarship award in an amount that equals the difference between their cost of attendance as determined by the commission and the sum of the following amounts:(i) Other federal, state, and institutionally administered student need-based scholarships, grants, or fee waivers.(ii) The amount of private grants and scholarships awarded to the student, and institutionally administered non-need-based scholarships and institutionally awarded emergency housing funds or other basic needs emergency assistance awarded to the student, including emergency assistance awarded by an institution-based foster youth support program, in excess of the sum of the amounts in clauses (iii) and (iv).(iii) An expected student contribution toward cost of attendance from work earnings or other resources. The commission shall adjust the 2023–24 amount of seven thousand eight hundred ninety-eight dollars ($7,898) annually thereafter based on the percentage change in the minimum wage, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code.(iv) Notwithstanding Section 69506, for dependent students with an annual household income exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), 33 percent of the parents’ contribution from adjusted available income, as determined using the federal methodology established by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087mm et seq.), and applicable rules and regulations adopted by the commission.(E) If a student’s total award under this article, in combination with other grants and scholarships treated as estimated financial assistance (EFA) or other financial assistance (OFA) pursuant to federal financial aid regulations, exceeds the allowable gift aid under those regulations, the award under this article shall be reduced to the greatest allowable award to maintain compliance pursuant to federal financial aid regulations.(F) If an award in clause (i) of subparagraph (D) of less than three hundred dollars ($300) is identified following the determination of a student’s scholarship award under this article, the student’s scholarship award under this article shall not require a recalculation.(G) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (E) and (F), if a foster youth or former foster youth receives additional financial aid following the determination of the student’s scholarship award under this article, the student’s scholarship award under this article shall not require a recalculation unless a recalculation is necessary in order to comply with federal financial aid regulations.(3) (A) A student shall be eligible to receive an award if all of the following requirements are met, to the satisfaction of the commission, each academic year:(B) (i) For each academic year from 2013–14 to 2021–22, inclusive, the student’s annual household income does not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). For awards distributed for the 2016–17 academic year and subsequent academic years, the commission shall annually adjust the maximum income level set under this clause in accordance with the percentage changes in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIII  B of the California Constitution. For purposes of this article, annual household income shall be calculated in a manner that is consistent with the requirements applicable to the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program (Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430)) and Section 69506.(ii) Commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, the student’s annual household income does not exceed the following amounts:(I) Two hundred one thousand dollars ($201,000) if the student is a dependent student or an independent student with dependents other than a spouse.(II) One hundred thirty-three thousand dollars ($133,000) if the student is a married independent student with no dependents other than a spouse.(III) One hundred sixteen thousand dollars ($116,000) if the student is a single independent student with no dependents.(iii) For awards distributed for the 2023–24 academic year and subsequent academic years, the commission shall annually adjust the maximum income levels set under clause (ii) in accordance with the percentage changes in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution. For purposes of this article, annual household income shall be calculated in a manner that is consistent with the requirements applicable to the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program (Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430)) and Section 69506.(C) (i) For each academic year from 2015–16 to 2021–22, inclusive, the student’s household asset level shall not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). For awards distributed in the 2016–17 academic year and subsequent academic years, the commission shall annually adjust the maximum household asset level set under this clause in accordance with the percentage changes in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution. For purposes of this article, student’s household asset level shall be calculated in a manner that is consistent with the requirements applicable to the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program (Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430)) and Section 69506.(ii) Commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, the student’s household asset level does not exceed the following amounts:(I) Two hundred one thousand dollars ($201,000) if the student is a dependent student or an independent student with dependents other than a spouse.(II) Ninety-six thousand dollars ($96,000) if the student is a single independent student with no dependents or a married independent student with no dependents other than a spouse.(iii) For awards distributed in the 2023–24 academic year and subsequent academic years, the commission shall annually adjust the maximum household asset level set under clause (ii) in accordance with the percentage changes in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution. For purposes of this article, a student’s household asset level shall be calculated in a manner that is consistent with the requirements applicable to the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program (Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430)) and Section 69506.(D) The student satisfies the eligibility requirements for a Cal Grant award pursuant to either subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 69433.9, except that a student who is exempt from nonresident tuition under Section 68130.5 shall not be required to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 69433.9.(E) The student is exempt from paying nonresident tuition.(F) The student completes and submits a Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) or a California Dream Act application. The FAFSA or California Dream Act application must be submitted or postmarked by no later than March 2.(G) The student makes a timely application or applications for all other federal, state, or institutionally administered grants or fee waivers for which the student is eligible.(H) The student maintains satisfactory academic progress in a manner that is consistent with the requirements applicable to the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 69432.7.(I) The student is pursuing the student’s first undergraduate baccalaureate degree or has completed a baccalaureate degree and has been admitted to, and is enrolled in, a program of professional teacher preparation at an institution approved by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.(J) The student is enrolled at least part time.(4) (A) For each academic year from 2013–14 to 2021–22, inclusive, the percentages specified in paragraph (2) shall be reduced by 0.6-percent increments per one thousand dollars ($1,000) of annual household income in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), to a minimum 10 percent, provided that no scholarship award shall be provided to a student with an annual household income exceeding one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). Beginning with award calculations for the 2016–17 academic year, and for subsequent academic years, the commission shall annually adjust the income levels specified in this subparagraph by the percentage change in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIII  B of the California Constitution and shall adjust the incremental reduction accordingly to ensure that a minimum of 10 percent of mandatory systemwide tuition and fees for an academic year are awarded. This reduction shall be in addition to any reduction required by Section 70023.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for each academic year from 2013–14 to 2021–22, inclusive, for any student who qualifies for a scholarship award of at least one dollar ($1), the minimum annual scholarship amount for full-time enrollment is ninety dollars ($90).(5) (A) For the 2014–15, 2015–16, and 2016–17 academic years, the maximum amount of a student’s scholarship award shall be 35 percent, 50 percent, and 75 percent, respectively, of the total scholarship award amount that the student would otherwise be eligible to receive.(B) Commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, except as provided in subparagraph (D), the maximum amount of a student’s scholarship award shall be determined by the percentage determined pursuant to subparagraph (C) of the total scholarship award amount that the student would otherwise be eligible to receive.(C) The commission shall annually determine the percentage required for purposes of subparagraph (B) by taking the amount appropriated for purposes of this program for the applicable award year, less the amount necessary to fund subparagraph (D), and dividing that by the sum of the projected amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (B), (C), or (D) of paragraph (2) for the applicable award year for all eligible students, except those affected by subparagraph (D).(D) Commencing with the 2023–24 academic year, a current or former foster youth, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 69433.6, shall receive a scholarship award in the full amount determined in subparagraphs (C) or (D) of paragraph (2), as adjusted, if applicable, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).(b) In order for students enrolled in their respective segments to remain eligible to receive a scholarship award under this article, the University of California and the California State University shall not supplant their respective institutional need-based or merit-based grants with the funds provided for scholarships under this article. The University of California and the California State University shall ensure that the amount of institutional student aid provided in each academic year beginning with the 2022–23 academic year is adjusted annually to account for increases in systemwide undergraduate enrollment, as applicable, such that the proportion of institutional student aid relative to systemwide undergraduate enrollment is maintained at a level at least equivalent to the level maintained for undergraduate students during the 2021–22 academic year. The University of California and the California State University shall also ensure that at least 33 percent of the revenues of an increase to existing mandatory systemwide fees charged to undergraduate students is set aside by the regents or the trustees, as applicable, for institutional student aid to assist resident undergraduate students, including those undergraduate students exempt from nonresident tuition pursuant to Sections 68075.5 and 68130.5, and families in meeting the total cost of education.(c) (1) The University of California and the California State University shall report on the implementation of this article as part of the report made pursuant to Section 66021.1. At a minimum, the report shall add the following information, by parental income level or expected family contribution deciles, for the prior academic year:(A) The number and percentage of students receiving an award under this article and the average dollar amount of that award.(B) The number and percentage of students receiving a student loan and the average amount borrowed.(2) The report shall also include the following information by campus for the prior academic year:(A) The cost of attendance for undergraduates in each living arrangement (on campus, off campus, or at home with parents).(B) The number and percentage of undergraduates in each living arrangement (on campus, off campus, or at home with parents).(d) (1) A Middle Class Scholarship Program award authorized pursuant to this article shall be defined as a full-time equivalent grant. An award to a part-time student shall be a fraction of a full-time grant. For each academic year from 2013–14 to 2021–22, inclusive, an award to a part-time student shall be determined by the proportionate amount charged for systemwide tuition and fees. A part-time student shall not be discriminated against in the selection of Middle Class Scholarship Program awards. For purposes of this section, “full-time student” and “part-time student” have the same meaning as specified in subdivision (f) of Section 69432.7.(2) Commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, an award to a student enrolled in six to eight semester units, inclusive, or the equivalent shall be no more than one-half of the award the student would have received had the student enrolled full time. An award to a student enrolled in 9 to 11 semester units, inclusive, or the equivalent shall be no more than three-quarters of the award the student would have received had the student enrolled full time.SEC. 13. Part 46.3 (commencing with Section 74500) is added to Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read:PART 46.3. The Common Cloud Data Platform74500. This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Common Cloud Data Platform.74501. For purposes of this part, both of the following definitions apply:(a) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(b) “Real time” means real-time data or near real-time data.74502. The chancellor’s office shall establish the Common Cloud Data Platform to create a unified, modern data infrastructure to enhance statewide reporting, data sharing, and available analytical tools across participating community college districts and the chancellor’s office. The Common Cloud Data Platform shall be designed to support community college student success initiatives, improve community college districts’ stewardship of resources and ability to use data-driven decisionmaking, and streamline community college administrative processes, in alignment with the vision and priorities adopted by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.74503. The Common Cloud Data Platform shall be designed to enable, but not be limited to, all of the following:(a) Role-appropriate access to real-time data for chancellor’s office staff, community college district staff, faculty, students, and administrators that supports data-driven decisionmaking. This access may include community college district-level and chancellor’s office-level dashboards that enhance the analytics capabilities of community college districts and the chancellor’s office.(b) The integration and centralization of data from various enterprise resource planning and technology systems into a modern, cloud-based system.(c) The facilitation of data from existing and newly developed technology platforms for real-time data insights for the purposes described in Section 74502, which may include student success initiatives or the detection, prevention, and mitigation of fraud.(d) Empowering students, especially those taking courses across multiple community college campuses and multiple community college districts by offering seamless access to appropriate data, for purposes of supporting program completion and transfer pathways to the California State University and University of California systems. To the extent feasible, this support may also include support for associate degree for transfer pathways to independent institutions of higher education that offer associate degree for transfer opportunities.74504. (a) Funding appropriated for the development, implementation, and systemwide adoption of the Common Cloud Data Platform shall support, but not be limited to, all of the following areas of work:(1) The development, integration, and expansion of a Common Cloud Data Platform for all community college districts that supports access and functionality for the purposes described in Section 74502, which may include enrollment management, student support, data access, dashboards, and future data system integrations.(2) The incorporation of advanced analytics tools, real-time dashboards, technology-based student support and retention solutions, and fraud detection and mitigation solutions.(3) Establishing and supporting consistent data quality assurance and governance processes to be used for the data integrated into the Common Cloud Data Platform.(4) Establishing common data quality assurance practices and functionality that streamlines the development and submission of data files and attendance accounting reports to the chancellor’s office.(b) The chancellor’s office may allocate up to 2 percent of the total amount appropriated for purposes of the Common Cloud Data Platform for state administrative operations to carry out the intent of this part.74505. (a) The chancellor’s office shall submit an interim status report on or before March 31, 2027, and a final status report on or before January 31, 2029, to the Department of Finance and the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, detailing the progress of the Common Cloud Data Platform. The reports shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:(1) The Common Cloud Data Platform’s implementation status and milestones achieved.(2) The Common Cloud Data Platform’s underlying impact on student outcomes and systemwide efficiencies.(3) The budget and expenditures of resources appropriated to support the Common Cloud Data Platform.(4) Any challenges encountered, and solutions implemented, during the development of the Common Cloud Data Platform.(b) The reports submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 14. Section 75013 is added to the Education Code, to read:75013. (a) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall develop recommendations for equating enrollment in competency-based education programs to full-time equivalent students for the purposes of generating funding. The chancellor’s office shall convene a workgroup of experts, including experts in competency-based education, state funding models, workforce program funding models, cost-based models, alternate funding models, such as subscription-based models, and enrollment funding, to support the chancellor’s office in developing its recommendations. These recommendations shall apply to competency-based education at community college districts systemwide, including the California Online Community College. The chancellor’s office shall update the Legislative Analyst’s Office and the Department of Finance periodically throughout the workgroup’s process. On or before October 1, 2028, the chancellor’s office shall submit, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, these recommendations to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the Department of Finance. These recommendations shall be used to inform future funding decisions.(b) As part of the Credit for Prior Learning Initiative, the chancellor’s office, in partnership with the Academic Senate of the California Community Colleges, shall make credit for prior learning recommendations for each program offered by the California Online Community College and similar programs offered by other community colleges, including programs that prepare students for industry certifications. The amount of credit for prior learning recommended under this subdivision for each program or industry certification shall be the same systemwide for all community colleges, including the California Online Community College. On or before July 1, 2027, the chancellor’s office shall submit, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, these recommendations to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the Department of Finance. Community colleges are strongly encouraged to award students credit for prior learning consistent with these recommendations.(c) (1) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, the California Online Community College shall submit data to the chancellor's office’s management information system on the same reporting schedule and using the comparable data elements that apply to noncredit programs at other community college districts, with modifications as agreed to by the chancellor’s office to account for competency-based education programs. The data shall be provided separately for each educational program offered by the California Online Community College and in a combined format encompassing all programs offered. Where applicable, the data shall be measured in a manner consistent with any state requirements enacted for the federal Workforce Pell Grant program.(2) The data provided to the chancellor’s office under paragraph (1) shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:(A) Student headcount.(B) The demographics of enrolled students.(C) The number of awards completed, by award type.(D) The median times to program completion, the share of students completing within that time, and the share of students completing within 150 percent of that time, aligned with accreditation standards.(E) To the extent possible, the number of students who complete a program and obtain employment and the job placement rate measured within 180 days after completion of the program.(F) The median earnings of program completers.(G) The change in employment and earnings from before program entry to after program completion.(H) The number and share of students who subsequently enrolled in a credit program at another community college district or other postsecondary educational institution.(3) The chancellor’s office shall publicly display the data specified in paragraph (2). To the extent practicable, the chancellor’s office shall display that data in formats and dashboards consistent with those used for other community college districts, while also incorporating additional measures necessary to accurately reflect the California Online Community College’s competency-based direct assessment and workforce-focused model. Where applicable, the California Online Community College shall be included in statewide aggregate noncredit enrollment and outcomes figures.SEC. 15. Section 76140 of the Education Code, as amended by Section 3 of Chapter 796 of the Statutes of 2023, is amended to read:76140. (a) A community college district may admit, and shall charge a tuition fee to, nonresident students, except that a community college district may exempt from all or parts of the fee any person described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), (6), or (8) and shall exempt from all of the fee any person described in paragraph (4), (5), or (7):(1) All nonresidents who enroll for six or fewer units. Exemptions made pursuant to this paragraph shall not be made on an individual basis.(2) Any nonresident who is both a citizen and resident of a foreign country, if the nonresident has demonstrated a financial need for the exemption. Not more than 10 percent of the nonresident foreign students attending any community college district may be so exempted. Exemptions made pursuant to this paragraph may be made on an individual basis. A nonresident student exempted pursuant to paragraph (8) is not exempted pursuant to this paragraph.(3) (A) A student who, as of August 29, 2005, was enrolled, or admitted with an intention to enroll, in the fall term of the 2005–06 academic year in a regionally accredited institution of higher education in Alabama, Louisiana, or Mississippi, and who could not continue the student’s attendance at that institution as a direct consequence of damage sustained by that institution as a result of Hurricane Katrina.(B) The chancellor shall develop guidelines for the implementation of this paragraph. These guidelines shall include standards for appropriate documentation of student eligibility to the extent feasible.(C) This paragraph shall apply only to the 2005–06 academic year.(4) A special part-time student, other than a person excluded from the term “immigrant,” for purposes of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101), pursuant to paragraph (15) of subsection (a) of Section 1101 of Title 8 of the United States Code, admitted pursuant to Section 76001, 76003, or 76004.(5) A nonresident student who is a United States citizen who resides in a foreign country, if that nonresident meets all of the following requirements:(A) Demonstrates a financial need for the exemption.(B) Has a parent or guardian who has been deported or was permitted to depart voluntarily under the federal Immigration and Nationality Act in accordance with Section 1229c of Title 8 of the United States Code. The student shall provide documents from the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services evidencing the deportation or voluntary departure of the student’s parent or guardian.(C) Moved abroad as a result of the deportation or voluntary departure specified in subparagraph (B).(D) Lived in California immediately before moving abroad. The student shall provide information and evidence that demonstrates the student previously lived in California.(E) Attended a public or private secondary school, as described in Sections 52 and 53, in the state for three or more years. The student shall provide documents that demonstrate the student’s secondary school attendance.(F) Upon enrollment, the student will be in the student’s first academic year as a matriculated student in California public higher education, as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 66010, will be living in California, and will file an affidavit with the institution stating that the student intends to establish residency in California as soon as possible.(6) (A) A student who attends Lake Tahoe Community College and who has residence, pursuant to subparagraph (B), in one of the following communities in Nevada:(i) Incline Village.(ii) Kingsbury.(iii) Round Hill.(iv) Skyland.(v) Stateline.(vi) Zephyr Cove.(B) Residence shall be determined pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 68060) of Chapter 1 of Part 41 of Division 5. A person shall have residence in one of the communities listed in subparagraph (A) if the person has lived in the community for more than one year immediately before seeking the fee exemption pursuant to this paragraph.(C) The governing board of the Lake Tahoe Community College District shall adopt rules and regulations for determining a student’s residence classification and for establishing procedures for an appeal and review of the residence classification. No more than 200 students shall be exempted from payment of a nonresident tuition fee under this paragraph in any academic year.(7) (A) A nonresident student who enrolls in a credit English as a second language (ESL) course at a California Community College and who is any of the following:(i) A recent immigrant, as defined in Section 1101(a)(15) of Title 8 of the United States Code.(ii) A recent refugee, as defined in Section 1101(a)(42) of Title 8 of the United States Code.(iii) A person who has been granted asylum by the United States, as defined in Section 1158 of Title 8 of the United States Code.(B) This exemption shall apply only to individuals who, upon entering the United States, settled in California and who have resided in California for less than one year.(C) This exemption shall apply only to the tuition fee for credit ESL courses.(8) (A) A student who meets all of the following criteria:(i) Is a nonresident, low-income student who is a resident of Mexico.(ii) Registers for lower division courses at Cuyamaca College, Grossmont College, Imperial Valley College, MiraCosta College, Palomar College, San Diego City College, San Diego Mesa College, San Diego Miramar College, or Southwestern College.(iii) Has residence within 45 miles of the California-Mexico border for at least one year immediately before seeking the fee exemption pursuant to this paragraph.(B) (i) The governing boards of the community colleges described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) that choose to use the exemption pursuant to this paragraph shall adopt one uniform policy that accomplishes all of the following:(I) Determines a student’s residence classification.(II) Establishes procedures for an appeal and review of the residence classification.(III) Determines whether a student is low income.(ii) As a condition of its students receiving an exemption pursuant to this paragraph, the governing boards of the community colleges described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) that choose to use the exemption pursuant to this paragraph shall collaborate with each other to ensure the adoption of the uniform policy pursuant to clause (i).(C)No more than 150 full-time equivalent students (FTES) at each community college described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) shall be exempted from payment of a nonresident tuition fee under this paragraph in any academic year.(C) (i) No more than 1,350 full-time equivalent students (FTES) in total across all community colleges described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) shall be exempted from payment of a nonresident tuition fee under this paragraph in an academic year.(ii) On or before December 31, 2026, the governing boards of the community colleges described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) that elect to use the exemption pursuant to this paragraph shall develop a plan to jointly administer and allocate the total number of FTES authorized under clause (i) pursuant to the uniform policy required by subparagraph (B), including how to address if the colleges collectively exceed the cap established in clause (i).(iii) The allocation of FTES pursuant to this subparagraph shall not exceed the aggregate total authorized in clause (i).(iv) A student granted an exemption under this paragraph and enrolled for an academic year shall retain that exemption for the remainder of that academic year, notwithstanding that the aggregate FTES generated under this paragraph subsequently reaches or exceeds the limit established in clause (i).(D) On or before January 1, 2028, the governing boards of the community colleges described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) that choose to use the exemption pursuant to this paragraph shall jointly submit a report to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code that includes, but is not limited to, the demographics, attendance rate, and class completion rate of students receiving an exemption pursuant to this paragraph.(b) A community college district may contract with a state, a county contiguous to California, the federal government, or a foreign country, or an agency thereof, for payment of all or a part of a nonresident student’s tuition fee.(c) Nonresident students shall not be reported as FTES for state apportionment purposes, except as provided by subdivision (j) or another statute, in which case a nonresident tuition fee shall not be charged.(d) The nonresident tuition fee shall be set by the governing board of each community college district not later than March 1 of each year for the succeeding fiscal year. The governing board of each community college district shall provide nonresident students with notice of nonresident tuition fee changes during the spring term before the fall term in which the change will take effect. Nonresident tuition fee increases shall be gradual, moderate, and predictable. The fee may be paid in installments, as determined by the governing board of the district.(e) (1) The fee established by the governing board of a community college district pursuant to subdivision (d) shall represent for nonresident students enrolled in 30 semester units or 45 quarter units of credit per fiscal year one or more of the following:(A) The amount that was expended by the community college district for the expense of education as defined by the California Community Colleges Budget and Accounting Manual in the preceding fiscal year increased by the projected percent increase in the United States Consumer Price Index as determined by the Department of Finance for the current fiscal year and succeeding fiscal year and divided by the FTES (including nonresident students) attending in the community college district in the preceding fiscal year. However, if for the community college district’s preceding fiscal year FTES of all students attending in the community college district in noncredit courses is equal to, or greater than, 10 percent of the community college district’s total FTES attending in the community college district, the community college district may substitute the data for expense of education in grades 13 and 14 and FTES in grades 13 and 14 attending in the community college district.(B) The expense of education in the preceding fiscal year of all community college districts increased by the projected percent increase in the United States Consumer Price Index as determined by the Department of Finance for the fiscal year and succeeding fiscal year and divided by the FTES (including nonresident students) attending all community college districts during the preceding fiscal year. However, if the amount calculated under this paragraph for the succeeding fiscal year is less than the amount established for the current fiscal year or for any of the past four fiscal years, the community college district may set the nonresident tuition fee at the greater of the current or any of the past four-year amounts.(C) An amount not to exceed the fee established by the governing board of any contiguous community college district.(D) An amount not to exceed the amount that was expended by the community college district for the expense of education, but in no case less than the statewide average as set forth in subparagraph (B).(E) An amount no greater than the average of the nonresident tuition fees of public community colleges of no less than 12 states that are comparable to California in cost of living. The determination of comparable states shall be based on a composite cost-of-living index as determined by the United States Department of Labor or a cooperating government agency.(2) The additional revenue generated by the increased nonresident tuition permitted under the amendments made to this subdivision during the 2009–10 Regular Session shall be used to expand and enhance services to resident students. The admission of nonresident students shall not come at the expense of resident enrollment.(f) The governing board of each community college district also shall adopt a tuition fee per unit of credit for nonresident students enrolled in more or less than 15 units of credit per term by dividing the fee determined in subdivision (e) by 30 for colleges operating on the semester system and 45 for colleges operating on the quarter system and rounding to the nearest whole dollar. The same rate shall be uniformly charged to nonresident students attending any terms or sessions maintained by the community college. The rate charged shall be the rate established for the fiscal year in which the term or session ends.(g) Any loss in community college district revenue generated by the nonresident tuition fee shall not be offset by additional state funding.(h) Any community college district that has fewer than 1,500 FTES and whose boundary is within 10 miles of another state that either (1) has a reciprocity agreement with California governing student attendance and fees, or (2) participates in the Western Undergraduate Exchange, may exempt students from that state, or may exempt students from those states that participate in the Western Undergraduate Exchange, from the mandatory fee requirement described in subdivision (a) for nonresident students.(i) Any community college district that has more than 1,500, but fewer than 3,001, FTES and whose boundary is within 10 miles of another state that either (1) has a reciprocity agreement with California governing student attendance and fees, or (2) participates in the Western Undergraduate Exchange, may, in any one fiscal year, exempt up to 100 FTES from that state or from states that participate in the Western Undergraduate Exchange from the mandatory fee requirement described in subdivision (a) for nonresident students.(j) The attendance of nonresident students who are exempted pursuant to subdivision (h) or (i), or pursuant to paragraph (3), (4), (5), (6), or (8) of subdivision (a), from the mandatory fee requirement described in subdivision (a) for nonresident students may be reported as resident FTES for state apportionment purposes. Any nonresident student reported as resident FTES for state apportionment purposes who is exempt pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a), or pursuant to subdivision (h) or (i), shall pay a per-unit fee that is one and one-half times the amount of the fee established for residents pursuant to Section 76300. That fee shall be included in the FTES adjustments described in Section 76300 for purposes of computing apportionments.(k) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2028, and, as of January 1, 2029, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2029, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.SEC. 16. Article 9 (commencing with Section 78093) is added to Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read: Article 9. Credit for Prior Learning Initiative78093. This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Credit for Prior Learning Initiative.78093.1. For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(a) “Campus” means a campus of the California Community Colleges.(b) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(c) “Credit for prior learning” means college credit awarded for validated skills and competencies gained through experiences inside or outside of traditional academic settings, including, but not limited to, any of the following:(1) Military training and service.(2) Industry-recognized credentials, certifications, and licenses.(3) Registered and nontraditional apprenticeships.(4) Workplace learning, internships, and employment experience.(d) “Credit recommendation” means a formal assessment of prior learning that recommends specific college-level course credits, general education area credits, or elective credits developed through evaluation by recognized entities, including the American Council on Education, California Community Colleges faculty discipline review groups, or local discipline faculty experts, and documented in detailed exhibits for faculty credit evaluation.(e) “Independent institution of higher education” has the same meaning as defined in Section 66010.(f) “Validated” means a formal determination by California Community Colleges faculty discipline review groups of all of the following:(1) The skills and competencies gained through prior learning experiences are equivalent to California Community Colleges student learning outcomes or objectives gained through one or more college courses.(2) The prior learning has been assessed using faculty discipline-approved methods and approved through established curricular processes and procedures.78093.2. (a) Building upon the California Mapping Articulated Pathways Initiative, the chancellor’s office shall support the Credit for Prior Learning Initiative as a systemwide initiative to award credit for prior learning opportunities at each campus. The Credit for Prior Learning Initiative shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1) Implementation and maintenance of a systemwide process to identify students who may qualify for credit for prior learning. This process shall include all of the following:(A) (i) The collection and analysis of documents and information during the college exploration and admissions process about relevant prior learning experiences to inform potential students of program, college, and career opportunities and the potential to receive credit for prior learning.(ii) The documents and information referenced in clause (i) may include industry certifications, military service, workplace training, and other sources of prior learning, including, but not limited to, Joint Services Transcripts for military learners, industry certifications and licenses for working learners and apprentices, standardized examination scores, high school articulated coursework, and portfolios.(B) Early notification to students about credit for prior learning opportunities that is consistent with their educational goals.(C) A system to refer students identified pursuant to this paragraph to appropriate college personnel for a credit for prior learning assessment.(2) A statewide technology infrastructure developed and maintained to make credit for prior learning opportunities visible and accessible to the public.(3) Support for California Community Colleges faculty discipline review groups to develop credit recommendations for awarding credit for prior learning that campuses may adopt systemwide.(4) Support for partnerships with workforce agencies, industry organizations, and educational institutions to expand credit for prior learning opportunities consistent with this article.(5) Enable, document, and validate skills and competencies earned through educational, workplace, military, and other experiences of prior learning.(b) Each campus shall comply with both of the following:(1) Before or upon completion of the education plans pursuant to Section 78212, evaluate prior learning documents and credentials of all incoming students for the assessment and award of credit for prior learning. Prior learning documents and credentials include, but are not limited to, Joint Services Transcripts for veterans, reservists, and active duty members of the Armed Forces of the United States, industry-recognized credentials of working learners and apprentices, portfolios for self-directed and experiential learners, and standardized assessments, including, but not limited to, advanced placement, international baccalaureate, and College-Level Examination Program assessments.(2) Accept transcribed credit for prior learning from other campuses as credit, including for general education, transfer, and major preparation.(c) (1) The California Community Colleges system, in partnership with the Academic Senate for California Community Colleges, shall collaborate with the Academic Senate of the California State University and other systemwide leadership of the California State University, and is encouraged to collaborate with the Academic Senate of the University of California and other systemwide leadership of the University of California to accomplish all of the following:(A) Ensure that all campus-transcribed credit for prior learning is accepted as transfer credit, including for general education and major preparation.(B) Participate in intersegmental alignment of credit for prior learning policies.(C) Include credit for prior learning opportunities in published transfer pathways and, to the extent feasible, associate degree for transfer programs.(2) To the extent that resources are available, the California Community Colleges system may collaborate with available and interested independent institutions of higher education.(d) (1) Upon appropriation by the Legislature for purposes of this article, the chancellor’s office shall allocate designated funds to support implementation of this article at each campus using all of the following goals:(A) Increasing access to credit for prior learning opportunities equitably for all eligible students.(B) Increasing completion through credit for prior learning awards.(C) Advancing career attainment through credit for prior learning.(D) Supporting credit for prior learning opportunities through the chancellor’s office’s pilot projects, such as the California Mapping Articulated Pathways Initiative.(2) Each campus shall demonstrate that it has implemented the credit for prior learning initiative established pursuant to this article through the metrics described in paragraph (1) before receiving an allocation of funding for purposes of implementing this article.SEC. 17. Section 78261 of the Education Code is amended to read:78261. (a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:(1) The Legislature intends to facilitate both the expansion of associate degree nursing programs and the improvement in completion rates in those programs.(2) The Legislature also intends that community colleges employ nationally recognized diagnostic assessment tools that are aligned with national nursing licensure requirements. Both students and the state benefit when diagnostic assessments are supplemented with educational opportunities to assist students in meeting skill levels.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to create a Nursing Enrollment Growth and Retention program in the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges. The purpose of this program shall be to provide grants to community college associate degree of nursing programs that meet either of the following conditions:(1) The nursing program has low or moderate program attrition levels.(2) The nursing program provides a comprehensive program of diagnostic assessment, prenursing preparation, and program-based support to students.(c) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that this program shall be funded, beginning in the 2006–07 fiscal year, by a redirection of the ten million dollars ($10,000,000) provided annually pursuant to the Budget Act of 2005, along with an additional investment of two million eight hundred eighty-six thousand dollars ($2,886,000) annually, for a total program budget of twelve million eight hundred eighty-six thousand dollars ($12,886,000) annually. Unencumbered funds that were appropriated in the Budget Act of 2005 may be used for capacity building and equipment in the 2006–07 fiscal year.(2) Up to 3 percent of the funds appropriated for this program may be used for statewide administration, program development, program evaluation, and program accountability. As used in this paragraph, “program development” includes, but is not limited to, activities related to partnerships or collaborations between community colleges and institutions of higher education offering baccalaureate degrees in order to increase the number of students completing bachelor of the science of nursing (BSN), master of the science of nursing (MSN), and master’s entry programs in nursing (MEPN) courses of study.(d) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges may award grants to community college districts with associate degree nursing programs to expand enrollment, reduce program attrition, or both. Funds shall be used only for purposes of expanding enrollment, providing diagnostic assessments, and offering preentry coursework to prospective nursing students and diagnostic assessments and supportive services to enrolled nursing students. For purposes of this section, supportive services include, but are not limited to, tutoring, case management, mentoring, and counseling services. Funds may also be used to develop alternative delivery models such as part-time, evening, weekend, and summer program offerings. In order to qualify for these funds, a community college associate degree nursing program shall do either of the following:(1) Have a program attrition rate, as determined by the Board of Registered Nursing’s Annual School Report or the Information Program Data System of the chancellor’s office, of 15 percent or less for the year before application applying for funding.(2) Commit to implement a comprehensive program of diagnostic assessment, prenursing enrollment preparation, and program-based support to enrolled students, as defined in this article.(e) Notwithstanding Section 78213 or any other law, before awarding any funds to be used for reducing program attrition, the chancellor’s office shall do all of the following:(1) Identify, in collaboration with community college associate degree nursing programs, nationally recognized diagnostic assessment tools that determine the likelihood of academic success in community college registered nursing education programs.(2) Establish, in collaboration with community college associate degree nursing programs, the systemwide proficiency level necessary for academic success for each diagnostic assessment tool.(3) Define the kinds of educational and support services that qualify for funding under this program.(f) As a condition of receiving grants under paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), a community college district shall, at a minimum, do all of the following:(1) Use diagnostic assessment tools before enrollment to determine readiness for community college associate degree nursing programs.(2) Offer, or identify, educational preentry coursework, including, but not limited to, tutorials, instructional resources, or noncredit instruction, aligned to the entry level nursing standards and curriculum for students who fail to demonstrate readiness based upon the diagnostic assessment tools.(3) Provide access to prenursing coursework for all students who do not demonstrate readiness based upon the diagnostic assessment tools.(4) Require that students demonstrate readiness through the diagnostic assessment or successful completion of the prenursing coursework specified above before commencing the registered nursing program.(5) Ensure that students that participate in educational preentry coursework in order to demonstrate readiness based upon the diagnostic assessment tools are not disadvantaged in the program enrollment process.(g) As a condition of receiving grant funds pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), each recipient community college district shall report to the chancellor’s office the following data for the academic year on or before a date determined by the chancellor’s office:(1) The number of students enrolled in the nursing program.(2) The number of students taking diagnostic assessments.(3) The number of students failing to meet proficiency levels as determined by diagnostic assessment tools.(4) The number of students failing to meet proficiency levels that undertake preentry preparation classes.(5) The number of students who successfully complete preentry preparation coursework.(6) The average number of months between initial diagnostic assessment, demonstration of readiness, and enrollment in the nursing program for students failing to meet proficiency standards on the initial diagnostic assessment.(7) The average number of months between diagnostic assessment and program enrollment for students meeting proficiency standards on the initial diagnostic assessment.(8) The number of students who completed the associate degree nursing program and the number of students who pass the National Council Licensure Examination (NCLEX).(h) (1) Data reported to the chancellor under this article shall be disaggregated by age, gender, ethnicity, and language spoken at home.(2) The chancellor’s office shall compile and provide this information to the Legislature and the Governor by July 1 of each year, except as provided in as described in paragraph (3).(3) Beginning in the 2025–26 2026–27 fiscal year, the chancellor’s office shall submit the report described in paragraph (2) biennially, triennially, on or before March 1, to the Legislature and the Governor, December 31, and may submit this report with the report required by subdivision (a) of Section 88826.5.(i) It is the intent of the Legislature that, pursuant to funding to be provided in the annual Budget Act, in the 2009–10 academic year, the California Community Colleges should increase the statewide enrollment of full-time equivalent registered nursing students by 450 and, beginning in the 2010–11 academic year and continuing each academic year thereafter, add 900 new full-time equivalent registered nursing students.SEC. 18. Section 78261.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:78261.5. (a) A community college registered nursing program that determines that the number of applicants to that program exceeds its capacity may admit students in accordance with any of the following procedures:(1) Administration of a multicriteria screening process, as authorized by Section 78261.3, in a manner that is consistent with the standards set forth in subdivision (b).(2) A random selection process.(3) A blended combination of random selection and a multicriteria screening process.(b) A community college registered nursing program that elects, on or after January 1, 2008, to use a multicriteria screening process to evaluate applicants pursuant to this article shall apply those measures in accordance with all of the following:(1) The criteria applied in a multicriteria screening process under this article shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:(A) Academic degrees or diplomas, or relevant certificates, held by an applicant.(B) Grade-point average in relevant coursework.(C) Any relevant work or volunteer experience.(D) Life experiences or special circumstances of an applicant, including, but not limited to, the following experiences or circumstances:(i) Disabilities.(ii) Low family income.(iii) First generation of family to attend college.(iv) Need to work.(v) Disadvantaged social or educational environment.(vi) Difficult personal and family situations or circumstances.(vii) Refugee or veteran status.(viii) Living in a medically underserved area or population, as designated by the federal Health Resources and Services Administration.(E) Proficiency or advanced level coursework in languages other than English. Credit for languages other than English shall be received for languages that are identified by the chancellor as high-frequency languages, as based on census data. These languages may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:(i) American Sign Language.(ii) Arabic.(iii) Chinese, including its various dialects.(iv) Farsi.(v) Russian.(vi) Spanish.(vii) Tagalog.(viii) The various languages of the Indian subcontinent and Southeast Asia.(ix) The various languages of the African continent.(2) Additional criteria, such as a personal interview, a personal statement, letter of recommendation, or the number of repetitions of prerequisite classes, or other criteria, as approved by the chancellor, may be used, but are not required.(3) A community college registered nursing program using a multicriteria screening process under this article may use an approved diagnostic assessment tool, in accordance with Section 78261.3, before, during, or after the multicriteria screening process.(4) As used in this section:(A) “Disabilities” has the same meaning as used in Section 2626 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.(B) “Disadvantaged social or educational environment” includes, but is not limited to, the status of a student who has participated in Extended Opportunity Programs and Services (EOPS).(C) “Grade-point average” refers to the same fixed set of required prerequisite courses that all applicants to the nursing program administering the multicriteria screening process are required to complete.(D) “Low family income” shall be measured by a community college registered nursing program in terms of a student’s eligibility for, or receipt of, financial aid under a program that may include, but is not limited to, a fee waiver from the board of governors under Section 76300, the Cal Grant Program under Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42 of Division 5, the federal Pell Grant program, or CalWORKs.(E) “Need to work” means that the student is working at least part time while completing academic work that is a prerequisite for admission to the nursing program.(5) A community college registered nursing program that uses a multicriteria screening process pursuant to this article shall report its nursing program admissions policies to the chancellor annually, in writing. The admissions policies reported under this paragraph shall include the weight given to any criteria used by the program, and shall include demographic information relating to the persons admitted to the program and the persons of that group who successfully completed that program.(c) The chancellor is encouraged to develop, and make available to community college registered nursing programs by July 1, 2008, a model admissions process based on this section.(d) (1) The chancellor shall submit a report on or before March 1, 2015, December 31, 2026, and on or before each March 1 December 31 triennially thereafter, to the Legislature and the Governor that examines and includes, but is not necessarily limited to, both of the following:(A) The participation, retention, and completion rates in community college registered nursing programs of students admitted through a multicriteria screening process, as described in this section, disaggregated by the age, gender, ethnicity, and and, if available, the language spoken at the home of those students.(B) Information on the annual impact, if any, the Seymour-Campbell Student Success Act of 2012 had on the matriculation services for students admitted through the multicriteria screening process, as described in this section.(2) The chancellor shall submit the annual triennial report required in paragraph (1) in conjunction with its annual triennial report on associate degree nursing programs required by subdivision (h) of Section 78261.(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends that date.SEC. 19. Section 78263.1 of the Education Code is amended to read:78263.1. (a) A community college allied health program that determines that the number of applicants to that program exceeds its capacity may admit students in accordance with any of the following procedures:(1) Administration of a multicriteria screening process, if authorized by Section 78263.2, in a manner that is consistent with the standards set forth in subdivision (b).(2) A random selection process.(3) A blended combination of random selection and a multicriteria screening process.(b) A community college allied health program that elects to use a multicriteria screening process, including a blended combination of random selection and a multicriteria screening process, to evaluate applicants pursuant to this article shall apply those measures in accordance with all of the following:(1) The criteria applied in a multicriteria screening process under this article shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following criteria:(A) Academic degrees or diplomas, or relevant certificates, held by an applicant.(B) Grade point average in relevant coursework.(C) Any relevant work or volunteer experience.(D) Life experiences or special circumstances of an applicant, including, but not limited to, any, or any combination of, the following experiences or circumstances:(i) Disabilities.(ii) Low family income.(iii) First generation of family to attend college.(iv) Need to work.(v) Disadvantaged social or educational environment.(vi) Difficult personal and family situations or circumstances.(vii) Refugee or veteran status.(viii) Living in a medically underserved area or population, as designated by the federal Health Resources and Services Administration.(E) Proficiency or advanced level coursework in languages other than English. Credit for languages other than English shall be received for languages that are identified by the chancellor as high-frequency languages, as based on census data. These languages may include, but are not limited to, any of the following languages:(i) American Sign Language.(ii) Arabic.(iii) Chinese, including its various dialects.(iv) Farsi.(v) Russian.(vi) Spanish.(vii) Tagalog.(viii) The various languages of the Indian subcontinent and Southeast Asia.(ix) The various languages of the African continent.(2) Additional criteria, such as a personal interview, a personal statement, letter of recommendation, or the number of repetitions of prerequisite classes, or other criteria, as approved by the chancellor, may be used, but are not required.(3) A community college allied health program using a multicriteria screening process under this article may use an approved diagnostic assessment tool, in accordance with Section 78263.2, before, during, or after the multicriteria screening process.(c) A community college allied health program that uses a multicriteria screening process pursuant to this article shall report its allied health program admissions policies to the chancellor annually, in writing. The admissions policies reported under this subdivision shall include the weight given to any criteria used by the program, and shall include demographic information relating to both the persons admitted to the program and the persons of that group who successfully completed that program.(d) The chancellor is encouraged to develop and make available to community college allied health programs by July 1, 2025, a model admissions process based on this section.(e) (1) The chancellor shall submit a report on or before March 1, December 31, 2026, and each March 1 on or before December 31 triennially thereafter, to the Legislature and the Governor that examines and includes, but is not limited to, both of the following:(A) The participation, retention, and completion rates in community college allied health programs of students admitted through a multicriteria screening process, as described in this section, disaggregated by the age, gender, ethnicity, and and, if available, the language spoken at the home of those students.(B) Information on the annual impact, if any, the Seymour-Campbell Student Success Act of 2012, established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 78210), had on the matriculation services for students admitted through the multicriteria screening process, as described in this section.(2) The chancellor may incorporate the annual triennial report required in paragraph (1) into the annual triennial report required by subdivision (d) of Section 78261.5.(3) The chancellor shall submit the annual triennial report required in paragraph (1) in conjunction with its annual triennial report required by subdivision (h) of Section 78261.(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Disabilities” has the same meaning as used in Section 2626 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.(2) “Disadvantaged social or educational environment” includes, but is not necessarily limited to, the status of a student who has participated in Extended Opportunity Programs and Services.(3) “Grade point average” refers to the same fixed set of required prerequisite courses that all applicants to the allied health program administering the multicriteria screening process are required to complete.(4) “Low family income” shall be measured by a community college allied health program in terms of a student’s eligibility for, or receipt of, financial aid under a program that may include, but is not necessarily limited to, a fee waiver from the board of governors under Section 76300, the Cal Grant Program under Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42 of Division 5, the federal Pell Grant program, or CalWORKs.(5) “Need to work” means that the student is working at least part time while completing academic work that is a prerequisite for admission to the allied health program.SEC. 20. Section 84321.65 of the Education Code is amended to read:84321.65. (a) Notwithstanding any other law that governs the regulations adopted by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to disburse funds, the payment of apportionments to community college districts pursuant to Section 84320 shall be adjusted, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, as follows:(1) For the month of June, three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) shall be deferred to July.(2) For the month of May, one hundred eight million three hundred sixty-three thousand dollars ($108,363,000) shall be deferred to July.(b) The sum of four hundred eight million three hundred sixty-three thousand dollars ($408,363,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for apportionments to community college districts, for expenditure in the 2026–27 fiscal year to be expended in accordance with the applicable schedules of Item 6870-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025.(c) (1) The chancellor may adjust the monthly schedule described in subdivision (a) for the 2025–26 fiscal year to increase the amount deferred in the months of May and June if it ensures a shorter time between a deferred payment and repayment.(2) If adjusting the monthly schedule, the chancellor shall not exceed the total amount of deferred payments described in subdivision (a).(d) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (b) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202, for the 2026–27 2024–25 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2026–27 2024–25 fiscal year.SEC. 21. Section 84750.4 of the Education Code is amended to read:84750.4. (a) (1) The board of governors, in accordance with this section, and in consultation with institutional representatives of the California Community Colleges and statewide faculty and staff organizations, so as to ensure their participation in the development and review of policy proposals, shall develop criteria and standards for the purpose of making the annual budget request for the California Community Colleges to the Governor and the Legislature, and for the purpose of allocating the state general apportionment revenues.(2) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to adopt a formula for general purpose apportionments that encourages access for underrepresented students, provides additional funding in recognition of the need to provide additional support for low-income students, rewards colleges’ progress on improving student success metrics, and improves overall equity and predictability so that community college districts may more readily plan and implement instruction and programs.(3) It is the intent of the Legislature to determine the amounts appropriated for purposes of this section through the annual Budget Act. This section shall not be construed as limiting the authority of either the Governor to propose, or the Legislature to approve, appropriations for the California Community Colleges programs or purposes.(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that for the 2020–21 fiscal year, 70 percent of funding for the Student Centered Funding Formula is for the base allocation provided to districts, 20 percent is for the supplemental allocation provided to districts, and 10 percent is for student success allocation provided to districts.(b) (1) Commencing with the 2018–19 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, the chancellor’s office shall annually calculate a base allocation, a supplemental allocation, and a student success allocation for each community college district in the state pursuant to this section. This calculation applies only to the allocation of credit revenue. Noncredit instruction, and instruction in career development and college preparation full-time equivalent students (FTES) shall be funded pursuant to the requirements of paragraphs (3) and (4), respectively, of subdivision (d) of Section 84750.5, as that section read on January 1, 2018.(2) (A) As used in this paragraph, a public safety agency includes, but is not necessarily limited to, a fire department, a police department, a sheriff’s office, a public agency employing paramedics or emergency medical technicians, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.(B) Commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, each community college district with an instructional service agreement with a public safety agency may annually submit a copy of its most up-to-date instructional service agreement to the chancellor’s office for review. If an agreement is renewed or updated it may be submitted to the chancellor’s office at the time it is renewed or updated.(C) Beginning January 1, 2024, each community college district with an instructional service agreement with a public safety agency may annually submit data to the chancellor’s office on course offerings, student enrollment and FTES, and course completion, including data from the 2020–21, 2021–22, and 2022–23 academic years.(D) On or before December 31, 2024, upon review and analysis of the community college district agreements and program data submitted pursuant to subparagraphs (B) and (C), the chancellor’s office shall issue a recommendation to the Department of Finance and the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the instructional service agreement FTES apportionment that community college districts are eligible to claim.(3) For purposes of this section, unless otherwise specified in the annual Budget Act, the cost-of-living adjustment shall be the percentage change in the annual average value of the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services for the United States, as published by the United States Department of Commerce for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the prior fiscal year.(c) For purposes of computing the base allocation, the marginal funding rate for credit revenue per FTES shall be as follows:(1) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, three thousand seven hundred twenty-seven dollars ($3,727).(2) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, four thousand nine dollars ($4,009).(3) Commencing with the 2020–21 fiscal year, the rate specified in paragraph (2) adjusted for changes in the cost-of-living adjustment and other base adjustments in subsequent annual budget acts.(d) (1) The base allocation shall be computed for each community college district as follows:(A) Each community college district shall receive a basic allocation based on the number of colleges and comprehensive centers in the community college district that is consistent with the basic allocation formula established by the board of governors pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 84750.5 as of the 2015–16 fiscal year.(B) Unless otherwise specified in subparagraph (C), each community college district shall receive an allocation based on credit base revenues associated with funded FTES as computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) at the rate pursuant to subdivision (c).(C) Notwithstanding the rate in subdivision (c), for community college districts that had higher rates used to calculate their 2017–18 general purpose apportionments, the following rates shall be used to calculate their base allocations:(i) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, as follows:(I) For Foothill-De Anza Community College District, the rate shall be no less than three thousand seven hundred forty-five dollars ($3,745).(II) For Lake Tahoe Community College District, the rate shall be no less than three thousand eight hundred eighteen dollars ($3,818).(III) For Lassen Community College District, the rate shall be no less than three thousand seven hundred ninety-four dollars ($3,794).(IV) For Marin Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand two hundred sixty-one dollars ($4,261).(V) For MiraCosta Community College District, the rate shall be no less than three thousand seven hundred thirty-four dollars ($3,734).(VI) For San Francisco Community College District, the rate shall be no less than three thousand seven hundred fifty-six dollars ($3,756).(VII) For San Jose-Evergreen Community College District, the rate shall be no less than three thousand seven hundred forty-four dollars ($3,744).(VIII) For Santa Monica Community College District, the rate shall be no less than three thousand seven hundred seventy-six dollars ($3,776).(IX) For South Orange Community College District, the rate shall be no less than three thousand eight hundred twenty-six dollars ($3,826).(X) For West Kern Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand nine hundred thirty-four dollars ($4,934).(ii) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, as follows:(I) For Foothill-De Anza Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand twenty-eight dollars ($4,028).(II) For Lake Tahoe Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand one hundred seven dollars ($4,107).(III) For Lassen Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand eighty-one dollars ($4,081).(IV) For Marin Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand five hundred eighty-three dollars ($4,583).(V) For MiraCosta Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand sixteen dollars ($4,016).(VI) For San Francisco Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand forty dollars ($4,040).(VII) For San Jose-Evergreen Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand twenty-seven dollars ($4,027).(VIII) For Santa Monica Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand sixty-two dollars ($4,062).(IX) For South Orange Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand one hundred fifteen dollars ($4,115).(X) For West Kern Community College District, the rate shall be no less than five thousand three hundred seven dollars ($5,307).(iii) Commencing with the 2020–21 fiscal year, the rates specified in clause (ii) adjusted for changes in the cost-of-living adjustment and other base adjustments in subsequent annual budget acts.(2) To calculate the base allocation for each community college district, the chancellor’s office shall calculate the three-year rolling average comprised of funded FTES from the current year, the prior year, and the year before the prior year, as follows:(A) Commencing with the 2018–19 fiscal year, the chancellor’s office shall compute the sum of annually funded credit FTES from the current year, the prior year, and the year before the prior year, and divide the sum by three.(B) (i) In computing the three-year average pursuant to subparagraph (A), credit FTES associated with enrollment growth proposed in the annual Budget Act shall be excluded from the three-year average and shall instead be added to the computed three-year rolling average.(ii) In computing the three-year average pursuant to subparagraph (A), credit FTES generated by students who meet the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 84810.5 and special admit students pursuant to Sections 76002, 76003, and 76004 shall be excluded.(C) The sum of a community college district’s computed three-year FTES rolling average and current year funded FTES growth shall be multiplied by a community college district’s applicable base allocation funding rate pursuant to subdivision (c), or subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1), as applicable, to compute a community college district’s base allocation.(D) Community college districts are entitled to the restoration of any reductions in their base allocation due to decreases in FTES during the three years following the initial year of decrease if there is a subsequent increase in FTES.(E) For the calculation of the three-year rolling average for the base allocation for the 2020–21 fiscal year, the sum of funded credit FTES for the 2019–20 fiscal year, as adjusted for shifts in summer enrollment between fiscal years, may be used in place of funded credit FTES for the 2020–21 fiscal year.(F) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for purposes of calculating the base allocation pursuant to this subdivision for the 2026–27 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, a community college district’s funded credit FTES shall be the greater of the following:(i) The three-year rolling average of funded credit FTES calculated pursuant to subparagraph (A).(ii) The community college district’s current year credit FTES that are eligible for funding pursuant to this section.(3) In addition to the amounts computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), each community college district shall receive an allocation based on credit base revenues associated with funded FTES generated by students who meet the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 84810.5 and special admit students pursuant to Sections 76002, 76003, and 76004. FTES generated by students who meet the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 84810.5 and special admit students pursuant to Sections 76002, 76003, and 76004 shall be multiplied by a community college district’s applicable credit revenue rate computed for the 2017–18 fiscal year pursuant to Section 84750.5, as that section read on January 1, 2018, as adjusted for 2018–19 fiscal year cost-of-living adjustment and other base adjustments, and adjusted for the changes in the cost-of-living and other base adjustments in subsequent annual budget acts.(4) The chancellor shall allocate any funding appropriated in the Budget Act for enrollment growth to support the following:(A) First, for the stated percentage of enrollment growth in the Budget Act and consistent with the growth formula used by the board of governors in the 2015–16 fiscal year.(B) Second, for the amount of uncapped growth attributable to increases in the amount of a community college district’s supplemental allocation.(C) Third, for the amount of uncapped growth attributable to increases in the amount of a community college district’s student success allocation.(e) Commencing with the 2018–19 fiscal year, a supplemental allocation shall be computed for each community college district based on the total points calculated for each community college district in accordance with all of the following:(1) The marginal funding rate per point for computing a supplemental allocation shall be as follows:(A) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, nine hundred nineteen dollars ($919).(B) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, nine hundred forty-eight dollars ($948).(C) (i) Commencing with the 2020–21 fiscal year, the rate specified in subparagraph (B) adjusted for changes in the cost-of-living adjustment and other base adjustments in subsequent annual budget acts.(ii) For the calculation of the supplemental allocation for the 2020–21 fiscal year, data from the 2018–19 fiscal year, for purposes of paragraphs (2), (3), and (4), may be used in place of data from the 2019–20 fiscal year.(2) Each community college district shall be granted one point for each student who is a recipient of financial aid under the Federal Pell Grant program (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070a) based on headcount data of students in the prior year.(3) Each community college district shall be granted one point for each student who is granted an exemption from nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68130.5, based on headcount data of students in the prior year.(4) Each community college district shall be granted one point for each student who receives a fee waiver pursuant to Section 76300, based on headcount data of students in the prior year.(5) For the purpose of calculating the supplemental allocation, the number of students shall be defined as the number of students served by the community college district.(6) It is the intent of the Legislature that the annual Budget Act fully fund increases in the supplemental allocations computed under this section.(f) Commencing with the 2018–19 fiscal year, a student success allocation shall be computed for each community college district based on the total points calculated for each community college district in accordance with all of the following:(1) (A) (i) The marginal funding rate per point for computing student success allocation revenue shall be as follows:(I) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, four hundred forty dollars ($440).(II) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, five hundred fifty-nine dollars ($559).(III) Commencing with the 2020–21 fiscal year, the rate specified in subclause (II) adjusted for changes in the cost-of-living adjustment and other base adjustments in subsequent annual budget acts.(ii) (I) Commencing with the 2019–20 fiscal year, to calculate the student success allocation for each community college district, the chancellor’s office shall calculate a three-year rolling average for each metric described in this paragraph. To compute the three-year average for each metric, the chancellor’s office shall compute the sum of data for that metric from the prior year, the year before the prior year, and the year before the year before the prior year, and divide the sum by three.(II) For the calculation of the three-year rolling average for the student success allocation for the 2020–21 fiscal year, data from the 2018–19 fiscal year, for purposes of subparagraphs (B), (C), (D), (E), and (F), may be used in place of data from the 2019–20 fiscal year.(B) Each community college district shall be granted, for each student, points for one of the following, with the community college district receiving points based on the outcome that would generate the highest number of points and with the points counted only if the student was enrolled in the community college district in the academic year in which the award was granted:(i) Three points for each chancellor’s office approved associate degree or approved baccalaureate degree granted, excluding an associate degree for transfer granted pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 66745) of Chapter 9.2 of Part 40 of Division 5, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).(ii) Four points for each chancellor’s office approved associate degree for transfer degree granted pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 66745) of Chapter 9.2 of Part 40 of Division 5, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).(iii) (I) Two points for each chancellor’s office approved credit certificate requiring 18 or more units granted, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).(II) Chancellor’s office approved credit certificates requiring 16 or more units granted may be used to compute these points if the chancellor’s office adopts regulations authorizing the approval and issuance of certificates requiring 16 or more units.(C) Each community college district shall be granted two points for each student who successfully completes both transfer-level mathematics and English courses within the student’s first academic year of enrollment, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).(D) (i) Each community college district shall be granted one and one-half points for each student who successfully transfers to a four-year university, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).(ii) The chancellor’s office may reduce a community college district’s transfer points if a community college district enters into, or expands, a transfer partnership with a private for-profit college that has not demonstrated a track record of providing its students with a baccalaureate degree that leads to a majority of the private for-profit college’s baccalaureate degree program students obtaining a regional living wage within one year of completing their degree program.(iii) The chancellor’s office may reduce a community college district’s transfer points if a community college district enters into, or expands, a transfer partnership with a private for-profit college that does not meet the qualifications to offer its students federal financial aid.(iv) (I) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, the data for this metric shall be compiled using publicly available data on transfer students to in-state private and out-of-state institutions, based upon the definition of transfer students reflected in the Transfer Volume to In-State Private and Out-of-State Baccalaureate Granting Institutions Report from the community college management information system as of January 1, 2019, publicly reported transfer data from the California State University, and publicly reported transfer data from the University of California.(II) Commencing with the 2019–20 fiscal year, the data for this metric shall be based upon a student meeting the following criteria:(ia) The student has an enrollment record in a community college district in the year before the prior year.(ib) The student has completed 12 or more semester units, or the equivalent, systemwide through the end of the prior year.(ic) The student does not have an enrollment record systemwide in the prior year.(id) The student enrolled in a four-year university in the prior year.(ie) The student has completed 12 or more semester units, or the equivalent, in the community college district in the year before the prior year.(E) Each community college district shall be granted one point for each student who successfully completes nine or more career technical education units, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).(F) Each community college district shall be granted one point for each student who obtains a regional living wage within one year of community college completion, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).(2) (A) (i) Each community college district shall also be granted additional points for an equity component of the student success allocation. The marginal funding per point for the equity component of the student success allocation revenue shall be as follows:(I) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, one hundred eleven dollars ($111).(II) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, one hundred forty-one dollars ($141).(III) Commencing with the 2020–21 fiscal year, the rate specified in subclause (II) adjusted for changes in the cost-of-living adjustment and other base adjustments in subsequent annual budget acts.(ii) (I) Commencing with the 2019–20 fiscal year, to calculate the equity component of the student success allocation for each community college district, the chancellor’s office shall calculate a three-year rolling average for each metric described in this paragraph. To compute the three-year average for each metric, the chancellor’s office shall compute the sum of data for that metric from the prior year, the year before the prior year, and the year before the year before the prior year, and divide the sum by three.(II) For the calculation of the three-year rolling average for the equity component of the student success allocation for the 2020–21 fiscal year, data from the 2018–19 fiscal year, for purposes of subparagraphs (B) and (C), may be used in place of data from the 2019–20 fiscal year.(B) Each community college district shall receive points for a student who received a fee waiver pursuant to Section 76300 and generated points for any of the metrics described in paragraph (1), based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A). For each student identified pursuant to this subparagraph, the community college district shall receive the number of points equal to the number of points that the community college was granted for that student for each of the metrics described in paragraph (1).(C) (i) Each community college district shall receive points for a student who received financial aid under the Federal Pell Grant program (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070a) and generated points for any of the metrics described in paragraph (1), based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).(ii) Each community college district shall receive, for each student identified pursuant to clause (i), points for one of the following, with the community college district receiving points based on the outcome that would generate the highest number of points and with the points counted only if the student was enrolled in the community college district in the academic year in which the award was granted:(I) Four and one-half points for each chancellor’s office approved associate degree or approved baccalaureate degree granted, excluding an associate degree for transfer granted pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 66745) of Chapter 9.2 of Part 40 of Division 5, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).(II) Six points for each chancellor’s office approved associate for transfer degree granted pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 66745) of Chapter 9.2 of Part 40 of Division 5, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).(III) Three points for each chancellor’s office approved credit certificate requiring 16 or more units granted, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).(iii) Each community college district shall receive, for each student identified pursuant to clause (i), the number of points equal to the following:(I) Three points for each student who successfully completes transfer-level mathematics and English courses within the student’s first academic year of enrollment, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).(II) Two and one-quarter points for each student who successfully transfers to a four-year university, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).(III) One and one-half points for each student who successfully completes nine or more career technical education units, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).(IV) One and one-half points for each student who obtains a regional living wage within one year of community college completion, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that the annual Budget Act fully fund increases in the student success allocations computed under this section.(g) To establish a hold harmless protection for community college districts pursuant to the funding allocation established in this section, a minimum funding level for all community college districts shall be computed as follows:(1) For the 2018–19 and 2019–20 fiscal years, a level of funding to ensure that all community college districts receive at a minimum the total computational revenue the district received in the 2017–18 fiscal year, defined as a district’s final entitlement for general purpose apportionment based on FTES and the number of colleges and comprehensive centers the district operates.(2) Commencing with the 2020–21 fiscal year, and each year thereafter, community college districts shall receive the higher of (A) the funding level determined by the formula established in this section, or (B) the level of funding determined by multiplying the community college district’s new FTES by the associated credit, noncredit, and career development and college preparation rate received by the district in the 2017–18 fiscal year. The level of funding shall be adjusted to include a basic allocation based on the number of colleges and comprehensive centers in the district consistent with the basic allocation rates used in the 2017–18 fiscal year.(3) (A) From the 2019–20 fiscal year to the 2025–26 fiscal year, inclusive, for the San Francisco Community College District and the Compton Community College District, the rates for computing the hold harmless provisions pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be multiplied each year by the cost-of-living adjustment identified in the annual Budget Act and adjusted for increases to FTES. The level of funding for the San Francisco Community College District and the Compton Community College District shall be adjusted to include a basic allocation based on the number of colleges and comprehensive centers in the district consistent with the basic allocation rates used in the 2017–18 fiscal year multiplied by the 2018–19 fiscal year cost-of-living adjustment, and adjusted for changes in the cost-of-living in subsequent annual budget acts. The intent of these adjustments is to provide the San Francisco Community College District and the Compton Community College District with the greater of the amount that would have been calculated pursuant to the requirements of Section 84750.5, as that section read on January 1, 2018, adjusted for annual changes in the cost-of-living adjustment identified in the annual Budget Act and adjusted for increases in FTES, or the amount computed pursuant to the funding formula established in this section.(B) For purposes of computing the FTES attributable to this paragraph and subdivision (d), for seven fiscal years beginning in the 2017–18 fiscal year, the San Francisco Community College District shall be entitled to restoration of any reduction in apportionment revenue due to decreases in FTES, up to the level of attendance of FTES funded in the 2012–13 fiscal year, if there is a subsequent increase in FTES.(C) (i) For purposes of computing the FTES attributable to this paragraph and subdivision (d), for seven fiscal years beginning in the fiscal year the Compton Community College District is accredited under the governing authority of the Board of Trustees of the Compton Community College District, the board of governors shall provide allocations to the Compton Community College District in an amount not less than the total amount that the district would receive if the level of attendance of FTES was the same level of attendance as in the 2017–18 fiscal year. The amount shall be adjusted to reflect cost-of-living adjustments, deficits in apportionments, or both, as appropriate for the applicable fiscal years.(ii) For purposes of computing the FTES attributable to this paragraph and subdivision (d), for seven fiscal years beginning in the fiscal year the Compton Community College District is accredited under the governing authority of the Board of Trustees of the Compton Community College District, the Compton Community College District shall be entitled to restoration of any reduction in apportionment revenue due to decreases in FTES, up to the level of attendance of FTES funded in the 2017–18 fiscal year, if there is a subsequent increase in FTES.(iii) In computing statewide entitlements to funding based upon the attendance of FTES, the Compton Community College District shall not be credited with more FTES than were actually enrolled and in attendance.(4) (A) Commencing with the 2020–21 fiscal year, decreases in a community college district’s total revenue computed pursuant to the sum of subdivisions (d), (e), and (f), or computed pursuant to this subdivision shall result in the associated reduction beginning in the year following the initial year of decreases, adjusted for changes in the cost-of-living adjustment.(B) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, a community college district’s total revenue computed pursuant to the sum of subdivisions (d), (e), and (f), or computed pursuant to this subdivision shall be no less than its 2017–18 general purpose apportionment funding computed pursuant to Section 84750.5 adjusted for the cost-of-living adjustments for fiscal years 2018–19 and 2019–20.(h) (1) For the fiscal years 2018–19 to 2024–25, inclusive, each community college district whose increase in 2017–18 general purpose apportionment funding computed pursuant to Section 84750.5, compared to apportionment funding computed pursuant to this section, is less than the year-over-year cost-of-living adjustments applicable to those fiscal years, shall receive discretionary resources in an amount needed to ensure that the community college district receives no less than its 2017–18 general purpose apportionment funding computed pursuant to Section 84750.5 adjusted for annual year-over-year cost-of-living adjustments.(2) Commencing with For the 2025–26 fiscal year, each community college district shall receive the greater of either of the following:(A) A community college district’s total revenue computed pursuant to the sum of subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) for that fiscal year.(B) A community college district’s general purpose apportionment funding computed for the 2024–25 fiscal year, including the greater of discretionary resources received by the district pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) for the 2024–25 fiscal year or revenue received by the district pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (g) for the 2024–25 fiscal year.(3) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, each community college district shall receive the greater of either of the following:(A) A community college district’s total revenue computed pursuant to the sum of subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) for that fiscal year.(B) A community college district’s general purpose apportionment funding computed for the 2024–25 fiscal year, including the greater of discretionary resources received by the district pursuant to paragraph (1) for the 2024–25 fiscal year adjusted to reflect the application of a 1.44 percent discretionary cost-of-living adjustment or revenue received by the district pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (g) for the 2024–25 fiscal year adjusted to reflect the application of a 1.44 percent discretionary cost-of-living adjustment. The total amount associated with providing the 1.44 percent discretionary cost-of-living adjustment shall not exceed the amount identified in Section 84750.8 specifically for hold harmless funding levels.(i) The board of governors shall develop the criteria and standards within the statewide minimum requirements established pursuant to this section.(j) (1) Except as specifically provided in statute, regulations of the board of governors for determining and allocating the state general apportionment to the community college districts shall not require community college district governing boards to expend the allocated revenues in specified categories of operation.(2) Except as otherwise provided by statute, current categorical programs providing direct services to students, including extended opportunity programs and services, and disabled student programs and services, shall continue to be funded separately through the annual Budget Act, and shall not be assumed under the budget formula otherwise specified by this section.(k) It is the intent of the Legislature to allow for changes to the criteria and standards developed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (h) (i) in order to recognize increased operating costs and to improve instruction.(l) Notwithstanding Subchapter 1 (commencing with Section 51000) of Chapter 2 of Division 6 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and Section 84751, the chancellor shall allocate the ongoing funds first appropriated to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of provision (2) of Item 6870-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2015 (Chapters 10 and 11 of the Statutes of 2015) to all community college districts, including districts that have offsetting local revenues that exceed the funding calculated pursuant to the district’s budget formula, on a per FTES basis by modifying each district’s budget formula pursuant to this section. Any revisions to the budget formula made for the purposes of this subdivision shall be made and reported consistent with the requirements of subdivision (i).(m) (1) (A) The governing board of each community college district shall certify it will do all the following, no later than January 1, 2019:(i) Adopt goals for the community college district that meet the following requirements:(I) Are aligned with the systemwide goals identified in the Vision for Success, which were adopted by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges in 2017.(II) Are measurable numerically.(III) Specify the specific timeline for achievement.(ii) For the meeting when the goals are considered for adoption, include in the written agenda an explanation of how the goals are consistent and aligned with the systemwide goals.(iii) Submit the written item and summary of action to the chancellor’s office.(B) The chancellor’s office shall make available guidance to assist governing boards of community college districts in meeting the requirements of this section. The funds apportioned to a community college district pursuant to this section, and for excess tax districts, the Student Equity and Achievement Program, shall be available to implement the activities required pursuant to this paragraph.(2) Each community college district shall align its comprehensive plan pursuant to paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) of Section 70901 with the adopted local plan goals and align its budget with the comprehensive plan. The funds apportioned to a community college district pursuant to this section, and for excess tax districts, the Student Equity and Achievement Program, shall be available to implement the activities required pursuant to this paragraph.(3) If a community college district is identified as needing further assistance to make progress towards achieving specified goals, the chancellor’s office, with the approval from the board of governors, may direct the community college district to use up to 1 percent of the district’s apportionments allocation on technical assistance and professional development to support efforts to meet the district’s efforts towards their goals.(4) (A) The chancellor’s office shall develop processes to monitor the approval of new awards, certificates, and degree programs. The chancellor’s office shall also develop a process to monitor the number of students who transfer to for-profit postsecondary educational institutions and report on the growth of transfer to these institutions compared to four-year public postsecondary educational institutions.(B) The chancellor’s office shall also develop minimum standards, in consultation with the oversight committee established pursuant to Section 84750.41, for the approval of certificates and awards that would count towards the funding formula pursuant to this section.(C) The board of governors shall include instructions in the audit report required by Section 84040 related to the implementation of the funding formula pursuant to this section. The chancellor may require a community college district to repay any funding associated with an audit exception identified in a community college district’s audit report pursuant to this subparagraph.(5) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before October 15, 2019, and each year thereafter, the chancellor’s office shall report to the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the course sections and FTES added at each community college that received apportionment growth funding in the prior fiscal year, including the number of course sections and if any course sections and FTES were added that are within the primary missions of the segment and those that are not within the primary missions of the segment.(6) (A) On or before July 1, 2022, the chancellor’s office shall report to the Legislature and the Department of Finance, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, a description on how community college districts are making progress on advancing the goals outlined in the system’s strategic vision plan.(B) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subparagraph (A) is inoperative on July 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.(7) Commencing with the 2019–20 fiscal year, the chancellor’s office shall publicly post the data, by community college district, used to calculate the supplemental and student success allocations pursuant to subdivisions (e) and (f) on the internet website of the chancellor’s office. The chancellor’s office shall publicly post a preliminary version of the data for the most recently completed fiscal years by November 15 of each year, and a final version of that data by March 15 of each year.(n) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Career development and college preparation” means courses in programs that conform to the requirements of Section 84760.5.(2) “Chancellor’s office” means the Office office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(3) “Primary missions of the segment” means credit courses and those noncredit courses specified in paragraphs (2) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 84757.SEC. 22. Section 84750.8 is added to the Education Code, to read:84750.8. Beginning in the 2026–27 fiscal year, of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of Item 6870-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act for each fiscal year, the sum of one hundred fifty-nine million seven hundred forty-one thousand dollars ($159,741,000) shall be allocated to adjust apportionments to community college districts calculated pursuant to Sections 84750.4 and 84750.5. The amount specified in this section is in addition to the cost-of-living adjustment required pursuant to Sections 84750.4 and 84750.5. Of this amount, thirteen million three hundred thousand dollars ($13,300,000) is provided specifically for adjustments for community college districts funded at the hold harmless funding level pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 84750.4. Any remaining funds after the adjustment is made shall be available for allocation to all other community college districts. Community college districts incurring costs related to providing employees with up to 14 weeks of paid pregnancy disability leave pursuant to Sections 87766 and 88193 shall use the funds allocated pursuant to this section to reimburse these costs.SEC. 23. Section 87766 of the Education Code is amended to read:87766. The governing board of a community college district shall provide for leave of absence from duty for any academic employee of the district who is required to be absent from duties because of pregnancy, miscarriage, childbirth, and recovery therefrom. The length of the leave of absence, including the date on which the leave shall commence and the date on which the employee shall resume duties, shall be determined by the employee and the employee’s physician.Disabilities caused or contributed to by pregnancy, miscarriage, childbirth, and recovery therefrom are, for all job-related purposes, temporary disabilities and shall be treated as such under any health or temporary disability insurance or sick leave plan available in connection with employment by any school district.Except as provided herein, written and unwritten employment policies and practices of a community college district shall be applied to disability due to pregnancy or childbirth on the same terms and conditions applied to other temporary disabilities.This section shall be construed as requiring the governing board of a community college district to grant leave with pay only when it is necessary to do so in order that leaves of absence for disabilities caused or contributed to by pregnancy, miscarriage, or childbirth be treated the same as leaves for illness, injury, or disability.This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 24. Section 87766 is added to the Education Code, to read:87766. (a) (1) The governing board of a community college district shall provide for a leave of absence from duty for an academic employee of the community college district who is required to be absent from duty because the employee is experiencing or has experienced pregnancy, miscarriage, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or recovery from those conditions. The length of the leave of absence, including the date on which the leave shall commence and the date on which the employee shall resume duties, shall be determined by the employee and the employee’s physician. Except as provided in paragraph (2), the leave of absence shall be with full pay, subject to a maximum of 14 weeks. The paid leave may begin before and continue after childbirth if the employee is actually disabled by pregnancy, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or related medical conditions.(2) For part-time academic employees, the amount of paid leave per week, subject to a maximum of 14 weeks, shall be calculated in accordance with the following:(A) If the part-time employee works a fixed number of hours per week, the employee shall receive weekly pay for the total number of hours the employee is normally scheduled to work for the community college district.(B) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), if the part-time employee does not work a fixed number of hours per week, the employee shall receive weekly pay in an amount equaling the employee’s average weekly pay during the six-month period immediately preceding the date that the employee began their paid leave.(ii) If the part-time employee has been employed for less than six months, the employee shall receive weekly pay in an amount equaling the employee’s average weekly pay during the entire period of that employment preceding the date that the employee began their paid leave.(3) Notwithstanding any other law, a community college district shall maintain group health coverage for an employee who takes a leave of absence under this section for the duration of the leave of absence at the same level and under the same conditions that coverage would have been provided if the employee had not taken a leave of absence.(4) A leave of absence taken under this section shall not be deducted from any other leaves of absence available to the employee for subsequent injury, illness, or disabilities, including those caused or contributed to by pregnancy, miscarriage, or childbirth, pursuant to state or federal regulations or laws, except as provided in subdivision (e).(5) Compensation during the leave of absence taken under this section shall include retirement fund contributions required of the community college district. The employee shall earn full service credit during the leave of absence and shall pay member contributions to the retirement fund.(b) Disabilities caused or contributed to by pregnancy, miscarriage, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or recovery from those conditions are, for all job-related purposes, temporary disabilities, and shall be treated as such under any health or temporary disability insurance or sick leave plan available in connection with employment by a community college district.(c) Except as provided in this section, written and unwritten employment policies and practices of a community college district shall be applied to disability due to pregnancy or childbirth on the same terms and conditions applied to other temporary disabilities.(d) Except as provided in this section, there are no eligibility requirements, including, but not limited to, minimum hours worked or length of service, before an employee disabled by pregnancy, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or related medical conditions is eligible for a paid leave of absence under this section.(e) A community college district that has elected to become an employer subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code pursuant to Section 710.4 of the Unemployment Insurance Code may apply the disability benefits of an employee under Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code in partial satisfaction of the requirements of this section. Full satisfaction of the requirements of this section is met if the employer ensures that the employee receives the full amount of pay during the leave of absence required by this section without a reduction to the vacation, sick, or other compensated leave time balances of the employee.(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish the obligation of a community college district to comply with any collective bargaining agreement entered into by a community college district and an exclusive bargaining representative pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code that provides greater disability or parental leave rights to employees than the rights established under this section.(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.SEC. 25. Section 87861 of the Education Code is amended to read:87861. For purposes of this article: article, the following definitions apply:(a) “Health insurance benefits” include medical benefits but do not and may include vision or dental benefits.(b) “Multidistrict part-time faculty” refers to any faculty member whose total teaching assignments at two or more community college districts equals or exceeds 40 percent of the cumulative equivalent of a minimum full-time teaching assignment. “Multidistrict part-time faculty” does not include “part-time faculty” as defined in subdivision (c).(c) “Part-time faculty” refers to any faculty member whose teaching assignment equals or exceeds 40 percent of the cumulative equivalent of a minimum full-time teaching assignment.(d) The changes made to subdivision (c) during the 1999 portion of the 1999–2000 Regular Session of the Legislature shall be operative in any fiscal year only if funds are appropriated for purposes of those changes in the annual Budget Act or in another measure. If the amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act or in another measure for purposes of this section is insufficient to fully fund those changes for the fiscal year, the chancellor shall prorate the funds among the community college districts affected by this section.SEC. 26. Section 88193 of the Education Code is amended to read:88193. The governing board of any community college district may provide for such leave of absence from duty as it deems appropriate for any female employee in the classified service of the district who is required to absent herself from her duties because of pregnancy or convalescence following childbirth, and may adopt rules and regulations prescribing the manner of proof of pregnancy, the time during pregnancy at which the leave of absence shall be taken, and the length of time for which the leave of absence shall continue after birth of the child. The board may also provide in the rules and regulations whether leave granted under this section shall be with or without pay and, if with pay, the amount, if any, to be deducted from the salary due the employee for the period in which the absence occurs. However, nothing in this section shall be construed so as to deprive any employee of sick leave rights under other sections of this code for absences due to illness or injury resulting from pregnancy.This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 27. Section 88193 is added to the Education Code, to read:88193. (a) (1) The governing board of a community college district shall provide for a leave of absence from duty for an employee in the classified service of the community college district who is required to be absent from duty because the employee is experiencing or has experienced pregnancy, miscarriage, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or recovery from those conditions. The length of the leave of absence, including the date on which the leave shall commence and the date on which the employee shall resume duties, shall be determined by the employee and the employee’s physician. Except as provided in paragraph (2), the leave of absence shall be with full pay, subject to a maximum of 14 weeks. The paid leave may begin before and continue after childbirth if the employee is actually disabled by pregnancy, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or related medical conditions.(2) For part-time employees in the classified service, the amount of paid leave per week, subject to a maximum of 14 weeks, shall be calculated in accordance with the following:(A) If the part-time employee works a fixed number of hours per week, the employee shall receive weekly pay for the total number of hours the employee is normally scheduled to work for the community college district.(B) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), if the part-time employee does not work a fixed number of hours per week, the employee shall receive weekly pay in an amount equaling the employee’s average weekly pay during the six-month period immediately preceding the date that the employee began their paid leave.(ii) If the part-time employee has been employed for less than six months, the employee shall receive weekly pay in an amount equaling the employee’s average weekly pay during the entire period of that employment preceding the date that the employee began their paid leave.(3) Notwithstanding any other law, a community college district shall maintain group health coverage for an employee who takes a leave of absence under this section for the duration of the leave of absence at the same level and under the same conditions that coverage would have been provided if the employee had not taken a leave of absence.(4) A leave of absence taken under this section shall not be deducted from any other leaves of absence available to the employee for subsequent injury, illness, or disabilities, including those caused or contributed to by pregnancy, miscarriage, or childbirth, pursuant to state or federal regulations or laws, except as provided in subdivision (e).(5) Compensation during the leave of absence taken under this section shall include retirement fund contributions required of the community college district. The employee shall earn full service credit during the leave of absence and shall pay member contributions to the retirement fund.(b) Disabilities caused or contributed to by pregnancy, miscarriage, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or recovery from those conditions are, for all job-related purposes, temporary disabilities, and shall be treated as such under any health or temporary disability insurance or sick leave plan available in connection with employment by a community college district.(c) Except as provided in this section, written and unwritten employment policies and practices of a community college district shall be applied to disability due to pregnancy or childbirth on the same terms and conditions applied to other temporary disabilities.(d) Except as provided in this section, there are no eligibility requirements, including, but not limited to, minimum hours worked or length of service, before an employee disabled by pregnancy, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or related medical conditions is eligible for a paid leave of absence under this section.(e) A community college district that has elected to become an employer subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code pursuant to Section 710.4 of the Unemployment Insurance Code may apply the disability benefits of an employee under Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code in partial satisfaction of the requirements of this section. Full satisfaction of the requirements of this section is met if the employer ensures that the employee receives the full amount of pay during the leave of absence required by this section without a reduction to the vacation, sick, or other compensated leave time balances of the employee.(f) This section shall apply to community college districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish the obligation of a community college district to comply with any collective bargaining agreement entered into by a community college district and an exclusive bargaining representative pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code that provides greater disability or parental leave rights to employees than the rights established under this section.(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.SEC. 28. Section 88826.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:88826.5. (a) (1) Beginning in July 1, 2019, and in each year thereafter, except as provided in paragraph (2), for each community college program that offers certificates or degrees related to allied health professionals, the chancellor shall provide a report to the Legislature, with comparative clinical placement delineated by program and occupation. The report shall include both of the following:(A) The number of students participating at each clinical training site. This shall include information about proficiency in languages other than English.(B) The license number of each clinical training site. If the license number is not available, the report shall include the employer identification number of the clinical training site.(2) Beginning in the 2025–26 2026–27 fiscal year, the chancellor shall provide the report described in paragraph (1) to the Legislature biennially, triennially, on or before March 1, December 31, and may submit the report with the report required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 78261.(b) The collection and reporting of findings pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be implemented over multiple years, and collected by the chancellor’s office as follows:(1) Beginning in the 2019–20 academic year, the chancellor’s office shall collect from colleges, and report on, the following allied healthcare professional degrees and certificates:(A) Licensed Vocational Nurse.(B) Medical Assistant.(C) Occupational Therapy Aide.(D) Radiologic Technologist.(E) Respiratory Care Therapist.(F) Pharmacy Technician and Technologist.(G) Surgical Technician and Technologist.(2) Beginning in the 2020–21 academic year, the chancellor’s office shall collect from colleges, and report on, the following allied healthcare professional degrees and certificates:(A) Cardiovascular Technologist.(B) Certified Nurse Assistant.(C) Dialysis Technician.(D) Diagnostic Medical Sonographer.(E) Medical Lab Technician.(F) Orthopedic Assistant.(G) Physical Therapy Aide and Assistant.(H) Psychiatric Technologist.(I) Radiologic Therapist.(J) Speech Language Pathology Aide.(3) Beginning in the 2021–22 2026–27 academic year, and in each academic year thereafter, the chancellor’s office shall annually collect from colleges, and report triennially on, all certificates or degrees related to allied health professionals that require clinical training.(c) Any disclosure under this section shall be in compliance with state and federal privacy laws.(d) For the purposes of this section, “allied health professional” has the same meaning as in Section 295p of Title 42 of the United States Code.SEC. 29. Section 89526 is added to the Education Code, to read:89526. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Campus” means a campus of the California State University.(2) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California State University.(b) The chancellor’s office shall annually develop enrollment targets for each campus. These enrollment targets shall be informed by the campus’s actual enrollment history, demographics, funding, and other factors determined by the chancellor’s office.(c) On or before February 15 of each year, the chancellor’s office shall report the enrollment targets developed under subdivision (b) for the following fiscal year to the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Assembly Committee on Budget, and the Department of Finance.(d) The chancellor’s office shall include, in the report described in subdivision (c), enrollment data trends that provide a comparison of actual enrollment and the enrollment targets under subdivision (b), disaggregated by campus.(e) If the chancellor’s office determines that a campus has experienced an unusual decline in enrollment, cannot meet enrollment the targets under subdivision (b), or has failed to meet past enrollment targets under subdivision (b), the chancellor’s office may require a campus to complete a turnaround plan that details how the campus’s budget may be adjusted to reflect the campus’s actual enrollment. The chancellor’s office shall provide a copy of all data collected and reported under this section to the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Assembly Committee on Budget, and the Department of Finance.(f) A report submitted under this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 30. Section 8014 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:8014. (a) A lineal descendent claiming a relationship with, and requesting return of, Native American human remains or cultural items listed in the inventory or summary of an agency or museum, or that requests the return of human remains or cultural items that are not listed in the inventory or summary of an agency or museum but that are believed to be in the possession or control of the agency or museum, shall do both of the following:(1) File a claim for the human remains and cultural items with the commission and with the agency or museum believed to have possession or control.(2) Demonstrate that the claimant can trace their ancestry directly and without interruption by means of the traditional kinship or village system of the appropriate California Indian tribe, or by the common law system of descendancy, to a known individual whose human remains or cultural items are being claimed.(b) A California Indian tribe claiming a relationship, state cultural affiliation, or state aboriginal territory with, and requesting return of, human remains or cultural items listed in the inventory or summary of an agency or museum, or that requests the return of human remains or cultural items that are not listed in the inventory or summary of an agency or museum but that are believed to be in the possession or control of the agency or museum, shall do both of the following:(1) File a claim for the human remains and cultural items with the commission and with the agency or museum believed to have possession or control.(2) Demonstrate one or both of the following:(A) There is a relationship of shared group identity that can reasonably be traced historically or precontact with an earlier identifiable group from which the human remains or cultural items originated and the claiming California Indian tribe. Evidence of state cultural affiliation need not be provided when reasonably established by a finding published in the Federal Register, in compliance with the federal Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 3001 et seq.).(B) The human remains or cultural items were removed from the state aboriginal territory of the claiming California Indian tribe.SEC. 31. Section 8016 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:8016. (a) An agency or museum receiving a repatriation request pursuant to Section 8014 shall repatriate human remains and cultural items if all of the following criteria have been met: conditions are true:(1) The requested human remains or cultural items meet the definitions of human remains or cultural items that are subject to inventory and summary requirements under subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 8013.(2) The lineal descendent, state aboriginal territory, or state cultural affiliation of the human remains or cultural items is established as required under this section.(3) The agency or museum is unable to present evidence that, if standing alone before the introduction of evidence to the contrary, would support a finding that the agency or museum has a right of possession to the requested cultural items.(4)None of the exemptions listed in Section 10.10(c) of Title 43 of the Federal Code of Regulations apply. Scientific research shall be concluded within a reasonable period of time.(4) A stay of repatriation described in Section 10.9(i) or 10.10(j) of Title 43 of the Code of Federal Regulations is not in effect.(5) All other applicable requirements of regulations adopted under the federal Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 3001 et seq.), contained in Part 10 of Title 43 of the Code of Federal Regulations, have been met, including, but not limited to, the completion of a summary and inventory, consultation with California Indian tribes, and publication of notices of inventory completion and notices of intent to repatriate in the Federal Register, and, prior to disposition of culturally unidentifiable human remains to a tribe not recognized by the federal government, obtainment of the concurrence of the United States Department of the Interior. Register.(6) For human remains or associated funerary objects with no lineal descendant or no cultural affiliation with a federally recognized Indian tribe or Native Hawaiian organization, a museum or agency, at its discretion, may agree to transfer or decide to reinter the human remains or associated funerary objects in accordance with Section 10.10(k) of Title 43 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(b) If there are no other requests for particular human remains or cultural items and there is no unresolved objection pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), the agency or museum shall repatriate the requested human remains or cultural items to the requesting California Indian tribe or group within 90 days after posting the request for repatriation on the commission’s internet website, unless a notice of inventory completion or notice of intent to repatriate also is required under the federal Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 3001 et seq.). If the federal notice period extends beyond the 90-day period, the agency or museum shall repatriate the requested human remains or cultural items to the requesting California Indian tribe or group within 30 days following the completion of the federal notice period. Repatriation deadlines specified in this subdivision may be waived upon agreement of all parties.(c) Within 30 days after notice has been provided by the commission, the museum or agency shall have the right to file with the commission any objection to the requested repatriation, based on its good faith belief that the requested human remains or cultural items are not culturally affiliated with the requesting California Indian tribe, have not been removed from the California Indian tribe’s state aboriginal territory, or are not subject to repatriation under this chapter.(d) If there is more than one request for repatriation for the same item, if there is a dispute between the requesting party and the agency or museum, if there is a dispute as to the contents of an inventory or summary, or if a dispute arises in relation to the repatriation process, the commission shall notify the affected parties of this fact and the state cultural affiliation or state aboriginal territory of the item in question shall be determined in accordance with this subdivision.(1) The disputing parties shall submit documentation describing the nature of the dispute, in accordance with standard mediation practices and the commission’s procedures, to the commission, which shall, in turn, forward the documentation to the opposing party or parties. The disputing parties shall meet within 30 days of the date of the mailing of the documentation with the goal of settling the dispute.(2) If, after meeting, the parties are unable to settle the dispute, the commission, or a certified mediator who has the qualifications and experience appropriate to the dispute’s circumstances and has been designated by the commission, shall mediate the dispute. If the museum or agency is subject to the federal Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 3001 et seq.), any party also may request the assistance of the federal Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation Review Committee in resolving the dispute.(3) Each disputing party shall submit complaints and supporting evidence to the commission or designated mediator and the other opposing parties detailing their positions on the disputed issues in accordance with standard mediation practices and the commission’s mediation procedures. Each party shall have 20 days from the date the complaint and supporting evidence were mailed to respond to the complaints. All responses shall be submitted to the opposing party or parties and the commission or designated mediator.(4) The commission or designated mediator shall review all complaints, responses, and supporting evidence submitted. Within 20 days after the date of submission of responses, the commission or designated mediator shall hold a mediation session and the parties shall come to a resolution or the mediator shall render a written decision within 7 days of the mediation session.(5) When the disposition of human remains or cultural items is disputed, the party in possession of the human remains or cultural items shall retain possession until the mediation process is completed. Transfer or loan of human remains or cultural items shall not occur until the dispute is resolved.(6) Deference shall be provided to tribal traditional knowledge, oral histories, documentation, and testimonies relative to other relevant categories of evidence.(7) If the parties are unable to resolve a dispute through mediation, the dispute shall be resolved by the commission. The determination of the commission shall be deemed to constitute a final administrative remedy. Any party to the dispute seeking a review of the determination of the commission is entitled to file an action in the superior court seeking an independent judgment on the record as to whether the commission’s decision is reasonable. The independent review shall not constitute a de novo review of a decision by the commission, but shall be limited to a review of the evidence on the record. Petitions for review shall be filed with the court not later than 30 days after the final decision of the commission.(8) No later than June 30, 2021, the commission shall develop and adopt mediation procedures that will recognize the need for mediators with qualifications and experience appropriate to a dispute’s circumstances. Dispute procedures may incorporate aspects of restorative justice practices.SEC. 32. Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code is amended to read:1095. The director shall permit the use of any information in the director’s possession to the extent necessary for any of the following purposes, and may require reimbursement for all direct costs incurred in providing any and all information specified in this section, except information specified in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive:(a) To enable the director or the director’s representative to carry out their responsibilities under this code.(b) To properly present a claim for benefits.(c) To acquaint a worker or their authorized agent with the worker’s existing or prospective right to benefits.(d) To furnish an employer or their authorized agent with information to enable the employer to fully discharge their obligations or safeguard their rights under this division or Division 3 (commencing with Section 9000).(e) To enable an employer to receive a reduction in contribution rate.(f) To enable federal, state, or local governmental departments or agencies, subject to federal law, to verify or determine the eligibility or entitlement of an applicant for, or a recipient of, public social services provided pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or Part A of Subchapter IV of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.), and state or federal subsidies offered through the California Health Benefit Exchange provided pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code, when the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of public social services.(g) To enable county administrators of general relief or assistance, or their representatives, to determine entitlement to locally provided general relief or assistance, when the determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of general relief or assistance.(h) To enable state or local governmental departments or agencies to seek criminal, civil, or administrative remedies in connection with the unlawful application for, or receipt of, relief provided under Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code or to enable the collection of expenditures for medical assistance services pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 17000) of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(i) To provide any law enforcement agency with the name, address, telephone number, birth date, social security number, physical description, and names and addresses of present and past employers, of any victim, suspect, missing person, potential witness, or person for whom a felony arrest warrant has been issued, when a request for this information is made by any investigator or peace officer as defined by Sections 830.1 and 830.2 of the Penal Code, or by any federal law enforcement officer to whom the Attorney General has delegated authority to enforce federal search warrants, as defined under Sections 60.2 and 60.3 of Title 28 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended, and when the requesting officer has been designated by the head of the law enforcement agency and requests this information in the course of and as a part of an investigation into the commission of a crime when there is a reasonable suspicion that the crime is a felony and that the information would lead to relevant evidence. The information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations, and to the extent the information is available and accessible within the constraints and configurations of existing department records. Any person who receives any information under this subdivision shall make a written report of the information to the law enforcement agency that employs the person, for filing under the normal procedures of that agency.(1) This subdivision shall not be construed to authorize the release to any law enforcement agency of a general list identifying individuals applying for or receiving benefits.(2) The department shall maintain records pursuant to this subdivision only for periods required under regulations or statutes enacted for the administration of its programs.(3) This subdivision shall not be construed as limiting the information provided to law enforcement agencies to that pertaining only to applicants for, or recipients of, benefits.(4) The department shall notify all applicants for benefits that release of confidential information from their records will not be protected should there be a felony arrest warrant issued against the applicant or in the event of an investigation by a law enforcement agency into the commission of a felony.(j) To provide public employee retirement systems in California with information relating to the earnings of any person who has applied for or is receiving a disability income, disability allowance, or disability retirement allowance, from a public employee retirement system. The earnings information shall be released only upon written request from the governing board specifying that the person has applied for or is receiving a disability allowance or disability retirement allowance from its retirement system. The request may be made by the chief executive officer of the system or by an employee of the system so authorized and identified by name and title by the chief executive officer in writing.(k) To enable the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement in the Department of Industrial Relations to seek criminal, civil, or administrative remedies in connection with the failure to pay, or the unlawful payment of, wages pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 200) of Part 1 of Division 2 of, and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of, the Labor Code.(l) To enable federal, state, or local governmental departments or agencies to administer child support enforcement programs under Part D of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 651 et seq.).(m) To provide federal, state, or local governmental departments or agencies with wage and claim information in its possession that will assist those departments and agencies in the administration of the Victims of Crime Program or in the location of victims of crime who, by state mandate or court order, are entitled to restitution that has been or can be recovered.(n) To provide federal, state, or local governmental departments or agencies with information concerning any individuals who are or have been:(1) Directed by state mandate or court order to pay restitution, fines, penalties, assessments, or fees as a result of a violation of law.(2) Delinquent or in default on guaranteed student loans or who owe repayment of funds received through other financial assistance programs administered by those agencies. The information released by the director for the purposes of this paragraph shall not include unemployment insurance benefit information.(o) To provide an authorized governmental agency with any and all relevant information that relates to any specific workers’ compensation insurance fraud investigation. The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations. For purposes of this subdivision, “authorized governmental agency” means the district attorney of any county, the office of the Attorney General, the Contractors State License Board, the Department of Industrial Relations, and the Department of Insurance. An authorized governmental agency may disclose this information to the State Bar of California, the Medical Board of California, or any other licensing board or department whose licensee is the subject of a workers’ compensation insurance fraud investigation. This subdivision shall not prevent any authorized governmental agency from reporting to any board or department the suspected misconduct of any licensee of that body.(p) To enable the Director of Consumer Affairs, or the director’s representative, to access unemployment insurance quarterly wage data on a case-by-case basis to verify information on school administrators, school staff, and students provided by those schools who are being investigated for possible violations of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 94800) of Part 59 of Division 10 of Title 3 of the Education Code.(q) To provide employment tax information to the tax officials of Mexico, if a reciprocal agreement exists. For purposes of this subdivision, “reciprocal agreement” means a formal agreement to exchange information between national taxing officials of Mexico and taxing authorities of the State Board of Equalization, the Franchise Tax Board, and the Employment Development Department. Furthermore, the reciprocal agreement shall be limited to the exchange of information that is essential for tax administration purposes only. Taxing authorities of the State of California shall be granted tax information only on California residents. Taxing authorities of Mexico shall be granted tax information only on Mexican nationals.(r) To enable city and county planning agencies to develop economic forecasts for planning purposes. The information shall be limited to businesses within the jurisdiction of the city or county whose planning agency is requesting the information, and shall not include information regarding individual employees.(s) To provide the State Department of Developmental Services with wage and employer information that will assist in the collection of moneys owed by the recipient, parent, or any other legally liable individual for services and supports provided pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 4775) of Division 4.5 of, and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 7200) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 7 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code.(t) To provide the State Board of Equalization with employment tax information that will assist in the administration of tax programs. The information shall be limited to the exchange of employment tax information essential for tax administration purposes to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations.(u) This section shall not be construed to authorize or permit the use of information obtained in the administration of this code by any private collection agency.(v) The disclosure of the name and address of an individual or business entity that was issued an assessment that included penalties under Section 1128 or 1128.1 shall not be in violation of Section 1094 if the assessment is final. The disclosure may also include any of the following:(1) The total amount of the assessment.(2) The amount of the penalty imposed under Section 1128 or 1128.1 that is included in the assessment.(3) The facts that resulted in the charging of the penalty under Section 1128 or 1128.1.(w) To enable the Contractors State License Board to verify the employment history of an individual applying for licensure pursuant to Section 7068 of the Business and Professions Code.(x) To provide any peace officer with the Division of Investigation in the Department of Consumer Affairs information pursuant to subdivision (i) when the requesting peace officer has been designated by the Chief of the Division of Investigation and requests this information in the course of and as part of an investigation into the commission of a crime or other unlawful act when there is reasonable suspicion to believe that the crime or act may be connected to the information requested and would lead to relevant information regarding the crime or unlawful act.(y) To enable the Labor Commissioner of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement in the Department of Industrial Relations to identify, pursuant to Section 90.3 of the Labor Code, unlawfully uninsured employers. The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations.(z) To enable the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, in accordance with the requirements of Section 84754.5 of the Education Code, to obtain quarterly wage data, commencing January 1, 1993, on students who have attended one or more community colleges, to assess the impact of education on the employment and earnings of students, to conduct the annual evaluation of district-level and individual college performance in achieving priority educational outcomes, and to submit the required reports to the Legislature and the Governor. The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal statutes and regulations.(aa) To enable the Public Employees’ Retirement System to seek criminal, civil, or administrative remedies in connection with the unlawful application for, or receipt of, benefits provided under Part 3 (commencing with Section 20000) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(ab) To enable the State Department of Education, the University of California, the California State University, and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, pursuant to the requirements prescribed by the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5), to obtain quarterly wage data, commencing July 1, 2010, on students who have attended their respective systems to assess the impact of education on the employment and earnings of those students, to conduct the annual analysis of district-level and individual district or postsecondary education system performance in achieving priority educational outcomes, and to submit the required reports to the Legislature and the Governor. The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal statutes and regulations.(ac) To provide the Agricultural Labor Relations Board with employee, wage, and employer information, for use in the investigation or enforcement of the Alatorre-Zenovich-Dunlap-Berman Agricultural Labor Relations Act of 1975 (Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 1140) of Division 2 of the Labor Code). The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal statutes and regulations.(ad) (1) To enable the State Department of Health Care Services, the California Health Benefit Exchange, the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board, and county departments and agencies to obtain information regarding employee wages, California employer names and account numbers, employer reports of wages and number of employees, and disability insurance and unemployment insurance claim information, for the purpose of:(A) Verifying or determining the eligibility of an applicant for, or a recipient of, state health subsidy programs, limited to the Medi-Cal program provided pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and the Medi-Cal Access Program provided pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15810) of Part 3.3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, when the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the state health subsidy programs referenced in this subparagraph.(B) Verifying or determining the eligibility of an applicant for, or a recipient of, state or federal subsidies offered through the California Health Benefit Exchange, provided pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code, including federal tax credits and cost-sharing assistance pursuant to the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), when the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the California Health Benefit Exchange.(C) Verifying or determining the eligibility of employees and employers for health coverage through the Small Business Health Options Program, provided pursuant to Section 100502 of the Government Code, when the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the Small Business Health Options Program.(2) The information provided under this subdivision shall be subject to the requirements of, and provided to the extent permitted by, federal law and regulations, including Part 603 of Title 20 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(ae) To provide any peace officer with the Investigations Division of the Department of Motor Vehicles with information pursuant to subdivision (i), when the requesting peace officer has been designated by the Chief of the Investigations Division and requests this information in the course of, and as part of, an investigation into identity theft, counterfeiting, document fraud, or consumer fraud, and there is reasonable suspicion that the crime is a felony and that the information would lead to relevant evidence regarding the identity theft, counterfeiting, document fraud, or consumer fraud. The information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations, and to the extent the information is available and accessible within the constraints and configurations of existing department records. Any person who receives any information under this subdivision shall make a written report of the information to the Investigations Division of the Department of Motor Vehicles, for filing under the normal procedures of that division.(af) Until January 1, 2020, to enable the Department of Finance to prepare and submit the report required by Section 13084 of the Government Code that identifies all employers in California that employ 100 or more employees who receive benefits from the Medi-Cal program (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code). The information used for this purpose shall be limited to information obtained pursuant to Section 11026.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and from the administration of personal income tax wage withholding pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) and the disability insurance program and may be disclosed to the Department of Finance only for the purpose of preparing and submitting the report and only to the extent not prohibited by federal law.(ag) To provide, to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations, the Student Aid Commission with wage information in order to verify the employment status of an individual applying for a Cal Grant C award pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 69439 of the Education Code.(ah) To enable the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to obtain quarterly wage data of former inmates who have been incarcerated within the prison system in order to assess the impact of rehabilitation services or the lack of these services on the employment and earnings of these former inmates. Quarterly data for a former inmate’s employment status and wage history shall be provided for a period of one year, three years, and five years following release. The data shall only be used for the purpose of tracking outcomes for former inmates in order to assess the effectiveness of rehabilitation strategies on the wages and employment histories of those formerly incarcerated. The information shall be provided to the department to the extent not prohibited by federal law.(ai) To enable federal, state, or local government departments or agencies, or their contracted agencies, subject to federal law, including the confidentiality, disclosure, and other requirements set forth in Part 603 of Title 20 of the Code of Federal Regulations, to evaluate, research, or forecast the effectiveness of public social services programs administered pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or Part A of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.), when the evaluation, research, or forecast is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the public social services programs.(aj) (1) To enable the California Workforce Development Board, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Department of Rehabilitation, the State Department of Social Services, the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, the Department of Industrial Relations, the Division of Apprenticeship Standards, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority, the Employment Training Panel, and a chief elected official, as that term is defined in Section 3102(9) of Title 29 of the United States Code, to access any relevant quarterly wage data necessary for the evaluation and reporting of their respective program performance outcomes as required and permitted by various local, state, and federal laws pertaining to performance measurement and program evaluation, including responsibilities arising under Sections 14013, 14033, and 14042 of this code and Sections 2032 and 2038 of the Streets and Highways Code; the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128); the workforce metrics dashboard pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 14013; the Adult Education Block Grant Program consortia performance metrics pursuant to Section 84920 of the Education Code; the economic and workforce development program performance measures pursuant to Section 88650 of the Education Code; and the California Community Colleges Economic and Workforce Development Program performance measures established in Part 52.5 (commencing with Section 88600) of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. Disclosures under this subdivision shall comply with federal and state privacy laws that require the informed consent from program participants of city and county departments or agencies that administer public workforce development programs for the evaluation, research, or forecast of their programs regardless of local, state, or federal funding source.(2) The department shall do all of the following:(A) Consistent with this subdivision, develop the minimum requirements for granting a request for disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision regardless of local, state, or federal funding source.(B) Develop a standard application for submitting a request for disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision.(C) Approve or deny a request for disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision, or request additional information, within 20 business days of receiving the standard application. The entity submitting the application shall respond to any request by the department for additional information within 20 business days of receipt of the department’s request. Within 30 calendar days of receiving any additional information, the department shall provide a final approval or denial of the request for disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision. Any approval, denial, or request for additional information shall be in writing. Denials shall identify the reason or category of reasons for the denial.(D) Make publicly available on the department’s internet website all of the following:(i) The minimum requirements for granting a request for disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision, as developed pursuant to subparagraph (A).(ii) The standard application developed pursuant to subparagraph (B).(iii) The timeframe for information request determinations by the department, as specified in subparagraph (C).(iv) Contact information for assistance with requests for disclosures of information authorized by this subdivision.(v) Any denials for requests of disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision, including the reason or category of reasons for the denial.(ak) (1) To provide any peace officer with the Enforcement Branch of the Department of Insurance with both of the following:(A) Information provided pursuant to subdivision (i) that relates to a specific insurance fraud investigation involving automobile insurance fraud, life insurance and annuity fraud, property and casualty insurance fraud, and organized automobile insurance fraud. That information shall be provided when the requesting peace officer has been designated by the Chief of the Fraud Division of the Department of Insurance and requests the information in the course of, and as part of, an investigation into the commission of a crime or other unlawful act when there is reasonable suspicion to believe that the crime or act may be connected to the information requested and would lead to relevant information regarding the crime or unlawful act.(B) Employee, wage, employer, and state disability insurance claim information that relates to a specific insurance fraud investigation involving health or disability insurance fraud when the requesting peace officer has been designated by the Chief of the Fraud Division of the Department of Insurance and requests the information in the course of, and as part of, an investigation into the commission of a crime or other unlawful act when there is reasonable suspicion to believe that the crime or act may be connected to the information requested and would lead to relevant information regarding the crime or unlawful act.(2) To enable the State Department of Developmental Services to obtain quarterly wage data and unemployment insurance claim data of consumers served by that department for the purposes of monitoring, program operation and evaluation, and evaluating employment outcomes, of the Employment First Policy, established pursuant to Section 4869 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(3) The information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal statutes and regulations.(al) To provide the CalSavers Retirement Savings Board with employer tax information for use in the administration of, and to facilitate compliance with, the CalSavers Retirement Savings Trust Act (Title 21 (commencing with Section 100000) of the Government Code). The information should be limited to the tax information the director deems appropriate, and shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal laws and regulations.(am) (1) To enable the Joint Enforcement Strike Force as established by Section 329, and the Labor Enforcement Task Force, as established pursuant to Assembly Bill 1464 of the 2011–12 Regular Session (Chapter 21 of the Statutes of 2012), to carry out their duties.(2) To provide an agency listed in subdivision (a) of Section 329 intelligence, data, including confidential tax and fee information, documents, information, complaints, or lead referrals pursuant to Section 15925 of the Government Code.(an) To enable the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education to access and use any relevant quarterly wage data necessary to perform the labor market outcome reporting data match pursuant to Section 94892.6 of the Education Code. The information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to the extent permitted by state and federal laws and regulations.(ao) To enable the Civil Rights Department to carry out its duties, including ensuring compliance with Section 12999 of the Government Code. Conduct related to information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall not be subject to the criminal sanctions set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 1094.(ap) To enable the Cradle-to-Career Data System, as established by Article 2 (commencing with Section 10860) of Chapter 8.5 of Part 7 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code, to receive employment and earnings data and, as required by the director pursuant to Section 10871 of the Education Code, to provide information to the data system, to the extent permissible by federal laws and regulations.(aq) (1) To enable the State Air Resources Board to receive unpaid final tax assessment information issued to a port drayage motor carrier or short-haul trucking service for misclassification of a commercial driver, for use in the administration of, and to facilitate compliance with, Chapter 3.6 (commencing with Section 39680) of Part 2 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code. The information shall be limited to the tax information the director deems appropriate for disclosure and shall be provided only to the extent permitted by federal laws and regulations.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:(A) “Commercial driver” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2810.4 of the Labor Code.(B) “Port drayage motor carrier” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2810.4 of the Labor Code.(C) “Short-haul trucking service” has the same meaning as defined in Section 39682 of the Health and Safety Code.(ar) To enable the California Health Benefit Exchange to do all of the following:(1) Notify an employer that an employee has been determined eligible for advance payments of the premium tax credit and cost-sharing reductions and has enrolled in a qualified health plan through the California Health Benefit Exchange, as required pursuant to Section 155.310(h) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The information shall include available employer contact information, including addresses, email addresses, and telephone numbers.(2) Assist the California Health Benefit Exchange or the State Department of Health Care Services in determining eligibility for the insurance affordability programs administered by those state agencies. The determination of eligibility or entitlement shall include efforts by either the California Health Benefit Exchange or the State Department of Health Care Services to assist those individuals in obtaining that coverage, including informing those individuals potentially eligible for health coverage of the availability of that coverage.(3) Verify if a consumer has been offered affordable comprehensive employer-sponsored health care coverage pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code and the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148). The information shall include available employer contact information, including addresses, email addresses, and telephone numbers.(4) Upon the request of either the California Health Benefit Exchange or the State Department of Health Care Services, the department shall also provide to the relevant state agency information on new applicants for unemployment insurance, state disability insurance, and paid family leave. The California Health Benefit Exchange and the State Department of Health Care Services shall at all times request from the department the minimum amount of information necessary from the information listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 100503.9 of the Government Code, to accomplish the purposes of Section 100503.9 of the Government Code. The information shall be sent in a manner that is encrypted or otherwise complies with government data security best practices, as specified by the California Health Benefit Exchange. This information shall only be used for the purposes of outreach and marketing.(5) This subdivision shall become operative no later than September 1, 2023.(as) To enable the office of the Chancellor of the California State University, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, and the office of the President of the University of California to access any relevant quarterly wage data necessary for students who have attended their respective systems to assess the impact of education on the employment and earnings of those students and demonstrate compliance with the federal and state Workforce Pell Grant requirements pursuant to Public Law 119-21 to determine Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility. Disclosures and redisclosures under this subdivision shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal laws and regulations.SEC. 33. Item 6870-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read:6870-101-0001—For local assistance, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges (Proposition 98) ........................ 5,848,337,000 5,392,885,000Schedule:(1)5670015-Apportionments ........................ 3,580,708,000 3,125,256,000(2)5670019-Apprenticeship ........................ 65,622,000(3)5670023-Apprenticeship Training and Instruction ........................ 62,485,000(4)5675040-Student Equity and Achievement Program ........................ 523,981,000(5)5675019-Student Financial Aid Administration ........................ 83,726,000(6)5675027-Disabled Students ........................ 178,686,000(7)5675031-Student Services for CalWORKs Recipients ........................ 56,922,000(8)5675035-Foster Care Education Program ........................ 6,154,000(9)5675045-Legal Services ........................ 10,000,000(10)5675061-Academic Senate for the Community Colleges ........................ 1,796,000(11)5675069-Equal Employment Opportunity ........................ 12,767,000(12)5675073-Part-Time Faculty Health Insurance ........................ 200,490,000(13)5675077-Part-Time Faculty Compensation ........................ 26,542,000(14)5675081-Part-Time Faculty Office Hours ........................ 23,626,000(15)5670035-Expand the Delivery of Courses through Technology ........................ 23,000,000(16)5675119-Economic Development ........................ 313,329,000(17)5675123-Transfer Education and Articulation ........................ 2,079,000(18)5675023-Extended Opportunity Programs and Services ........................ 223,912,000(19)5675115-Fund for Student Success ........................ 287,711,000(20)5675150-Campus Childcare Tax Bailout ........................ 4,420,000(21)5675156-Nursing Program Support ........................ 13,378,000(22)5675109-Institutional Effectiveness ........................ 27,500,000(23)5675098-Integrated Technology ........................ 101,503,000(24)5675042-Community College Summer Assistance Program ........................ 10,000,000(25)5675117-AANHPI Student Achievement Program ........................ 8,000,000Provisions:1.The funds appropriated in this item are for transfer by the Controller during the 2025–26 fiscal year to Section B of the State School Fund.1.5(a)The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) reflect a deferral of $408,363,000 to the 2026–27 fiscal year.(b)(1)To implement the monthly deferral schedule for community college districts pursuant to the higher education omnibus trailer bill identified in Section 39.00 as providing for appropriations related to this act, the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges may transfer to Schedule (1) of this item appropriations from schedules within this item that provide categorical program funding and that are being deferred.(2)If exercising the authority described in paragraph (1), the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall first defer appropriations from apportionments in Schedule (1) before transferring appropriations from schedules within this item that provide categorical program funding.(c)The transfers authorized by this provision shall be implemented through notification to appropriate staff of the Controller and the Department of Finance.2.(a)The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be allocated using the budget formula established pursuant to Section 84750.4 of the Education Code. The budget formula shall be adjusted to reflect the following:(1)Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $39,981,000 shall be used to increase statewide growth of full-time equivalent students (FTES) by 0.57 percent. It is the intent of the Legislature that the enrollment growth funding in this paragraph, when combined with the additional $100,000,000 provided for enrollment growth in the 2024–25 fiscal year in this act, support a combined growth percentage of 2.35 percent in the 2025–26 fiscal year.(2)Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $217,442,000 shall be used to reflect a cost-of-living adjustment of 2.30 percent.(3)Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges may allocate unused growth funding to backfill any unanticipated shortfalls in the total amount of funding appropriated and support the budget formula established pursuant to Section 84750.4 of the Education Code.(b)Funds allocated to a community college district from funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall directly offset any mandated costs claimed for the Minimum Conditions for State Aid (02-TC-25 and 02-TC-31) program or any costs of complying with Section 84754.5 of the Education Code.(c)Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1):(1)Up to $100,000 is for a maintenance allowance, pursuant to Section 54200 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.(2)Up to $500,000 is to reimburse colleges for the costs of federal aid repayments related to assessed fees for fee waiver recipients. This reimbursement only applies to students who completely withdraw from college before the census date pursuant to Section 58508 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.(d)Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $91,207,000 shall be allocated to support the California College Promise pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 76396) of Chapter 2 of Part 47 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code.(e)(1)Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $50,000,000 shall be used to hire new full-time faculty for community college districts to increase their percentage of full-time faculty toward meeting the 75 percent full-time faculty target. The Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall consult with representatives from the Department of Finance, the Legislature, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office before distributing these funds to community college districts.(2)Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $100,000,000 shall be used to hire new full-time faculty for participating community college districts to increase their percentage of full-time faculty toward meeting the 75 percent full-time faculty target. The Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall consult with representatives from the Department of Finance, the Legislature, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office before distributing these funds to community college districts. It is the intent of the Legislature that the funding available pursuant to this paragraph be used to increase a district’s hiring of full-time faculty above the level that the district would have otherwise employed each year.(f)Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $8,065,000 is available on a one-time basis to backfill affected community college districts for property tax revenue losses as a result of fires leading to any states of emergency declared by the Governor in January, 2025.3.(a)(1)The funds appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be available pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 79140) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. Funds appropriated pursuant to this subdivision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028.(2)Pursuant to Section 79149.3 of the Education Code, the reimbursement rate shall be $10.32 per hour.(b)Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $30,000,000 shall be used for the California Apprenticeship Initiative pursuant to Section 79148.1 of the Education Code. Funds appropriated pursuant to this subdivision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031.4.(a)The funds appropriated in Schedule (3) shall be available pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 8150) of Chapter 1 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code. Funds appropriated pursuant to this subdivision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028.(b)Pursuant to Section 8152 of the Education Code, the reimbursement rate shall be $10.32 per hour.5.The funds appropriated in Schedule (4) shall be apportioned to community college districts pursuant to Section 78222 of the Education Code.6.(a)Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (5):(1)Not less than $14,036,000 is available to provide $0.91 per unit reimbursement to community college districts for the provision of California College Promise Grants pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (m) of Section 76300 of the Education Code.(2)Not less than $14,190,000 is available for the Board Financial Assistance Program to provide reimbursement of 2 percent of total waiver value to community college districts for the provision of California College Promise Grants pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (m) of Section 76300 of the Education Code.(3)(A)  $5,300,000 shall be allocated to a community college district to conduct a statewide outreach, marketing, and paid media campaign to promote the following messages: (i) many types of financial aid are available year-round to cover fees and help with college costs, such as books, housing, and other educational costs; (ii) students can contact their local community college financial aid office to get one-on-one assistance with completing and submitting financial aid applications and forms; and (iii) a community college education can improve the lives of students and their families by providing financial aid, as well as career training and guaranteed transfer opportunities to get into a rewarding, good-paying career. The campaign should target efforts to reach ethnically diverse, low-income students in primarily underresourced communities who must overcome barriers in accessing postsecondary education. The Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall apprise the Student Aid Commission of ongoing outreach and marketing efforts.(B) Of the amount identified in subparagraph (A), $2,500,000 shall be allocated to: (i) expand outreach for students from non-English speaking households and bilingual households; (ii) tie financial aid messaging to enrollment messaging where applicable to encourage current and potential students to enroll or continue their education at a California Community College and apply for financial aid; and (iii) marketing and outreach aimed at increasing current and potential student awareness of the California College Promise Grant and other types of financial aid available for California Community College students. Bilingual efforts shall target areas of the state that meet at least one of the following conditions: (i) have concentrations of non-English speaking and bilingual households, or (ii) have underserved populations, a history of declining community college attendance, or both.(4)Not more than $45,200,000 shall be for direct contact with potential and current financial aid applicants. Each California Community College campus shall receive a minimum allocation of $50,000. The remainder of the funding shall be allocated to campuses based upon a formula reflecting full-time equivalent students (FTES) weighted by a measure of low-income populations demonstrated by the California College Promise Grant program participation within a district.(5)Funds allocated to a community college district pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall supplement, not supplant, the level of funds allocated for the administration of student financial aid programs during the 2001–02 or 2006–07 fiscal year, whichever is greater.(6)Funding allocated to a community college district pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall directly offset any costs claimed by that district for any of the following mandates: Enrollment Fee Collection (99-TC-13), Enrollment Fee Waivers (00-TC-15), Cal Grants (02-TC-28), and Tuition Fee Waivers (02-TC-21).(7)Notwithstanding subdivision (m) of Section 76300 of the Education Code or any other law, the amount of funds appropriated for the purpose of administering fee waivers for the 2025–26 fiscal year shall be determined in this act.(8)Not more than $5,000,000 shall be for ongoing maintenance, subscription, and training costs for financial aid technology advancements and innovations that streamline the financial aid verification process and enable colleges to more efficiently process state and federal financial aid grants. It is the intent of the Legislature that system improvements supported by this funding have the effect of reducing the manual processing of financial aid applications, thereby enabling financial aid program staff to provide additional technical assistance and guidance to students seeking financial aid. The Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall determine the methodology for allocating these funds to community college districts.7.(a)The funds appropriated in Schedule (6) shall be used to assist districts in funding the excess direct instructional cost of providing special support services or instruction, or both, to disabled students enrolled at community colleges and for state hospital programs, as mandated by federal law.(b)Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (6):(1)At least $3,945,000 shall be used to address deficiencies identified by the United States Department of Education Office for Civil Rights.(2)At least $943,000 shall be used to support the High Tech Centers for activities, including, but not limited to, training of district employees, staff, and students in the use of specialized computer equipment for the disabled.(3)At least $9,600,000 shall be allocated to community college districts for sign language interpreter services, real-time captioning equipment, or other communication accommodations for hearing-impaired students. A community college district is required to spend $1 from local or other resources for every $4 received pursuant to this paragraph.8.(a)The funds appropriated in Schedule (7) shall be allocated pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 79200) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code.(b)Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (7):(1)$11,504,000 shall be for childcare, except that a community college district may request that the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges approve the use of funds for other purposes.(2)No less than $6,135,000 shall be used to provide direct workstudy wage reimbursement for students served under this program, and $769,000 is available for campus job development and placement services.9.The funds appropriated in Schedule (8) shall be allocated to community college districts to provide foster and relative or kinship care education and training pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 79420) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. A community college district shall ensure that education and training required pursuant to paragraphs (12) and (13) of subdivision (g) of Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code receive priority.10.The funds appropriated in Schedule (9) shall be allocated to a community college district to contract with the State Department of Social Services in order to contract with organizations qualified pursuant to Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 13300) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to provide services pursuant to that chapter to persons on California Community College campuses. Use of these funds shall be included in updates provided to the Legislature on the State Department of Social Services’ immigration programs.11.Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (10), $685,000 is available to support the Academic Senate for California Community Colleges course identification numbering system efforts and shall be subject to the requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 70901 of the Education Code.12.Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (11), $10,000,000 shall be allocated to community college districts to support the continued implementation of equal employment opportunity plans and to enable campuses to engage in sustainable practices to diversify faculty, staff, and administrators, including the continued use of best practices and tools identified by office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges’ Equal Employment Opportunity and Diversity Advisory Committee.13.The funds appropriated in Schedule (12) shall be allocated to community college districts for the purpose of providing a state incentive program to encourage community college districts to offer health insurance for part-time faculty pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 87860) of Chapter 3 of Part 51 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code.14.The funds in Schedule (13) shall be allocated to increase compensation for part-time faculty. Funds shall be allocated to districts based on the total actual number of full-time equivalent students (FTES) in the previous fiscal year, with an adjustment to the allocations provided to small districts. These funds shall be used to assist districts in making part-time faculty salaries more comparable to full-time salaries for similar work, as determined through collective bargaining in each community college district. If a community college district achieves parity between compensation for full-time faculty and part-time faculty, funds received pursuant to this provision may be used for any other educational purpose.15.Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (15):(a)$20,000,000 shall be allocated to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to increase the number of courses available through the use of technology, provide alternative methods for students to earn college credit, and support the California Virtual Campus Distance Education Program. These funds may be used to pay for a consistent learning management system to help implement this program. The chancellor shall ensure, to the extent possible, that the following conditions are satisfied:(1)These courses can be articulated across all community college districts.(2)These courses are made available to students systemwide, regardless of the campus at which a student is enrolled.(3)Students who complete these courses are granted degree-applicable credit across community colleges.(4)These funds shall be used for those courses that have the highest demand, fill quickly, and are prerequisites for many different degrees.(b)By September 1 of each fiscal year, up to $3,000,000 shall be disbursed by the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to one or more community college districts to provide textbooks or digital course content to students incarcerated or detained in federal or state prison, county jail, juvenile facility, or other correctional institutions who are enrolled in one or more California Community College courses. The provision of this material is expected to enable community college districts to provide instruction to incarcerated or detained students.(1)To the extent possible, community college districts providing textbooks or digital course content pursuant to this subdivision are encouraged to first use open educational resources.(2)Notwithstanding any other law, a contract between the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and a community college district for purposes of this subdivision is not subject to any competitive bidding requirements of Section 10340 of the Public Contract Code.16.Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (16):(a)$22,929,000 is available for the following purposes:(1)Up to 10 percent may be allocated for state-level technical assistance, including statewide network leadership, organizational development, coordination, and information and support services.(2)All remaining funds shall be allocated for programs that target investments in priority and emergent sectors, including statewide or regional centers, hubs, collaborative communities, advisory bodies, and short-term grants. Short-term grants may include industry-driven regional education and training, Responsive Incumbent Worker Training, and Job Development Incentive Training. Funds allocated pursuant to this provision may be used to provide substantially similar services in support of the Strong Workforce Program.(3)Funds applied to performance-based training shall be matched by a minimum of $1 contributed by private businesses or industry for each $1 of state funds. The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall consider the level of involvement and financial commitments of business and industry in making awards for performance-based training.(b)$290,400,000 shall be available to support the Strong Workforce Program pursuant to Part 54.5 (commencing with Section 88820) of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. Of this amount, $60,000,000 shall be available to support the Rebuilding Nursing Infrastructure Grant Program pursuant to Sections 88770, 88771, 88772, and 88773 of the Education Code. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate $60,000,000 each fiscal year between 2025–26 to 2028–29, inclusive, to support the Rebuilding Nursing Infrastructure Grant Program.17.Of the funds provided in Schedule (17):(a)$1,381,000 shall be used to support the Historically Black Colleges and Universities (HBCU) Transfer Pathway program, which helps develop transfer guarantee agreements that help facilitate a smooth transition for students from the California Community Colleges to partnered HBCU institutions.(b)(1)$698,000 shall be used to support transfer and articulation projects and common course numbering projects.(2)Funding provided to community college districts shall directly offset any costs claimed by community college districts to be mandates pursuant to Chapter 737 of the Statutes of 2004.18.(a)Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (18):(1)$189,298,000 shall be used pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 69640) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. Funds provided in this item for Community College Extended Opportunity Programs and Services shall be available to students on all campuses within the California Community Colleges system.(2)$34,614,000 shall be used for funding, at all colleges, the Cooperative Agencies Resources for Education program in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 79150) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall allocate these funds to local programs on the basis of need for student services.(b)Of the amount allocated pursuant to subdivision (a), no less than $4,972,000 shall be available to support additional textbook assistance grants to community college students.19.The funds appropriated in Schedule (19) shall be used for the following purposes:(a)$13,326,000 shall be used for the Puente Project to support up to 115 colleges. These funds are available if matched by $200,000 of private funds and if the participating community colleges and University of California campuses maintain their 1995–96 fiscal year support level for the Puente Project.(1)Of the funds provided in subdivision (a), $5,331,000 shall be allocated to a community college district to contract with the Puente Project to support the general operation of, and direct services delivered through, central administration which includes, but is not limited to, professional development, program data collection, program research and evaluation, and initiatives to improve student transfer rates.(2)Of the funds provided in subdivision (a), $7,995,000 shall be allocated directly to participating districts in accordance with their participation agreement.(3)(A)If the appropriation provided in this subdivision is increased from the funding level provided in the 2022–23 fiscal year, funding allocated to districts as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be adjusted consistent with their percentage share of total funding in this subdivision.(B)Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), if the appropriation provided in this subdivision is reduced from the funding level provided in the 2022–23 fiscal year, the Puente Project, in consultation with the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges, will determine the funding allocation to support services and programs provided in paragraphs (1) and (2).(4)In any fiscal year in which districts have any unexpended or unencumbered funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (2) by June 30, the Puente Project will determine a reallocation of funds that may include, but not be limited to, maintaining the allocation level for a participating site or reallocating funds to another participating site.(b)(1)$39,423,000 is to allow all colleges to establish and support California Community College Mathematics, Engineering, Science Achievement (MESA) programs. Funds provided in this item for MESA programs shall be available to students on all campuses within the California Community Colleges system to enhance California’s STEM workforce, while aiding the state and nation in reducing equity and achievement gaps.(2)The Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall award each MESA program ongoing annual funding to meet the program’s goals, at a minimum allocation of $280,000 per college. Colleges receiving an allocation shall use the funding to supplement, but not supplant, local sources of funding supporting MESA programs.(3)In any fiscal year in which districts have any unexpended or unencumbered funds allocated pursuant to subprovision (2) by June 30 of that year, MESA shall make a determination regarding the reallocation of funds that shall include maintaining the allocation level for a participating MESA program or reallocating funds to another participating MESA program.(c)No less than $1,836,000 is for the Middle College High School Program. With the exception of special part-time students at the community colleges pursuant to Sections 48802 and 76001 of the Education Code, student workload based on participation in the Middle College High School Program shall not be eligible for community college state apportionment.(d)(1)(A)No less than $9,178,000 is for the Umoja program.(B)Of funds provided in subparagraph (A), $3,671,000 shall be allocated to a community college district to contract with the Umoja Statewide program office to provide additional resources to facilitate the capacity building and development of the statewide office in an effort to expand the Umoja program, build a data support system, target the needs of special populations in the African American community, improve tutoring and mental health resources, enhance STEM/STEAM and career opportunities, and improve outcomes for students enrolled in Umoja campus programs.(C)Of the funds provided in subparagraph (A), $5,507,000 shall be allocated by the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges directly to participating districts in accordance with their Umoja Statewide participation agreement for campuses with Umoja programming. Umoja Statewide, in consultation with the Chancellor’s Office, shall determine the allocation of resources to campuses. The Umoja Statewide program shall annually report, by July 30, updates on the status of Umoja’s capacity building and expansion plan to the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the budget committees of the Senate and Assembly. Of the funds provided in this subparagraph, 1 percent shall be allocated directly to the community college district contracting with the Umoja Statewide program office for purposes related to this subparagraph.(e)Consistent with the intent of Article 7 (commencing with Section 79220) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code, the chancellor shall enter into agreements with community college districts to provide additional services in support of postsecondary education for foster youth. Up to $54,110,000 of the funds appropriated in this item shall be prioritized for services pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 79220) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. Further, the chancellor shall ensure that the list of eligible expenditures developed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 78221 of the Education Code includes expenditures that are consistent with the intent of Article 7 (commencing with Section 79220) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code.(f)$10,822,000 of the funds shall be for support of Veteran Resource Centers. To the extent funding is provided in the annual Budget Act, the chancellor shall only allocate funding to community colleges that commit to either meeting or making progress towards meeting the minimum standards developed by the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(g)(1)Colleges shall establish ongoing partnerships with community organizations that have a tradition of helping populations experiencing homelessness to provide wraparound services and rental subsidies for homeless and housing-insecure students. $20,562,000 of the funds appropriated in Schedule (19) may be used for, but are not limited to, the following authorized activities:(A)Connecting students with community case managers who have knowledge and expertise in accessing safety net resources.(B)Establishing ongoing emergency housing procedures, including on-campus and off-campus resources.(C)Providing emergency grants that are necessary to secure housing or to prevent the imminent loss of housing.(2)Funding shall be allocated to campuses based on demonstrated need.(3)“Homeless” and “housing-insecure” mean students who lack a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence. This includes students who are:(A)Sharing the housing of other persons due to loss of housing, economic hardship, or a similar reason.(B)Living in motels, hotels, trailer parks, or camping grounds due to the lack of alternative adequate accommodations.(C)Living in emergency or transitional shelters.(D)Abandoned in hospitals.(E)Living in a primary nighttime residence that is a public or private place not designed for or ordinarily used as a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings.(F)Living in cars, parks, public spaces, abandoned buildings, substandard housing, bus or train stations, or similar settings.(4)By July 15 of each year, the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall submit a report to the Director of Finance and, in conformity with Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Legislature regarding the prior year use of these funds, including the number of coordinators hired, the number of students served by campus, the distribution of funds by campus, a description of the types of programs funded, and other relevant outcomes, such as the number of students who were able to secure permanent housing, and whether students receiving support remained enrolled at the institution or graduated.(h)$11,600,000 shall be allocated by the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges to community colleges to support Dreamer Resource Liaisons and student support services, including those related to career pathways and economic mobility, for immigrant students, pursuant to Section 66021.8 of the Education Code.(i)$75,754,000 shall be available to support the basic needs of community college students.(1)(A)Of the amount allocated for this subdivision, $32,466,000 shall be available to provide for student mental health resources.(B)The Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall submit a report to the Department of Finance and relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by January 1, 2025, and every three years thereafter, regarding the use of funds specified in this paragraph. The report shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following information:(i) The amount of funds provided for each community college district.(ii) A description of how the funds were used for the purposes reflected in this paragraph.(iii) A description of the types of programs in which districts invested.(iv) The number of students receiving mental health services on campus disaggregated by race/ethnicity, gender, age group, and type of service received.(v) The average wait time for initial routine mental health counseling appointments.(vi) The average number of campus mental health counseling appointments per student.(vii) The number of students referred to off-campus providers for mental health services.(viii) Total spending on student mental health services, by fund source, including spending covered by insurance providers.(ix) Other findings and best practices implemented by districts.(2)Of the amount made available by this subdivision, $43,288,000 shall be allocated by the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges for colleges to establish and operate basic needs centers as a centralized location on campus where students experiencing basic needs insecurity can be identified, supported, and linked to on- and off-campus resources to support timely program completion pursuant to Section 66023.5 of the Education Code. Colleges shall also designate or hire dedicated basic needs coordinators for the basic needs centers who will serve as a single point of contact for students.(j)(1)$35,000,000 shall be available to support the Rising Scholars Network pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 78070) of Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code.(2)(A)Of the funds provided for in paragraph (1), 60 percent annually shall support ongoing implementation of model programming for juvenile justice-impacted students, as a grant program administered and supported by the Rising Scholars Network of the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges. Funds shall be used for model college programming with key components based on the Project Change model, to be offered both within juvenile facilities and on the community college campus, to establish a direct pathway to college for juvenile justice-impacted young people.(B)Of the funds provided for in subparagraph (A), at least 86.7 percent annually shall support a maximum of 45 community colleges on 5-year grant cycles to implement model programming to serve juvenile justice-impacted students, incorporating the three following core Project Change program components:(i) College programming that is: (I) offering University of California and California State University transferable courses and comprehensive student support programming; (II) provided by a California Community College through instruction; and (III) offered both on campus at a community college and in local juvenile detention facilities.(ii) Comprehensive support to assist students with the transition to on-campus higher education, including: (I) wraparound student support services that address basic needs such as books and supplies, tuition, fees, stipends, housing, food, and transportation; and (II) educational transition plans for students, outlining their multiyear framework from high school through college completion.(iii) Staffing and space commitments, including: (I) dedicated staffing of a program lead, counselor, and retention specialist; (II) dedicated space on the college campus for the program; and (III) formal partnerships with key stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the local county office of education, probation department, local high school districts, and community-based organizations.(C)Community colleges may implement model program components on a phased timeline. Model programs must utilize both Dual Enrollment and Guided Pathways frameworks. At the conclusion of the 5-year cohort, community colleges may reapply for continued funding support.(D)Colleges may be funded on a tiered model. Tiered model funding may consider the number of core program components a college can implement; student counts; whether the college already has an established or funded Rising Scholars program; and other metrics determined by the Rising Scholars Network of the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(E)Of the funds provided in subparagraph (A), 8.3 percent annually shall support technical assistance for successful implementation of model programming overseen by the Rising Scholars Network of the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges. Technical assistance includes contract staffing positions to oversee the project implementation, in-person trainings, and support.(k)(1)$1,100,000 shall be allocated by the Chancellor’s Office for the expansion of African American Male Education Network and Development (A2MEND) student charters at up to 50 colleges to improve academic success and develop a student support structure for African American male students attending community colleges.(2)In considering an allocation methodology to community colleges, the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall consider a factor that allocates funds to community colleges that have submitted work plans pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 88922 of the Education Code, including considering the community college’s guided pathways activities and practices.(l)(1)(A)$10,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis by the Chancellor’s Office to participating community college districts to provide additional funds to support LGBTQ+ students. For the purposes of allocating and expending this funding, the Chancellor’s Office and participating community college districts shall follow the requirements as stipulated in Section 89 of Chapter 144 of the Statutes of 2021.(B)Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 89 of Chapter 144 of the Statutes of 2021, the Chancellor’s Office shall provide grants of up to $900,000 for participating community college districts based on the proportional share of students they serve and equity metrics to ensure that small rural colleges are also able to access the grants. Participating community college districts may encumber the funds over a five-year period.(m)$5,000,000 shall be available on an ongoing basis to support the Credit for Prior Learning Initiative pursuant to Section 26 of the 2025 Higher Education Omnibus Trailer Bill (Ch. 9, Stats. 2025).20.The funds appropriated in Schedule (20) shall be allocated by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to community college districts that levied childcare permissive override taxes in the 1977–78 fiscal year pursuant to Sections 8272 and 8272.5 of the Education Code in an amount proportional to the property tax revenues, tax relief subventions, and state aid required to be made available by the district to its childcare and development program for the 1979–80 fiscal year pursuant to Section 30 of Chapter 1035 of the Statutes of 1979, increased or decreased by any cost-of-living adjustment granted in subsequent fiscal years. These funds shall be used only for the purpose of community college childcare and development programs.21.Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (21):(a)$8,475,000 shall be used to provide support for nursing programs.(b)$4,903,000 shall be used for diagnostic and support services, preentry coursework, alternative program delivery model development, and other services to reduce the incidence of student attrition in nursing programs.22.Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (22):(a)(1)$7,500,000 may be used by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to provide technical assistance to community college districts that demonstrate low performance in any area of operations. It is the intent of the Legislature that technical assistance providers be contracted in a cost-effective manner, that they primarily consist of experts who are current and former employees of the California Community Colleges, and that they provide technical assistance consistent with the vision for the California Community Colleges.(2)Technical assistance funded pursuant to this paragraph that is initiated by the chancellor may be provided at no cost to the community college district. If a community college district requests technical assistance, the district is required to spend at least $1 from local or other resources for every $2 received, as determined by the chancellor.(b)(1)$20,000,000 may be used by the chancellor to provide regional and online workshops and trainings to community college personnel to promote statewide priorities, including, but not limited to, strategies to improve student achievement; strategies to improve community college operations; and system leadership training to better coordinate planning and implementation of statewide initiatives in alignment with the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges’ Vision for Success. To the extent possible, the chancellor shall partner with existing statewide initiatives with proven results of improving student success and institutional effectiveness. Each fiscal year, the chancellor shall submit a report on the use of funds appropriated pursuant to this provision in the prior year to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee no later than December 31 of each year and, beginning in the 2025–26 fiscal year and every three years thereafter, the chancellor shall submit a report on the use of the funds appropriated pursuant to this provision in the prior three years to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee no later than December 31 of that year. This report shall include information regarding California Community Colleges’ participation in the activities funded pursuant to this provision.(2)Funding available pursuant to this paragraph may be used by the chancellor to coordinate with community college districts to conduct policy research, and develop and disseminate effective practices through the establishment of an online clearinghouse of information. The development of effective practices shall include, but not be limited to, statewide priorities such as the development of educational programs or courses for the incarcerated adults in prisons and jails, and the formerly incarcerated, educational programs or courses for California Conservation Corps members, and other effective practices. The online clearinghouse of information shall also reflect effective practices, guidance, policies, curriculum, courses, and programs developed by local community colleges in support of the Strong Workforce Program established pursuant to Part 54.5 (commencing with Section 88820) of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code.(3)It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the chancellor to facilitate the development of local community college courses for the California Conservation Corps and the incarcerated adults in prisons and jails, and the formerly incarcerated. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the California Conservation Corps are encouraged to partner with the Chancellor’s Office in the development and dissemination of local community college courses and effective practices pursuant to this paragraph and paragraph (2).23.Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (23):(a)$10,613,000 shall be allocated to continue providing a systemwide and integrated online infrastructure that supports the continuity of education and quality distance learning across the community college system. These infrastructure investments may include, but are not limited to, access to online tutoring and counseling, ensuring available and accessible technical support, and providing mental health services and other student support services.(b)$8,000,000 shall be provided to cover increased administrative costs related to the Corporation for Education Network Initiatives in California.(c)$41,890,000 shall be allocated by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges for the following purposes:(1)Procurement, development, evaluation, and upgrading of high-priority systemwide technology tools and infrastructure, including, but not limited to, e-transcript, e-planning, and other tools to assist colleges to implement multiple measures of assessment pursuant to Chapter 745 of the Statutes of 2017, and technologies that facilitate portability of education credentials.(2)Provision of access to statewide multimedia hosting and delivery services for colleges and districts.(3)Provision of systemwide internet, audio bridging, data security, and telephony.(4)Services related to technology use, including accessibility guidance and information security.(5)Technology product development and program management, technical assistance and planning, and cooperative purchase agreements.(6)Ongoing faculty and staff development related to technology use and adoption.(7)Ongoing support of the California Partnership for Achieving Student Success (Cal-PASS) program.(8)Ongoing support for programs designed to use technology in assisting accreditation and the alignment of curricula across K–20 segments in California, as well as to support integration and interoperability toward an improved student experience.(9)Support for technology pilots and ongoing technology programs and applications that serve to maximize the utility and economy of scale of the technology investments of the community college system toward improving learning outcomes.(10)Up to 5 percent of the funds may be allocated by the chancellor to a community college district for statewide activities, not limited to statewide technical assistance to evaluate, plan, and continuously improve the system’s data and technology roadmap and deployment.(d)Any funds not allocated pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be available for allocations to districts to maintain technology capabilities.(e)$4,000,000 shall be used to expand the implementation of the systemwide technology platform for library services to better manage and deliver digital information to support teaching and learning, including for students enrolled in distance education.(f)(1)$25,000,000 shall be provided for community college districts to implement local and systemwide technology and data security measures that support improved oversight of fraud mitigation, online learning quality, and cybersecurity efforts. Funds shall be used by community college districts to hire local cybersecurity staff, and funds shall also be used for systemwide measures, including, but not limited to, security upgrades for CCCApply and education technology platforms and the establishment of systemwide cybersecurity teams.(2)As a condition of receiving funds pursuant to this subdivision, a community college district shall do all of the following:(A)Complete an annual cybersecurity self-assessment of their information technology infrastructure to determine their National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST) Computer Systems Laboratory (CSL) score and report their current phase in Cal-Secure standards.(B)Participate in the following regularly scheduled cybersecurity reporting:(i) Submit remediation updates twice per year, for the fall and spring semester terms, on vulnerability and other issues identified in the previous self-assessment or triennial assessment.(ii) Submit detailed after-action reports of all cybersecurity incidents that either lead to a breach of personally identifiable information or lead to the disruption of services, including, but not limited to, a breach of student identification numbers, distributed denial-of-service attacks, and ransomware.(iii) The total number of admission applications received from CCCApply that are determined to be fraudulent, including applications marked as “likely fraud” within CCCApply, on an annual basis.(iv) Information requested on suspected fraudulent enrollments, and fraudulent receipt of financial aid, on an annual basis.(C)Reporting required by this section shall not be duplicated by other reporting required by the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(3)If the reporting required pursuant to paragraph (2) is duplicative of other reports provided by a community college district, a community college district may submit those reports in lieu of the reporting required by paragraph (2).(g)(1)Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (23), $12,000,000 shall be provided on a one-time basis for the Common Cloud Data Platform. This platform shall enhance statewide reporting, data sharing, and available analytical tools across community college districts and the Chancellor’s Office. The platform shall be designed to support community college student success initiatives, improve community college districts’ stewardship of resources and ability to use data-driven decision making, streamline community college administrative processes, and inform state budget and policy making.(2)The Chancellor’s Office shall submit a report to the Department of Technology, the Department of Finance, and the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on or before January 15, 2026, detailing the progress to date of the Common Cloud Data Platform, which includes the Common Cloud Data Platform Demonstration Project. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:(A)The platform’s implementation status and milestones achieved.(B)The platform’s intended impacts on student outcomes and systemwide efficiencies.(C)The platform’s state-level benefits.(D)A table detailing how the funds for the Common Cloud Data Platform Demonstration Project and how the funds appropriated in paragraph (1) have been spent or will be spent.(E)Any challenges encountered and solutions implemented during the development of the platform.(F)A plan, as of the report date, for the further development and expansion of the platform beyond the funds appropriated for this project as of July 1, 2025, if the Chancellor’s Office determines there is sufficient value in expansion and plans to seek more funding. The plan shall specify the project’s scope, anticipated schedule, and estimated total cost upon full implementation.(3)The Department of Technology and the Department of Finance shall review the report submitted pursuant to paragraph (2). As part of its assessment, the departments shall verify that the plan pursuant to subparagraph (F) of paragraph (2) for further development and expansion of the platform is well planned and a reasonable use of resources. The Chancellor’s Office shall provide the departments with additional information, as needed, for the departments to complete their review of the project. The departments shall provide a report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by March 31, 2026, containing recommendations related to the further development and expansion of the platform.24.The funds appropriated in Schedule (24) shall be allocated to support the Classified Community College Employee Summer Assistance Program established pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 88280) of Chapter 4 of Part 51 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code.25.The funds appropriated in Schedule (25) shall be allocated on an ongoing basis by the Office of the Chancellor to support the California Community Colleges Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander Student Achievement Program pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 79510) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code.26.Beginning on October 1, 2022, and annually thereafter, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall provide the Legislature and Department of Finance a list of all statewide or regional projects, initiatives, and services administered by districts in partnership with the Office of the Chancellor. The list shall include the amount of each agreement from the prior fiscal year, the categorical program funding source, the name of the fiscal agent, the contractor, and a brief description of the services provided by and the deliverables expected of the contractor to the Office of the Chancellor or other districts. The list shall be comprehensive, including all grants and contracts.SEC. 34. Section 22 of Chapter 9 of the Statutes of 2025 is amended to read:Sec. 22. (a) For the 2025–26 fiscal year, the sum of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for transfer to Section B of the State School Fund to support Dreamer Resource Liaisons in assisting students pursuant to Section 66021.8 of the Education Code.(b)(1)The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall allocate funds to community college districts using the same allocation methodology applicable to ongoing funds provided for this purpose pursuant to subdivision (h) of Provision 19 of Item 6870-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2025.(b) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of thirty-six million seventy-eight thousand dollars ($36,078,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for transfer to Section B of the State School Fund to support Dreamer Resource Liaisons in assisting students pursuant to Section 66021.8 of the Education Code.(c) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall allocate funds to community college districts using the same allocation methodology applicable to ongoing funds provided for this purpose pursuant to subdivision (h) of Provision 19 of Item 6870-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2026.(2)(d) The chancellor’s office may allocate up to 3 percent of the total amount appropriated pursuant to subdivision subdivisions (a) and (b) for state administrative operations to provide technical assistance and carry out the intent of this section.(c)(e) Community college districts may use the funds allocated pursuant to this section to deliver student support services, including, but not limited to, career pathways, legal services, basic needs, and outreach, pursuant to Section 66021.8 of the Education Code. Districts shall endeavor, to the extent feasible, to use a portion of these funds to provide emergency financial assistance directly to students meeting the requirements of Section 68130.5 of the Education Code. Emergency financial assistance provided pursuant to this subdivision shall not be treated as “other financial assistance” for the purposes of financial aid packaging, pursuant to Section 480 of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087vv).(d)(f) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2024–25 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2024–25 fiscal year.(g) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.SEC. 35. Section 27 of Chapter 9 of the Statutes of 2025 is amended to read:Sec. 27. (a) (1) For the 2025–26 fiscal year, the sum of sixty million dollars ($60,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for transfer to Section B of the State School Fund to establish the Student Support Block Grant.(2) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of one hundred forty-seven million two hundred eight thousand dollars ($147,208,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for transfer to Section B of the State School Fund for the Student Support Block Grant.(b) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall allocate the funds appropriated in this section to community college districts. In determining each district’s allocation, the chancellor’s office shall first provide a base amount of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for each college in the district. The chancellor’s office shall then allocate any remaining funds based on a formula that places equal weight on the following two measures:(1) Student headcount for the most recent fiscal year in which the data is considered final.(2) The sum of the following counts:(A) The number of students receiving fee waivers pursuant to Section 76300 of the Education Code for the most recent fiscal year in which the data is considered final.(B) The number of students receiving exemptions from nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68130.5 of the Education Code for the most recent fiscal year in which the data is considered final.(c) The funds appropriated pursuant to this section may be expended for any of the following purposes:(1) Assistance to students with food, housing, transportation, and other basic needs.(2) Childcare subsidies or other assistance for student parents.(3) Financial aid advising or academic counseling.(4) Legal and other support services.(5) Mental health services.(6) Job placement, work-based learning, or reemployment support.(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that community college districts align the uses of the funds appropriated in this section with existing student support programs.(e) Community college districts shall have until June 30, 2029, to expend the funds appropriated pursuant to this section.(f) (1) As a condition of receiving funds appropriated pursuant to this section, community college districts shall submit a report to the chancellor’s office on or before December 31, 2026, and on or before December 31 of each year thereafter until December 31, 2029. Each report shall include both of the following for the previous fiscal year:(A) A summary of how the funds were used, including the types of services provided.(B) The outcomes of the funds, including the number of students receiving each type of service and any available data on their academic outcomes.(2) The chancellor’s office shall make the reports submitted by districts pursuant to paragraph (1) available to the Legislature upon request.(3) The chancellor’s office shall submit an interim report on or before July 1, 2028, and a final report on or before July 1, 2030, to the Department of Finance and the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code. Each report shall include the amount of funds provided to each community college district and a summary of the key information submitted by districts pursuant to paragraph (1) for the previous two fiscal years.(g) (1) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2024–25 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2024–25 fiscal year.(2) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) of the appropriation made pursuant to paragraph (2) subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.(3) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, forty-seven million two hundred eight thousand dollars ($47,208,000) of the appropriation made pursuant to paragraph (2) subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2026–27 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2026–27 fiscal year.SEC. 36. (a) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of seven million eight hundred eighteen thousand dollars ($7,818,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for transfer to Section B of the State School Fund for allocation for related and supplemental instruction hours for the 2024–25 fiscal year. Funds appropriated for this subdivision shall be used for the same purpose as the funds appropriated in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Provision 4 of Item 6870-101-0001 in the Budget Act of 2024 (Chapters 22, 35, and 994 of the Statutes of 2024, as amended by Section 17 of Chapter 9 of the Statutes of 2025).(b) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of eight million one hundred eighty-two thousand dollars ($8,182,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for transfer to Section B of the State School Fund for allocation for related and supplemental instruction hours for the 2025–26 fiscal year. Funds appropriated for this section shall be used for the same purpose as the funds appropriated in Provision 4 of Item 6870-101-0001 in the Budget Act of 2025 (Chapters 4, 5, and 77 of the Statutes of 2025).(c) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriations made pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2026–27 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2026–27 fiscal year.SEC. 37. (a) For purposes of this section, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:(1) “California Early College Demonstration Initiative” or “initiative” means the California Early College Demonstration Initiative described in subdivision (b).(2) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(3) “Department” means the State Department of Education.(4) “Local educational agencies” means school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools.(b) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community College to enable the chancellor’s office, in consultation with the department, to establish and support the California Early College Demonstration Initiative, a regional pilot focused on implementing and scaling comprehensive dual enrollment and early college systems through partnerships between local educational agencies and community college districts. The initiative shall focus on implementation support, systems alignment, and capacity building necessary to expand and sustain equitable dual enrollment and early college opportunities.(c) The initiative shall be led by a technical assistance provider, selected by the chancellor’s office in consultation with the department, with demonstrated success implementing and scaling comprehensive early college models that provide structured college and career pathways for students beginning in grade 9 and continuing through high school graduation. The provider shall have experience supporting partnerships between local educational agencies and community college districts that have achieved measurable increases in student participation, college credit and degree attainment, transfer readiness, and workforce pathway completion through comprehensive early college implementation.(d) The technical assistance provider shall support existing high school and college partnerships in transitioning from isolated dual enrollment offerings to comprehensive and structured early college systems that provide students with meaningful progress toward certificates, degrees, transfer, and workforce outcomes while enrolled in high school.(e) The technical assistance provider shall, at a minimum, engage in all of the following activities:(1) Lead the design, coordination, and implementation of the initiative, including development of frameworks, tools, guidance, and technical assistance resources for participating partnerships.(2) Deliver regional implementation coaching and onsite support to local educational agencies and community college districts to assist with planning, execution, and sustainability of dual enrollment and early college programs.(3) Provide direct assistance with pathway design, curriculum alignment, course scheduling, support systems, student outreach, and partnership development between local educational agencies and community college districts.(4) Design and facilitate professional development opportunities, communities of practice, and convenings for educators, administrators, counselors, faculty, and institutional leaders.(5) Establish and manage data collection, evaluation, reporting, and continuous improvement processes to monitor student participation, outcomes, equity impacts, and implementation progress across participating partnerships.(6) Develop guidance, tools, and strategies to expand access to dual enrollment opportunities beginning in grade 9 and increase the number of students completing meaningful college credit, certificates, or degree pathways before high school graduation.(7) Identify, document, and disseminate effective practices and provide support for the development, refinement, and implementation of scalable dual enrollment and early college models that can be replicated across the state.(8) Assist local educational agencies and community college districts in aligning dual enrollment and early college pathways with existing college and career readiness initiatives, workforce pathway programs, and school redesign efforts supported through current state investments.(9) Provide guidance and technical assistance related to faculty minimum qualifications, instructor credentialing, equivalency processes, graduate education pathways, onboarding, instructional delivery models, and other strategies to expand instructional capacity. That assistance may include support for community college faculty and qualified K–12 instructors seeking to meet minimum qualifications or equivalency requirements necessary to teach dual enrollment courses consistent with applicable laws, regulations, and collective bargaining agreements.(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the initiative support implementation partnerships serving diverse rural, suburban, and urban communities within counties that have demonstrated readiness to expand comprehensive dual enrollment and early college systems. Priority shall be given to implementation efforts serving the Counties of Kern, San Bernardino, San Diego, and Riverside through partnerships between local educational agencies and community college districts committed to expanding equitable access to structured dual enrollment and early college pathways.(g) Participating partnerships shall be selected to demonstrate scalable models for expanding equitable access to dual enrollment and early college opportunities, increasing student participation and completion of college credit pathways, strengthening transfer and workforce alignment, and advancing statewide goals related to educational attainment, workforce preparation, and economic mobility. The technical assistance provider shall evaluate, document, and disseminate lessons learned from implementation efforts in any participating partnerships to inform future expansion of successful practices throughout the state. The technical assistance provider shall provide a report to the chancellor’s office, the department, the California Interagency Council, the Department of Finance, the Assembly Budget Subcommittee No. 3 on Education Finance, the Assembly Committee on Education, the Assembly Committee on Higher Education, the Senate Budget and Fiscal Review Subcommittee No. 1 on Education, and the Senate Committee on Education annually, beginning one year from the selection of the technical assistance provider, until all funds have been expended. These reports shall include, but are not limited to, a summary of the provider’s specific activities reported by each subparagraph listed in subdivision (e), any identified challenges or obstacles, how those challenges or obstacles were addressed, and any lessons learned for the future. A final report evaluating the impact of this initiative and identifying successful practices shall be due no later than one year after all funds have been expended.(h) In carrying out its responsibilities, the technical assistance provider shall coordinate, as appropriate, with other state-supported initiatives, including, but not limited to, the California College Guidance Initiative, the Golden State Pathways Program, and the Strong Workforce Program, and shall collaborate with local educational agencies, community college districts, faculty, instructors, and workforce partners to promote alignment of resources, reduce duplication, and support coherent local implementation strategies.(i) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2026–27 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2026–27 fiscal year.SEC. 38. (a) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of one million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for transfer to Section B of the State School Fund to support the Cal-Bridge First Academic Scholar Training Program.(b) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.SEC. 39. (a) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for transfer to Section B of the State School Fund to support Pierce College Family Resource Centers.(b) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.SEC. 40. (a) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of three million three hundred twelve thousand dollars ($3,312,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for transfer to Section B of the State School Fund for allocation to community college districts for any of the purposes described in subdivision (b).(b) (1) Scheduled maintenance and special repairs of facilities. As a condition of receiving and expending these funds for maintenance or special repairs of facilities, a community college district shall certify that it will increase its operations and maintenance spending from the 1995–96 fiscal year by the amount it allocates from this appropriation for maintenance or special repairs of facilities. A community college district’s compliance with its certification shall be reviewed under the annual audit of the community college district.(2) Hazardous substances abatement, cleanup, and repairs.(3) Architectural barrier removal projects that meet the requirements of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq.) and seismic retrofit projects limited to one million one hundred three thousand dollars ($1,103,000).(4) Water conservation projects to reduce water consumption in cooperation with the Governor’s Executive Order B-37-16, including any of the following:(A) Replacement of water-intensive landscaping with drought-tolerant landscaping, synthetic turf, if the turf is used only in nonathletic areas, and other nonplant materials.(B) Drip or low-flow irrigation systems.(C) Building improvements to reduce water usage.(D) Installation of meters for wells to allow for monitoring of water usage.(5) Support for energy efficiency projects.(6) Support for childcare facility repair and maintenance.(7) Replacement of instructional equipment and library materials. The funds provided for instructional equipment and library materials shall not be used for personal services costs or operating expenses.(c) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall allocate funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) to community college districts on the basis of actual reported full-time equivalent students, and may establish a minimum allocation per community college district.(d) Funds appropriated pursuant to this section shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031.(e) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.SEC. 41. (a) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for transfer to Section B of the State School Fund to support Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender, and Queer (LGBTQ+) students.(b) (1) For the purposes of allocating and expending this funding, the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and participating community college districts shall follow the requirements set forth in Section 89 of Chapter 144 of Statutes of 2021.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 89 of Chapter 144 of the Statutes of 2021, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall provide grants of up to nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000) for participating community college districts based on the proportional share of students they serve and equity metrics to ensure that small rural colleges are also able to access the grants. Participating community college districts may encumber the funds over a five-year period.(c) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.SEC. 42. (a) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of thirty-eight million two hundred thirty-two thousand dollars ($38,232,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for transfer to Section B of the State School Fund to support community college apportionments in the 2025–26 fiscal year. Funds appropriated pursuant to this subdivision shall be used for the same purposes as funds allocated for apportionments in Schedule (1) of Item 6870-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chapters 4, 5, and 77 of the Statutes of 2025).(b) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of one hundred two million eight hundred five thousand ($102,805,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for transfer to Section B of the State School Fund to support community college apportionments in the 2025–26 fiscal year. Funds appropriated pursuant to this subdivision shall be used for the same purposes as funds allocated for apportionments in Schedule (1) of Item 6870-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chapters 4, 5, and 77 of the Statutes of 2025).(c) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of fifty-five million two hundred ninety-one thousand dollars ($55,291,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for transfer to Section B of the State School Fund to increase statewide growth of full-time equivalent students by an additional 1 percent in the 2025–26 fiscal year. Funds appropriated pursuant to this subdivision shall be used for the same purposes as funds appropriated in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Provision 2 of Item 6870-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chapters 4, 5, and 77 of the Statutes of 2025).(d) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriations made pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (c) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2024–25 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2024–25 fiscal year.(e) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.SEC. 43. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 44. This act is a bill providing for appropriations related to the Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution, has been identified as related to the budget in the Budget Bill, and shall take effect immediately.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact statutory changes relating to the Budget Act of 2025.